The bright full moon shone through a gap in the low cloud cover just as Jack launched himself over a narrow alley and landed lightly on the rough tiles of the next roof. His bare feet made little sound on contact, but there was a slight grinding groan as the tiles adjusted to his weight. His heavily callused soles skittering merrily across the familiar landscape, moving with practised grace, and never missing a step. Another alley, and he grinned with joy as he felt himself sail effortlessly across the man-made chasm.

His imagination roamed unfettered as he alternatively jogged, stepped, sprinted, and leaped across the tiled world. Two illusory hawks swooped from the sky to fasten upon his outstretched arms and he imagined they carried him with swooping ecstasy across a particularly wide gap. At his bidding, flat mushrooms grew underfoot to cushion his footsteps before fading back into the red tile. A gust of hot air buoyed him through yet another leap.

He was close now. A gaggle of gnomes peered at him from the peak of the roof. They were obviously another figment of his overactive imagination, but they caused him to fear real eyes upon him. Eyes that could report him to the head of his guild. His wild imaginings needed reining in now, and he did it sternly. The gnomes sank bashfully from view.

The rooves had grown larger and the chimney's taller, and in his young mind, that meant rich pickings. Tiptoeing to the edge of the roof, only a handspan from a fall that would leave him crippled or dead, he examined the street below to get his bearings.

He bit his lip and squinted. Three rooftops to go.

Creeping with care in the last dozen yards, he tested each tile with a tentative foot before applying his weight. A dog yapped somewhere below and a man swore into the otherwise quiet night.

Jack breathed in a long cool breath of air as he positioned himself next to a particularly tall and imposing chimney. With wily fingers, as callused as his toes, he began to work the first tile free. Unbidden, he imagined his fingers as flat hard pincers, like the ones he had seen in the foundry, and it seemed to help him grip the tile. The ceramic scraped ever so slightly as he twisted it free of its brothers, but made no other sound. Placing it on the upside of the chimney, to guard against the freak misfortune of it sliding off the steep roof, he attacked the second tile.

With two tiles out, the hole left behind was far too small for an adult to squeeze through. Yet for Jack's young, lithe form it was perfect, and he dangled his feet into the darkness without a moment's hesitation, the gaping unknown giving him not a moment's pause.

Darkness, and a kind of relief. There were no guards on the rooves of the town proper, but the guild's eyes worried him far more.  Those eyes might, one way or another, belong to Marten, and Jack had no intention of being discovered working outside the guild.

Darkness. This was the tricky bit. Keeping his feet on the ceiling joists and away from the ceiling slats—to keep from falling through and causing a terrible racket—he began moving back and forth along the joists, searching with trailing fingers for a ceiling manhole.

His luck being what it was, he had covered most of the space before he found the ceiling manhole in the cramped confines close to the eaves. Heart pounding furiously and his breath tight in his chest, he gently pulled the manhole cover up and into the attic space.

Silence. Still as a cat in the grass as the butcher strolls by, he listened.

Silence. Strange smells wafted up from the hallway below. Rich people's houses always smelled funny. A very faint light lit the hall runner and Jack was grateful. It was hard enough moving around an unfamiliar house, let alone doing it in pitch darkness.

Having assured himself that nobody was up and about in the house below, Jack lowered himself into the hallway. Legs dangling, he dropped almost four feet to the floor with a muted bump. All was quiet, except for the furious pounding of the blood in his ears.  With a small swell of satisfaction he noticed that he had avoided scraping his forearms on the lumber of the roof joists on his way down.

He orientated himself by what he knew of the outside of the house and the position of the kitchen. The kitchen would hold any silver that the house had. He was not greedy. Gold might be kept in the bedrooms, but he had no desire to pry it from anyone's sleepy fingers.

Taking a moment for himself, he crouched down on all fours, and pressed his nose against the bare wooden floor beside the floor runner. He took a long, slow sniff. It smelled wonderful. Jack had no idea how they made these magical polished floors, but one day he wanted them too. Although he would need a house to put them in first.

He climbed to his feet and crept forward with slow and deliberate steps along the hall runner. The fibers were plush and soft beneath his bare feet, and completely masked his footfalls. The house was so quiet that Jack could hear it give the occasional soft groan.  The light in the hallway was given off by a turned down oil lamp just before the landing to the stairs, and Jack eyed it enviously.  Oil was expensive. In his family, that meant it would never be filled. He would love to take it for Mardy—the girl-woman he thought of as his mother—but they were far too poor. Jack understood enough to know that the reminder would hurt her heart.

Drawing near the lamp, he noticed that the door opposite was open, and wide enough for him to slip inside.

Jack sniffed, and then grinned as he wiped his moist palms against his dirty trouser legs. Leather, fabric, and something else. This room must be a lounge, and private lounges were often filled with valuables. Trembling slightly, he unlimbered the lamp and held it high as he entered the room. He gave the door a gentle, tentative push. It creaked softly, distracting him.

Jack knew how to deal with a creaky door. He placed the lamp on the floor, just inside the room but clear of the doorway, and put his shoulder against the edge of the door, pushing upwards against its hinges he swung it slowly and carefully closed. It did not make another peep. He smiled. With it closed, he was free to explore in some peace. It was only then that it occurred to him that there might be someone sitting or sleeping in the dark room at his back.

He swung around quickly to inspect the room, the soles of his feet moist from the start his carelessness had given him. The lamp set the shadows flickering unsteadily, and for a moment, he imagined grown men concealed there. He stared intently, perfectly still, but no one lurked in the dim light flung by the lamp. He relaxed slowly.

A creeping sick feeling turned his stomach for a moment, almost strong enough to excite a warning tingle on his tongue. He took a deep breath into his tummy to steady it and went to unlatch the window. He stared at the glass window pane and pressed his thumb against the cold, smooth surface, boggling at the wealth it must take to have glass windows commissioned for an entire house. The wooden frame made some noise as he slid it upwards, but he risked it anyway. He did not want to be trapped in this room. He hung his head briefly out the window to see where he was and then started turning the room over.

One wall of the lounge was completely taken up by leather bound sheafs of paper, and although Jack could not read, he gravitated towards them, fascinated. He had never seen so much paper in one place before, and for good reason. It was ridiculously expensive.

Jack ran his fingers over the leather spines. A rush of unease rode up his fingers and caused him a nervous shiver. Something about these books tickled an uneasy memory, a half-remembered conversation, or perhaps it was premonition of danger. The craftmanship and beauty of the bookcases implied that this collection was highly valued, but something about all these sheets of paper together in one place felt wrong. He shook his head roughly. It did not matter. These books might be expensive, but he had no way to move them.

He turned from the bookshelves with regret and focused his attention to the desk. It was big and heavy, yet polished so smooth that it was beautiful, not crude. A silver paperweight and matching letter opener were the first items to make their way into the folds of Jack's patch riddled black coat. He smiled, his mood improving.

Pulling a drawer open, he was confronted with a shallow wooden box.  He opened it quickly and was disappointed to find a single, pink-hued crystal. Nestled in its own silk lined box, it was clearly valuable. The crystal was pretty and it drew his eye like a lodestone, but again, Jack would never be able to sell it. He almost put it back, but on an impulse he slipped it into his baggy, oversized coat as well.

He opened the drawer on the opposite side of the desk.

This drawer was filled with small glass vials. He knew enough about the world that his hand withdrew from the neat collection as though bitten and he stepped back in alarm. The reason the book laden bookshelves had been scratching at his mind like a rusty nail on flintstone came to him in successive waves of mounting horror. He had never seen anything like these vials before this moment, but the impression they left on him was immediate. Only one group of people kept such things, and they were never to be messed with. He closed the drawer again quickly.

A muffled curse sounded out in the hallway, and before the sound faded Jack had moved to the window and swung his legs out. Despite his visceral need to flee pounding at his gut, he paused and watched the door with baited breath.

The door swung inward with a sharp creak.

Jack jumped from the second floor window with one clean jerk, his coat tails flapping wildly in the air as the ground rushed up to meet him. He fell with his arms stretched out high above his head.  Contact with the ground brought his knees up and arms down in one fluid motion that turned into a roll and had him up in a fraction of a moment, sprinting for an open alley. A yell issued from the window he had just leapt from, and then a sharp exhalation.

Instinctively, Jack bounced sharply off the alley wall towards the opposite side, expecting an arrow. There was a muffled pop, and then a sizzling and hissing. Stumbling, Jack fetched up against the opposite wall on his hands and kness and turned wide-eyed to see the stone wall dissolve behind a screen of billowing black smoke.

He stared at the smoke in appalled disbelief, wondering what it would have done to his bare skin.

He scrambled a few yards farther down the alley, the slick, evil smelling refuse on the ground coating his hands before he found his feet again and ran on. He shot a look behind him to see if he was being pursued, but could not see clearly through the stinging tears that had begun to well in his eyes, let alone through the noxious smoke.

"I've screwed up bad this time Mardy," he managed to sob as he sprinted, the hairs on the back of his neck through to his scalp tingling with alarm.

The worst thing was that she could not save him from this.

---

He made it home in short order, practically skipping over the heads of the few lurkers awake in the early hours before sunrise. Pimps, prostitutes, drunks, thieves, watchers, and the odd legitimately industrious individual whose work required them to begin in the small hours of the day. Jack prided himself on being able to avoid confrontation, which given his size, was absolutely essential. He kept to the shadows and the rooftops of Corsisan as much as he could.

He knew he should not go home. He fought the instinct, but in the end it drew him beyond his ability to resist. It reminded him of the words of a perpetually drunk neighbour in the shanty town. It is one thing to give yourself good council, and quite another to heed it.

As much care as he took to avoid the people of Corsisan in the hours of darkness, he was twice as careful to avoid the stray dogs that really ruled these street after dark. They infested Corsisan like a plague, and he winced on every yip, yap, bark, and howl.

Candle light flickered through the second floor window of a room that he shared with Mardy and another three unwanted children. In any city where children had any value at all, they would be called orphans. But not in this city.

There were roughly twenty tiny partitioned rooms like theirs on that floor, and only a handful had a shuttered window. Their window did make them slightly easier to rob, Jack would be the first to wryly admit, but he enjoyed the fresh air nonetheless. Besides, they rarely had anything worth stealing.

Until only two months ago, they had all been living in the shanty town, but the end of that time had been signalled a half year before when Stine got a job at the foundry. His and Mardy's modest scrip, Jack's thievery, and the beggings of Hat and Snot were now enough to keep them in this much safer area. The most luxurious living quarters in the shanty town were poorly thatched huts, often with open sewerage ditches running close by.

They had not been living in anything approaching that grandness.  The mudbrick palaces were a great improvement.

It had been Mardy's idea to move. There had been six of them, Mardy was always taking in strays, but the baby had gotten sick for no good reason that Jack could see. Just one of those things. But Mardy blamed the shanty town, saying that it was not a healthy place to live. Mardy had ambitions. She refused to live in the shanty town her whole life through like her mother had. She wanted to live in a real house, like the people she hauled laundry for.  She said that people who lived in houses did not get sick like they did in the shanty.

Jack liked the idea of living in a house, so he had not mentioned that just as many people had died in fancy houses as in the shanty town during the great sickness that had swept through two years ago. None of his family had died then.

The mudbrick wall opposite their building had been laid without precision or care, and individual mud bricks jutted out from their fellows with convenient regularity. Even with the liberal limewash, Jack climbed it with ease. He peered in on his family, feeling his throat tighten at the thought that he may not see any of them again for some time. An itch between his shoulder blades told him that he probably should not be here even now.

Mardy was the eldest and the toughest of them. Her job washing clothes started before dawn, hauling dirty laundry from people's houses to the river with the other washer girls. Mardy ran her own gang of washers, a position she took over when her mother died. A woman Jack remember only vaguely with a sense of awe mixed with terror.

As always, Mardy was the first up, her mousy, thin brown hair tucked away behind a toque she had made for herself from old bedsheets. Jack's own trousers were more bedsheet than the original material, though sullied beyond recognition as such.

A metallic rattle sounded in the distance.

<i>Was that armour? A scabbard?</i> He stared at the flagstones of a nearby corner with the intensity of a prowling cat, though the sound was at least one street over. The last thing he wanted was to be taken by the city guard, given what had just happened. They did not patrol the mud palaces as often as the high streets, and he could not believe they were here by coincidence. He needed to go.  He turned his eyes back to the window, wishing that Stine, his adoptive big brother, would get up so he could see his ugly mug one last time.

Nothing. Even Mardy was gone.

Jack dropped back to the ground, carefully missing a hole that a dog had dug in the dirt of the street. His throat was heavy with the tears his eyes wanted to shed, but he pushed them down.  Instead, his brow furrowed in thought as he headed towards Marten's den. Marten's rats would still be out and about in the city, but the big rat would be in his hole. Jack needed a safe place to stay, somewhere outside the city, and he had a growing hope that Marten could.

Shortly thereafter Jack arrived at the den. The flickering light shining through the gaps in the door let Jack know that someone was definitely at home.

He tapped gently at the dry and desiccated wood. It might have been a real door at some stage, but it had mostly rotted away now. It stood now through some kind of divine grace, with the bottom foot or so completely gone, and a chunk missing from the upper right corner.  The wood looked so brittle under its complement of green and white mould, that Jack was pretty sure that even he could kick it in. That would have been a huge mistake though. The door stayed closed because the man behind the door insisted that it stayed closed. That was the only reason. Jack continued his gentle tapping until he heard someone stir within.

The door opened inward on the dark interior, the candlelight flickering amid the sudden draught.

"Who is it?" Jack heard Marten's voice call out from within.

"Looks like the kid who got beaten by the city guard last week," came the reply from the guy at the door, his pocked-marked face leering from behind the tattered wood.

Jack flushed. It had not been a beating. A kick up the bum at best.  He scowled at the greasy-haired, pocked-faced door holder; but not too hard, since Jack knew he was also a large and heavy-boned lad who enjoyed punching people in the head.

Be bold, he told himself, and he strode into the hovel with his head high, a scant moment before Marten said, "Varlay."

"I want onto the farm," said Jack in a firm voice, making out Marten and one other person sitting with their backs to the wall in the gloom.

The long lean-to had a poorly maintained thatch roof and straw covered dirt floor that filled the space with the strong smell of mould. Marten's woman, Sadel, fought it with scents of thyme and rosemary, but the outcome was not pleasant to Jack's nose.

"What farm?" came Marten's confused and slightly contemptuous reply.

Marten's attitude only confirmed the whispers that Jack had heard about the thief guild farm. He had heard it referred to in passing by two separate sources, so Marten's evasions were not going to fly.

Marten himself was neither a large, nor imposing figure. He was a skinny, softly spoken, almost delicate man. Yet his reputation was far more fierce than his outward appearance gave credence. He had been the head of this district of the thieves guild for almost five years, having quietly disposed of the former incumbent before Jack had grown a self-preservatory interest in local politics. In that time, Jack had not heard a single whisper of anyone ever crossing him in even the most minor of ways and living to tell of it.

"I know about the farm," Jack replied, his voice flat and steady.  He did not allow any excitement or anxiety to seep into his voice.  He knew it was vital not to show any emotion here. The slightest hint of unease would be used against him.

"You don't know shit, midget!" swore Sadel, her voice edged with a screech that set Jack's nerves jangling. He hated her. He hated her fiercely. He hated her because she was dangerous.

"I know about the farm," Jack did not budge by the slightest degree.

Jack had only been in here twice in the time that he had been actively thieving. Once, when he first began thieving, escorted and sponsored by Stine, only two years ago. And once again during a dispute with another thief. Both times he had tread most carefully to avoid setting off Sadel. He had had plenty of time to consider the dynamic between the two, and Jack was certain he knew exactly why Marten kept Sadel close by.

She was his dog.

Of course, not a literal dog. Just the crazy animal in the room that removed the element of logic far enough away from the discourse to present Marten's power to its full advantage. She was the gatekeeper that allowed Marten to size someone up before he was forced to respond. Otherwise, Marten was too logical, too methodical. Those traits sometimes did not equate to the best advantage, and he relied on Sadel to sew enough uncertainty and discord for him to work the angles. Jack could admire the strategy while hating being its target.

"The farm is not a free service, imp," Marten relented, "How do you intend to pay your way?"

Sadel shot to her feet, her pinched face intense. Jack knew she wanted to hurt him for getting past her. If Marten conceded anything, she took it as a personal affront. Her failure. She stalked up to Jack's side to stare down menacingly at him. She was half a head taller than him, but he managed to ignore her.

"I can afford it," Jack said, a touch quickly.

Someone Jack had not noticed in the concealed recesses of the long lean-to moved in the darkness, revealing his or her presence.  Jack's eyes shifted quickly before he could control himself.

"I haven't even given you a price yet," Marten rejoined, shaking his head ever so slightly in doubt of Jack's means.

"You can't afford it you little shit," Sadel growled, practically in his ear.

Jack smelled something unpleasant on a waft of Sadel's breath, and turned his head slightly away with an ostentatious grimace. He heard her hiss.

"But first," Marten said, raising his voice slightly with the developing situation, "why do you need it?"

"Just a little heat I've picked up," Jack replied in what he imagined was his coolest tone.

"No one spends time on the farm on the strength of a bad feeling Jack," Marten surprised Jack by remembering his name, "you know exactly who wants you, and you'll be out on your ear if you don't tell me now."

Jack's insides fell in a rush. He had not prepared to spin a cover story for what he was really running from. He would just have to risk telling the truth. Still, that was not a particularly pleasant truth. He held his tongue for several moments, fighting with himself, before giving in.

"A malkemist."

Marten had been sitting quietly since Jack entered the room, but now he went completely still.

A moment passed, then two. Sadel was alternatively looking to Marten and then Jack, alarm growing on her face.

Marten said nothing further, just flicked his fingers towards the door.

Sadel pounced, a slap catching Jack behind the ear with surprising force. She was giving off a strange whine of outrage, as though she wanted to scream, but was holding it in. She punched and kicked Jack towards the door, and Jack did not resist. He was getting out just as quickly as she wanted him out. As Jack half stumbled at the door, she gave him a kick up the rear that propelled him forward.  It caused him to catch a foot on the threshold and sent him to the ground outside in a graceless sprawl.

"Get out here and don't come back whoreson!" cursed Sadel in an intense but carrying whisper.

She stood glaring at him for a few moments, Jack busy rolling to his feet and putting distance between himself and her, before the doorkeeper all but pushed her out of the way to set the door closed again.

It seemed that the thieves guild was just as scared of the malkemists as everyone else. He wondered why he had thought it might be different. Malkemists did things that should be impossible. They scared people. Even people who made a living not being scared of a great many things.

Jack protected himself from the shock of what had just happened by thinking. Thinking quick. He still needed to get out of town. He would just have to do it without help. He started down the alley, another plan forming. He had only walked a dozen steps when he heard the door move again.

"Hey boy! Come back," called the doorkeeper.

Jack's felt a spasm of real fear, and his mind quickly surmised that Marten must have decided that there was more advantage in presenting him for reward rather than simply abandoning him to his own devices.

Jack ran.

The doorman made a noise that sounded like a growl, a bark, and a shout all rolled into one, and came lumbering out of the lean-to.  Jack bare feet hardly touched the dirt as he hared off, leaping adroitly over a deep washout that rain had formed in the street. He moved so far and fast in a handful of moments that the doorman gave only token pursuit, giving up almost as soon as he had started.  Jack would have laughed in his face if he had dared turn back.

It was just as well he did not indulge himself. With his eyes forward, he got the jump on one of Marten's rats walking back up to base before the poor sod even knew he should be giving chase.

Marten's lean-to was on the border between the mudbrick palaces—as Jack's family called them—and the shanty town. The shanty town built itself out of any material that promised to last more than a week. The mudbrick palaces were built from bricks of compressed straw and mud, and covered with a lime wash that sealed and protected it from the elements. The rich however, built with stone, and that was where Jack was headed now. Towards the town proper where the buildings became permanent structures made of stone, tile, and properly seasoned lumber.

Years of snooping around these areas, and avoiding the attentions of zealous guards, had endowed Jack with the skills he needed to move through these cobbled streets undetected. It was not lost on him that the town guard seemed to be out in unusual force, marching rounds and sitting on street corners. Jack had his work cut out avoiding them all.

He had two fences that he used. The man he was going to now in the town proper, and one among the mudbrick palaces. The one in the mudbrick palaces was run by a goldsmith that Jack knew as Rat Tail.  He probably had a real name, but Jack had never heard it. Rat Tail worked closely with Marten, and Jack had no idea how quickly Marten would send out the word to pick him up.

Fortunately, Jack had not always been the most scrupulous guild member, and healthy share of his jobs were done outside the knowledge of the guild. Getting caught would have meant death at any time, but Jack had always been a couple of steps ahead of the plods who even tried to follow him through these streets. That meant that he had had to fence through a contact that had absolutely nothing to do with Marten, his rats, or the thieves guild. Rat Tail would have ratted him out in an instant if he showed unusual activity. Fencing his stolen metal through an upper class contact also paid better.

Enter Rouger. Jack had found Rouger very deliberately. He knew what he needed, and using what he knew about Rat Tail's profession, goldsmithing, he had set out to develop more of those contacts. He had not been green to the idea, he had simply copied it from Mardy.  Ever since Jack could remember he had been with Mardy on her rounds, approaching houses on the high streets and wheedling jobs; sometimes out from under the noses of competing washer outfits. It had been a small leap to apply those skills to his particular need.  He had haunted the town proper for a month, first discovering all of the goldsmith shops that existed, and then observing them each individually. He had found another fence like Rat Tail almost immediately, but that was not what he wanted. A fence like Rat Tail had a master to report to, and that was exactly what Jack wanted to avoid.

Instead, he had searched for the weak link among the remaining "honest" goldsmiths, those that had no familiar faces entering at odd hours. It had not taken long to uncover Rouger's poor reputation in the marketplace. His business practices should have had him in a dungeon somewhere long since, but to Jack's puzzlement, he continued on in trade unmolested. It was his first lesson in the importance of framing how you stole, rather than what you stole. To Jack, the man's lack of a moral compass was a positive attribute, and a set of slightly heavy scale weights affected him very little.

Jack's first approach to Rouger had been bumpy to say the least, but the man had soon warmed up when he realized there was coin to be made. It helped that he was an imbecile.

---

Rouger was a middle aged man with a growing midsection and terrible breath. Both of which could probably be blamed on his fondness for sweet pastries and strong cheeses. He was also a terrible insomniac, which was the reason he was wide awake and at his workbench when he heard three hollow taps against the square porthole in his workroom floor. His palms instantly began to sweat with anticipation, despite the general chill. This was often his favourite time of the day, but that did not stop him grumbling as he took a wooden mallet from the shelf to knock free the chocks that kept the waxed wooden pallet in place over the sewer below.  The waxed pallet prevented the stench from entering the workroom and it was quite a shock when he finally plucked it free.

In his haste he had forgotten to lay straw on the stone beside the porthole, and he quickly strew some from a hessian bag. He rubbed his nightcap over his bald head to scrape at an idle itch as the black-haired boy climbed quickly out, accompanied by a cloud of putrid air. The boy was thin, but not unhealthy. It was the leanness of youthful activity, not starvation. His face was smooth and pimple free. To Rouger, that just meant that he had not yet hit puberty.

Rouger quickly replaced the pallet to block the smell of the sewer, his face puckered around his nose, and chaffed his moist hands together in anticipation. The boy did not smile, he never smiled. He just darted his dark, glittering eyes around the room quickly before settling them on Rouger.

"Well! Let's see it boy!" Rouger grumbled.

The boy slipped a hand into his tattered coat and drew forth a knife. Rouger almost stepped back fearfully before he recognised the letter opener. He snatched it from the boy, angry with him for the scare. The feel of the cool silver in his hand was enough to convince him that it was real. His mouth jerked up into an involuntarily smile.

"Anything else?"

A small wooden box and a silver elephant statue came out of the boy's coat, the silver looking far too heavy to have been carried by the worn and heavily patched fabric. Rouger almost laughed at the incongruity. When the paperweight plonked heavily into his palm he felt his teeth bare with pleasure, though his mood soured when he noticed the boy's eyes watching him keenly from his grime covered face. Rouger placed the two silver items onto his scale dish.

"What's that?" asked Rouger, eyeing the pretty box.

"Nothing." said Jack, moving to replace it in his coat.

Rouger grabbed the boy's wrist in one deft hand and plucked the box from his grasp. The boy was clever enough not to complain.

The exterior of the box was delicately inlaid with mother of pearl in the form of intricately interwoven leaves. A heavy silver swing catch bound the two halves of the box together, but if there was a hinge it was carefully concealed.

Rouger licked his thin lips as he pressed a thumb against the bottom of the catch, and then almost dropped the box as the lid swung open in his hand.

"You idiot!" cried Rouger, "Do you know what you've done!?"

He swung a backhand at the boy's head, but the boy ducked under it with surprising agility. Frustrated and enraged he kicked at the boy instead and propelled him clear off his patch of straw. An action he immediately regretted as the boy's fouly besmirched feet padded over his floor.

Rouger's head was swimming now with terrible scenarios, not least of which was a couple of malkemist warlocks disintegrating his front door and melting his corpulent self down for some kind of soap in retribution. He squeezed his head between both hands, the edge of the box digging into his scalp, trying to think clearly as his heart began to pound more and more furiously. He could actually feel each distinct heartbeat thump in his chest.

He had to sacrifice the boy.

He lunged at the him, but the rascal danced out of the way with a hiss. Rouger would not be able to catch him with speed. Instead, he slowly shepherded the boy into a corner, blocking off all escape until he had nowhere to go. He finally caught the skinny whippet with a gleeful cry, and gave him a sharp rap to the head for his trouble.

Dragging him back to the manhole he fetched out a pair of irons that he kept for thieves at his shop and shackled the boy to his workbench. He had dropped the box in the scuffle and he looked around to retrieve it.

Suddenly, there was a loud knock on the front door of his shop and he cringed as a bolt of terror ripped through him. <i>Malkemists?  Already?</i> He met the boy's eyes. The idiot did not seem to understand the danger at all, or if he did, he was not showing it.  <i>Idiot!</i>

"Sirness, let me go!" the boy demanded.

Rouger ignored him. He grabbed the letter opener and paperweight from his workbench and rushed out of his workroom towards his shop, almost tripping in his haste. He sparked the lamp at the back of the shop to life and stowed the ill-gotten silver on a nearby shelf. He then hurried towards the front door before realising that he was still in his nightgown and sleeping cap. He backtracked in sweaty consternation to quickly change into his shop robes and goldsmith hat.

The door was being pounded with a lot more force now, and Rouger called out, beside himself.

"Wait, wait good Sirness, I'm coming!" he screeched, jowls wobbling.

There was silence as Rouger began pulling the iron bolts on the heavy wooden shopfront door. He took a moment with the last bolt to wonder if he really did want to open the door before throwing it back as well.

It was with some relief that he met the faces of two men from the city guard, their hats showing middling rank. Rouger almost smiled.

It turned out to be a horrible prank of happenstance, because just behind the two stood a tall man with the pointy black hat of a malkemist perched upon his head. His eyes were intense and unforgiving.

"Do you mind if we come in good Sirness?" asked the malkemist, not a sliver of a smile in his voice.

Rouger was struck dumb. He wanted to protest the hour, give some excuse, but instead he just stood there with his mouth open. The malkemist took his silence for consent and strode between the guardsmen, and would have stepped on Rouger if he had not given way at the last moment. Without further leave he strode boldly towards the back of the shop and with absolutely terrifying and unerring accuracy to the shelf that held the recently purloined silver.

"Seize him," spoke the malkemist like a death knell.

Rouger's legs gave out just as they grabbed him and the two burly guardsmen had some trouble keeping his bulk upright.

"Bring him, the rest is through here," called the malkemist, pointing to the workroom, his gaze on some device in his hand.

Rouger was recovering himself now, his mind railing against his cowardly constitution to pry survival from this terrible situation.

"I caught him. The thief. He's in my workroom," Rouger declared with some force.

The malkemist's gaze turned from whatever was in his hand to regard Rouger.

"Indeed," was all he said. He strode towards the workroom.

The two guardsmen had to half carry, half drag Rouger to the workroom, his legs simply were not working the way that they should. The sight that greeted him drove him to his knees.

The boy was gone.

It took several moments for Rouger to process what he was seeing.  The shackles hung limp from his workbench, almost invisible except that he was looking for them. The chocks and mallet were gone, as was the straw that he had thrown on the floor. For a crazy moment Rouger wondered if he had dreamed the boy's visit. Then the malkemist bent over and retrieved something from the floor. It was the wooden box. The malkemist thumbed it open.

His disappointment was palpable.

"Where is the crystal?" he asked, eyes boring into Rouger's.

Rouger did not know.

---

Jack moved as swiftly as he could through the putrid waters of the sewer. He had spent long hours with his feet soaking in these turbid flows and had developed his own very particular way of moving in the water to avoid splashing himself. He could have risen to the streets almost immediately after climbing down from Rouger's shop, but he felt safer in the sewer. He doubted the malkemists would pursue anyone down here.

The darkness within was almost complete. Occasionally a poorly sealed port would allow a shaft of light from the recently risen sun to break through the murk, but those were generally few and far between. He was mostly blind.

An intersecting tunnel yawned to his left, his ears telling him immediately as the noise of his own passing disappeared into the space, echoes vanishing. His skin registered the slight current of air that stirred around in the intersection. He was a master in this darkness. Anyone who wanted to find him down here would be using a torch or lantern and would be easy to avoid. His unseemly familiarity with these ways was natural given how his presence on the streets above was likely to provoke an unpleasant response from the city guard, whether he wore his best coat or not.

He only owned one coat.

An errant beam of light illuminated a small patch of stone ahead, recalling to Jack that the construction of this sewer had been the work of malkemists. Something to do with the mortar that bound the individual stones together and made it strong enough to support the earth, roads, and buildings above. Stine had explained it to him, but he had forgotten the important part he was sure. Remembering it at all made him uneasy. The malkemists must have come down here to oversee the work, perhaps they even had maps of these tunnels.

A plague of rats skittered and screeched somewhere ahead as Jack approached, but he did not bother to slow for their alarm. Rats were common down here. There was only one thing that found its way into these stony tunnels that could give Jack pause, save for the unexpected appearance of a malkemist, and they were much bigger than rats. Their growls and razor sharp teeth could set his bones shaking in his flesh. Jack would backtrack a long, long way, or wait for hours to avoid them.

Recalling their sharp, intelligent, and challenging eyes made him bare his own teeth in a feral display. He particularly hated the one chained outside Rat Tail's shop. Why the man thought it was a good idea to keep one so close, Jack had no idea. It could not be good for business. It would lunge aggressively at random passers-by and seemed to take special pleasure in tormenting Jack himself.  Still, it was chained and could be avoided. The ones that roamed the streets were lawless, staking out territory and only giving it away grudgingly. There were stories of them being so bold as to steal babies off the backs of their mothers. To meet one down here was the stuff of Jack's nightmares.

Shaking himself, Jack folded up the cuff of his left arm. It had been rubbing against the graze he had taken freeing himself from Rouger's manacles. He gave it a quick lick.

He was both lucky and unlucky that the water only made it halfway up his calf. Lucky because, frankly, the less that actually touched him, the better. Yet unlucky, because the stench was that much worse when the water level was low.

He felt a tingling surge of panic begin to sour his stomach, but he gritted his teeth and willed it back down. He told himself firmly that he could handle this. He would adjust and he would keep planning. Even if he had no help and no scrip or coin, he was still free to leave town. The trick would be surviving after that. He knew that he could not go to another town. What little he did know about the malkemists told him that if he did not get far enough away from the tracker, the tracker would run him down. If he went to another town, the tracker might visit and pick up his trail.  Thinking on it, he did not know how they had found him so quickly, but it lent credence to the stories he had heard of their skill.

He had no contacts outside of Corsisan. He had lived his entire life until recently in the shanty town. If he was to survive, he would have to find work in the country. He was clever enough to know that trying to steal in a place he was not familiar with would likely lead to disaster. He was a successful thief in Corsisan only because he always knew it better than anyone who set out to catch him. Anyone other than a malkemist that was. Malkemists did not need to bother themselves with knowing the streets better than him.  They were cheaters.

Jack stopped still for a moment, pondering the ill-luck that had dropped him into this dire situation. How was it that they could find him at all? The silver? The box? He had left them behind in Rouger's workroom. A chill spread up his spine and he grabbed the crystal through the cloth of his coat, tucked away snugly in an inner pocket. Could they follow the crystal? No. At least, he did not think the crystal was necessary for them to follow him, there must be a more foolproof way, since not everyone they tracked stole something from them. He toyed briefly with the idea of dropping the crystal right there and then in the urine and excrement laden water flowing past his calves.

No. He would need something to sell if he hoped to survive. With his mind made up he started moving again. He was close to the way out he had decided to use.

There were two large sewer exits that emptied into rough earthen channels in the shanty town, but it would be far too easy for the malkemists to nab him there. He would be like a pigeon in the sights of a slinger. As good as dead.

This was far better place, a quiet corner of the mud palaces.  There was even a well nearby he could wash up at, and from there he would make his way to the north road. The only problem was that there would be women taking water from the well, and they might chase him off.

As comfortable as he was in the dark, it was always a relief to be able to use his eyes again, and he was feeling the slight excitement of contact with the sun. A fleeting curl of the lip played at the edge of his mouth.

Suddenly, a low, bass growl filled the tunnel, setting off a terrible echo. A second growl joined the first. Both were soft sounds, but the menace was a clear as a bell.

Dogs. Jack hated dogs. But as much as he hated them, he feared them more. He could not see them in the dark, but they were close, and they were between him and his exit. He stepped backwards slowing and carefully, his tongue still prickling with shock, wondering if he should pull his knife, and if it would come to that.

Without warning a light flared to life behind him and Jack did something that he would not have thought himself capable of.

He turned his back on the dogs.

Flinging an arm up to protect his eyes against the glare, he squinted to make out who had sneaked up behind him.

Angrily his voice burst from him, "Who are you? What do you want?"

He was surprised at the lack of fear in his voice. Emboldened by the strength he heard there, he gathered his wits to bluff himself free.

With disgust and simmering anger, the holder of the light cut him off with a slightly muffled voice, "Shut up!"

Those two words would not have shut Jack up all by themselves, but the delivery chilled any desire he had to cross the speaker. That and the fact that the dogs had suddenly gone eerily silent.

"I swear, if you so much as kick up a droplet of this shit on me, you'll have no place to sit for a week." The disembodied male voice paused for a moment, "If you're thinking that's how you can get by me, forget it. If I have to, I'll swim through this to catch you. I won't like it, but I'll do it!"

The light source, Jack could not decide what it was, moved dizzyingly for a moment as the bearer transferred it from a hand to his chest somehow, giving Jack a quick glimpse of a bare, black-haired head and scarf covered face.

<i>Not a malkemist?</i> Jack thought.

There was a metallic jangle as the man continued, "It won't come to that will it? For one, you look like a smart kid. Second, Goss and Boss back there will pull you down quicker than a lightning strike.

"Those two are crazy," he groused, and then continued, to Jack's amazement, in an affectionate yet disgusted tone, "I think they actually like it down here."

Jack flicked his head back around long enough to catch a glimpse of two sets of very intent disembodied eyes glowing in the darkness, looking like anything but objects of affection.

The man held out something to Jack, and in a voice that had returned to its ill humour he instructed, "Clap those on kid."

When Jack did not immediately jump to obey, the man growled in eerie mimicry of his pets.

Distinctly and slowly he said, "Put them on. Or it will hurt."

Jack did as he had been told. Noticing with dread that these were much better shackles than the ones he had slipped in Rouger's workroom. These shackles held his hands close together at the front, and the man carefully turned Jack and encircled his waist with two extra chains that fastened at Jack's back; preventing him from lifting his arms from his waist.

Jack saw the two dogs clearly for the first time, and he took an involuntary step back only to collide with the man fastening his chains, earning him a painful push and tug.

They were monsters! Huge beasts with relentlessly intent and pitiless stares. Jack felt like a cornered hare, and imagined a challenge in their jutting postures.

<i>Run</i>, they urged. <i>Run. We'll give you a short lead friend.</i>

Jack smelled mint. He turned to beg the man to let him go. He would promise anything to be away from those dogs. He immediately felt a cool wet mist puff into his face that caused him to give a panicked cry and push away, only to fetch up short on the end of the chain that was now attached to the man.

"Hold still idiot!" The man punctuated his growl with a flick of knuckles to the side of Jack's head.

Jack got another puff of something to the face while he held his breath and then several more around his person.

"What—" Jack began before he caught the implacable eyes of his captor. The light shining brightly on his chest casting lurid shadows over his eyes sockets and brows. As Jack's eyes slid away from that gaze he noticed that the smell of mint was coming from the scarf over the man's face.

"Let's go," ordered his masked captor, swinging Jack back towards the way he had come with surprising care and gentleness. Ruined by the subsequent terse warning, "Don't kick anything up."

***

Jack had expected to be led above ground, but after the man extinguished his light, he prodded Jack through the sewers in darkness instead. He was not a talkative man, and the only communication since Jack's capture had been the odd warning growl whenever Jack's feet kicked up a splash.

Jack had heard nothing at all from the two giant beasts.

"We're here. Don't do anything stupid."

The light came back on, and Jack saw the hand and footholds that led to a porthole above. He stepped towards the first rung.

"Uh uh, you go last," said the man, pulling Jack up short with the chain attached to Jack's waist and manacles.

Jack stepped back to let the man through, taking the moment to look back for the dogs. They were gone. He swung his head around nervously, just in case they had circled around, but he caught no sight of them. They had vanished.

The chain connecting Jack to the man's waist was moving higher and higher as the man climbed up the footholds, and then Jack heard several dull thumps that sounded like the man's fist on the porthole cover above.

Moments passed. The man thumped again. Jack could almost hear a growl growing in the man, but before it could manifest, the porthole cover suddenly pulled away and real light rushed down into the sewer, forcing Jack to look away with a pained wince.

"Halme! You're late," came an unfamiliar male voice from above, the tone mocking, not angry.

"Shut yer face," replied Halme more or less conversationally, yet his rude response only elicited a nervous titter from the other man.

Jack forced himself to squint into the light, knowing that he had to keep his wits about him. If an opportunity to escape presented itself, he wanted to be able to see well enough to be able to take it. However, as he did so he began to notice the most incredible thing about his captor's boots and trousers. They were covered in some shiny, shimmering substance. Transparent and wobbly. It jiggled slightly each time Halme stepped to a new foothold. Jack's curiosity was intense.

<i>What is that?</i>

He was so fascinated that he began climbing the rungs himself without thinking. He was halfway up before he realised that the rungs under his hands were dry. Halme had not carried any of the sewer out with him. Jack looked down past his own rolled up trouser legs to confirm that his feet were wet.

They were definitely wet, and worse besides.

Halme was climbing out of the porthole already and Jack felt a tug on his chain. The links cracking him behind the ear as Halme used up all the slack.

"Hurry up!" Halme ordered.

Jack scurried up, the soft skin behind his ear smarting, and emerged squinting into a small private courtyard awash with daylight. The man standing besides Halme wore a malkemist's pointed black hat, but looked to be a shabby specimen of the type. Halme was half a head taller, and bore himself much more proudly, despite the fact that he had just crawled from a sewer.

Halme reached into his coat and withdrew a small glass ampule. He touched it to each jiggling mass encasing his legs and feet, and to Jack's astonishment, the mass was sucked in by the ampule. Within two heartbeats it was as though they had never existed. Halme replaced the ampule in his coat.

He then removed the scarf from his face, and Jack got his first look at the man who had captured him. The colour of his eyes looked funny somehow in the sunlight, in a way that Jack could not quite put his finger on. His skin was tan, and his black moustache, goatee, and narrow sideburns were sharp and immaculately groomed.

"Water," said Halme.

Jack was confused, but it was the malkemist who jumped to action, moving to the private well and casting a pail into its depths. Jack did a double take. These must be an extraordinarily wealthy people to have a well in a private enclosed courtyard. Jack turned to see the house. It was large and imposing, and fastidiously maintained.  The windows were glass, a rare extravagance. Even the royal apartments on the hill did not have glass windows installed throughout. He remembered the glass on the window of the lounge he stole from and kicked himself mentally. <i>Who else but malkemists or royalty could afford glass windows?</i>

The pail was dumped unceremoniously beside Jack, water sloshing over the sides, and Jack took to it tentatively, cupping water to rinse his legs below the knee.

"Catch!"

Jack looked up just in time to catch a fresh bar of soap. He sniffed at it suspiciously. He had seen soap before, just not so much of it, and none scented like this one. The rare worn down remnants he had used still smelled a little like the animal they came from. Nevertheless, he lathered his legs, losing the bar several times in the process. It might have disappeared down into the sewer, if not for the fact that Halme had knocked the porthole cover back into place moments before.

While Jack was rinsing soap from his legs, Halme reached into his coat and withdrew a compact wad of black cloth. He gave it a peculiar shake and in the next instant he had a malkemist's hat in hand. He gave it two ostentatious and quite unnecessary dustings before placing the pointed hat on his head.

Jack eyed him warily, though he had been almost completely sure he was a malkemist the moment he saw the jelly around his legs. Halme raised an eyebrow, but said nothing.

By the time Jack was clean, and most of the smell of the sewer gone, the less distinguished malkemist had disappeared inside the large house. Halme was quiet, but did not seem exceptionally put out or impatient in any way.

"Let's go," he said, gesturing in an unexpectedly cordial manner.

There was no use in struggling. Halme was a big man, and the chain between them was proof against any evasions that Jack might try, so he entered the house through the indicated open double door. Halme closed the door behind them, and then to Jack's surprise, unfastened his chains and shackles. Before Jack could think to take advantage, he was propelled through another door into a waiting audience.

Jack froze as soon as his feet came to rest. In front of him was a corpulent malkemist in a chair large enough to be a throne. The fat man radiated disgust and made annoyed shooing sounds and gestures towards Jack as soon as he caught his balance. It took Jack a few moments to realise that he was standing on a rug. He stepped off gingerly, trying to keep his eyes down.

"Keep your monkey off the expensive ones, soldier!" scolded the fat man.

"He's your monkey, Master Nuth, not mine. I just fetched him for you," replied Soldier Halme.

There was silence for a moment, and Jack risked a glance upwards to see Master Nuth glaring across the room at Halme. The sight reminded him of Sadel, and Jack decided that the man was dangerous straight away. The master's eyes rolled up and to the right theatrically, and he flicked his hand out into space as though ridding himself of some clinging morsel of food.

He demanded peevishly, "Well, does he have it?"

"He did," replied Halme unhelpfully. A few moments passed before he pulled something from his pocket in an unhurried manner and tossed it to the shabby malkemist from outside, who promptly threatened to drop it amid several sharply indrawn breaths.

"Oh by the Prime Imaginer, why I allow you to stay Malkum! Give it here now!" exclaimed the master in disgust.

"Yes sirness, sorry sirness," mumbled Malkum as he made his way to the master, almost tripping on the rug as he went. Jack heard a snigger from one of the other malkemists in the room, of which he counted only three that had not been introduced.

Jack himself was struggling to keep his mouth from gaping wide in slack-jawed shock. He had not felt Halme work him over, but obviously he had, and effectively. Feeling foolish, he pressed a surreptitious hand to his coat where his knife was usually slung, and discovered it was missing too. He blushed hotly.

The master's eyes glittered with avarice as he received the crystal into his fat fingered grasp. Though he remembered himself enough to wave Malkum off with irritation when the man remained to hover.

"It's beautiful," he gushed, seeming to lose himself in a moment of genuine pleasure. Yet his rapture was short lived, because his attention soon returned to Jack. He fixed the boy with a coyish look from beneath a lowered brow. The look may have worked for him in his youth, but the effect now was little short of disturbing.

"My rival would probably have your entrails out by now, stomping on them with petty relish! You've really quite lucky I found you first," he declared self indulgently. He directed his next question rhetorically to everyone in the room, "But what am I going to do with him?"

With barely a pause he answered himself, "You didn't steal from me.  And, truth be told, your escapades have enriched me to the detriment of my enemy. A most happy happenstance."

He smiled in a terribly self-satisfied way, like a man who has won a contest and knows that there will be no rematch to even the score.

"But," he continued, "what's the expression Pravil?"

He turned to the trio of malkemists to his right, seated by the long table, but did not wait for a response, "If you prick one, we all bleed?"

He chuckled, thinking it was a splendid joke, and indeed, there were several smirks.

Jack took the moment to shift his body slightly and turned to look at Halme behind him. The man's face was impassive, but Jack turned back without having taken special notice of his demeanour.

"Unfortunately, my hands as you no doubt see, are tied. I will do you to courtesy of making it quite clean and painless. You do deserve..." he never got to finish the thought.

Jack sprang backwards and collided with Halme, twisting into the man's grasp while his quick fingers worked the man's coat. Halme pushed him off almost immediately, but Jack did not mind at all.  As he spun free he raised a pilfered vial triumphantly into the air.

"Get back!" he screamed in warning. "Or I'll blow us all to hell!"

A stunned silence descended on the room. Not the fearful silence that Jack had expected, more a speculative silence, a weighing silence. Jack did not like it one bit. He had positioned himself on the rug, far enough from everyone else in the room that they could not possibly grab him before he cast the vial. No one seemed concerned that his feet were once more soiling the floor coverings.

"I said, I'll blow us all to hell!" reiterated Jack, in what he hoped was a clearer voice.

"Oh, we heard you boy. But what, exactly, do..." the master began.

Fate it seemed was not content to allow Master Nuth the opportunity to finish his sentences. An arm wrapped around Jack's chest and another grabbed at his raised arm. Convulsively he threw the vial down before it could be trapped. It sped from his hand, but at the same time Jack had plenty of time to appreciate that he was still not being taken seriously. With the vial released, the malkemists did not react with fear or panic. They were laughing. He used up the moment before impact wondering what it was they knew that he did not. That, and squeezing his eyes tightly shut.

Boom! It was a gloriously satisfying sound to Jack's ears. It was also an order of magnitude louder than he had expected. So loud, that he was momentarily struck dumb by it. He only barely heard the cry of alarm from the person holding him as he or she released him.  He felt multiple bites on his legs and arms, and as the thunder of the explosion itself receded a cacophony of raised voices and curses.

Jack opened his eyes on pandemonium.

Malkum, bless his subservient heart, had thrown himself selflessly over Master Nuth in an admirable attempt to shield the latter.  Unfortunately, it did not seem to have protected the master one jot, as his face had gotten in the way of the same biting stings that had landed on Jack's legs. One cut under his right eye looked particularly nasty. The master's initial surprise and pain were quickly giving way to annoyance and then anger as Malkum struggled ineffectually to get up and remove the burden of himself from his master.

Of the three malkemists by the long table, two were rolling around on the ground clutching at themselves, but the third was on his feet, encased from head to foot in the same substance Jack had seen Halme use in the sewer.

The rug was a disaster. A three foot circular section had been obliterated, revealing the stone floor, now streaked with what looked like white powder and surrounded by singed and blackened fibres.

The person who had grabbed Jack from behind turned out to be a woman, and she was staring in shock at the hole in the rug, uncaring of the droplets of blood that had begun to well through the cuts on her face and arms

Jack's gaze swung to Halme, only to find the soldier already watching him as he rose from a kneeling pose. He alone seemed unaffected by the explosion. They held each other's eye for several moments.

Jack tried anyway.

Jack had played this game with the town guards on several occasions. He would first run straight at them offering his arm as an easy target for capture. Then, when the guard tried to take hold of him by the arm, he would spin opposite the thumb of the grip and already be far enough beyond to be impossible to catch. Simple yet effective.

Halme did not take the arm, nor did he grab at Jack's coat. Jack could already see that things had gone pear-shaped, but he continued on by attempting to spin around Halme nonetheless, even though the man had not committed himself and was in no way unbalanced. The soldier simply stepped in at the last moment and took Jack around the waist. A moment of struggle later, and he had both of Jack's arms pinned to his sides.

Master Nuth had been cursing throughout, but his voice reached a crescendo as he rolled poor Malkem ignominiously to the floor with a thud.

"What the hell was in that vial Soldier Halme?!" Master Nuth demanded in an indecorous screech.

"Mint."

"What?! Talk sense man!"

"It was a simple scent. Mint."

"That's impossible! Did you confuse your store?" queried Nuth, his tone implying the worst of anyone who could do such a thing.

But Halme was equanimous in the face of the accusation, "No, I just finished using it. It was the scent of mint. The vill was distinctive. I recognised it in the boy's hand.

Voices had begun to call out from other parts of the house and footsteps were pounding down the hall. Faces appeared at the door, taking in the ruin of the rug and the general disorder. Master Nuth subsided back into his gigantic chair with an equally gigantic huff.

He gestured in mild disgust at his rug with an open hand, but the best he could articulate was a meaningless expletive, "Urgh!"

"Varlay, get him out of here." said Master Nuth, but after a moment he continued more specifically, "Put him in the holding room. And keep him chained. I need to consider this."

Halme simply nodded and manhandled Jack through the gathering spectators, his hands like bands of steel around Jack's upper arms.

***

The soldier marched Jack to his cell and propelled him into the room before locking the door with a thrown bolt from the outside.  Jack managed to keep his feet.

Jack was alone, and he was also unchained. This puzzled him, but since the lone window was a series of slats that only let light and air into the room, and the door was locked, he saw little advantage.

Jack almost laughed when he took stock of his situation more thoroughly and realised that a holding room for a malkemist meant the height of luxury for him. There was a bed with actual feathers, a chair, and desk. A basin of water had been hauled to the room and there was a refuse bucket. Without the threat of death hanging over his head, he would have been thanking his lucky stars.

Snot and Hat would be wondering where he had gotten to by now, since he was usually back to their room long before they went out to beg, but they would not think it too strange. It would be when he did not show up before sunset that everyone would start to worry. Jack had never failed to come home. They would be right to worry.

A sudden thought struck him. What if Stine went to Marten to see if he had any word of Jack? Would Marten have any reason to land Stine in hot water? He just hoped that they worried quietly among themselves rather than trying to track him down.

There was nothing that Jack could do at present, so he washed his face and curled up on the bed. At first the softness disconcerted him and he felt mildly anxious about being swallowed by its soft folds. He imagined telling Snot and Hat about such a bed, a bed big enough for all three of them to sleep on. He smiled thinking about it. The very next thing he knew there was a scrape, followed by the door closing and the clunk of the bolt being locked once more. Jack was up in a moment, bleary-eyed, only to see that a tray of food had been deposited by the door.

He realised that he must have slept afterall, and from the sunlight streaming through the slats of his window, well past midday. Padding to the door he fell upon the tray with ravenous delight. Freshly baked bread, a slice of cheese, and lentil soup.  He scarfed down the fare as quickly as he could get it into his mouth, which led quite quickly to a painful block in his oesophagus. He cleared it by forcing it down with some water and then ate more slowly. He finished the entire tray while squatting in front of the door.

Satiated, he washed his face and went back to the bed. As he lay there pondering how he might get used to a bed like this, he fell asleep yet again.

***

Jack was running, running from yowls and yaps that persued him down endless lengths of stone tunnel. Strangely he could see each grey stone perfectly and the redish-brown mortar that helped the tunnel forbid the crushing weight of the earth above. The floor of the tunnel was completely bare and clean. Not a drop of water lay on the ground, yet he still felt like his legs were dragging through a thick liquid. The dogs behind him were gaining ground every moment, their noisy pursuit growing louder and louder. The closer they drew, the harder it was to run. Soon, he had slowed so badly that he was barely moving forward at all and panic gripped his heart. No matter how hard he pushed his feet, he could not make them move faster; he could barely make them move at all. His legs began to ache with the effort it took to drive them forward. That's when he saw the malkemist ahead, tall and dark. While everything else was bright and clear, the malkemist was shrouded in shadow, his face hidden.

With a flick of the wrist the malkemist struck Jack with a well-aimed globule of liquid. It hit his sternum and spread like wildfire around his body, encasing his legs and feet in the same thick and jiggling liquid he had seen on the soldier Halme. It did not stop there though. Instead, it climbed to his neck and then cascaded down his arms, immobilising every muscle it touched. It slithered its slow way up his neck, cool and slimey to the touch.  It covered his ears, his lower jaw, and mounted the back of his neck to finally cover every strand of hair on his head.

Then, as Jack's heart beat harder and harder in his chest, and the baying of the dogs reached a cresendo that he could hear even through the liquid over his ears, he opened his mouth to scream. As though waiting for just that signal to pounce, the liquid rushed in and smothered him, cutting off his breath. He struggled and pushed, but his muscles would not move. His eyes could not even open against the slime over his face. It was going to smother him to death and no one would know how he had died.

***

Jack's eyes flew opened in darkness and he struggled to draw breath, but air would not enter his mouth or nose. A great weight pressed down on his body, and though he struggled, he could not sit up against it.

He felt something shift on his face, and suddenly he could breath through his nose again; just barely. Through the last vestiges of sleep and the panic of suffocation, his brain recognized the scent of mint as air thundered in and out of his nose.

"Shh. I'm taking you out, but you'll need to be quiet. Swallow if you understand," spoke a calm quiet voice very close to Jack's ear.

Jack dutifully swallowed, and was rewarded with the slow withdrawal of the meaty palm that had been covering his mouth, and then the man's body. Jack could not help taking a thorough deep breath that stretched his chest. Unsurprisingly, he was wide awake.

"Stay close to me and I can guarantee that you'll live through the next two days at least, but I'll need you to want to live," whispered Halme.

Jack nodded stupidly in the semi-dark, noticing that the sun had set and precious little light was coming in through the window. He was about to grunt in acknowledgment when Halme continued.

"Good. We should get going then."

Jack could only puzzle briefly over how Halme could see him in the gloom because the man was already at the door and inching it open.  Light streamed in from outside and silhouetted Halme as he quickly checked that no one was in the hall outside. Jack was by him in a moment.

"Are we going into the sewer again?" Jack asked in a whisper.

Halme rolled his eyes in exasperation and fixed Jack with an intense look.

"First, keep your mouth shut," he answered in a whisper that was louder than Jack's own, "and second, no, we won't be going into the sewer."

This malkemist was irritatingly arrogant and Jack felt the impulse to show him up somehow.

"You going to put me in shackles?" Jack asked insolently.

"What? No!" whispered back the soldier, "I'm here to get you out, how would shackles help numbskull?!"

He noticed how close Jack was to him suddenly and hissed, "Stay away from my coat, the next time you pull a vill from me it'll be with broken fingers."

"The next time I pull a..." Jack retorted, but Halme had already crept too far down the hall for him to hear, forcing Jack to swallow the retort while he rushed to keep up. He noticed with an uncomfortable stirring of respect that Halme moved very quietly. He would make an excellent thief.

The sentiment faded somewhat when he realised that Halme basically intended to walk out the way they had come in. At each footfall he expected an alarm to be raised, or their way blocked by a bevy of malkemists. By the time they were within yards of the double doors to the rear courtyard, Jack was scratching at hives and thinking that everything was going far too smoothly. It could not be so simple. He felt disaster practically breathing down his neck.

They slipped out the back door and walked across the courtyard to the large gate that guarded the back wall of the house. There was a small post built into the wall, and within, a guard. At last, Halme's plan was going to hit a snag.

But as they walked boldly up to the guard post, it became quite obvious that the guard was soundly asleep. Jack almost snorted in disgust. Halme gave the oblivious guard a smart salute and let himself out the back gate. He then gave Jack a sweeping bow and flourish as he exited the postern, the type that might be reserved for a visiting noble. Jack frowned furiously at the mockery, his cheeks heating, but fortunately he was much more concerned about the rider in the alley to take it too much to heart.

Halme signalled the rider to approach, then turned to Jack and said in a voice completely devoid of remorse, "I'm sorry about this my boy."

He sprayed Jack square in the face with the same mist he had used down in the sewers. The treatment followed almost exactly the same pattern as before.

Jack snorted angrily, which only caused Halme to chuckle.

"What was that for?!" Jack demanded in a whisper.

"Sorry, no time for questions, we have to get going," Halme harried.  "You will have to ride with me."

Jack opened his mouth to protest, but Halme scooped him up by the waist and one leg and threw him bodily upon the horse as the waiting rider trotted up with her. There was no leather saddle, as was common for most mounts that Jack had seen, just a riding blanket. Jack noticed that the hooves of the horses were curiously muffled. Halme was up behind Jack in a moment. The other rider released the reins of his horse and rode on ahead.

Jack squeezed his legs and held on for dear life. He had never been this close to a horse before, let alone touching or riding one.  Even at a walk, Jack could feel the terrifying power of the creature.

Then, after some subtle urging by Halme, it began to trot and the true torture began. He braced his hands in terrified rigour over the horse's withers, and at each jarring pace he had to tense his legs and arms to avoid being sawn in half. Or at least, that is how it felt. Within a few minutes he was exhausted.

He certainly had no resources left over to determine where they were going, though he was desperately interested in knowing.  Halme would occasionally jostle him back to centre when he threatened to slide off either side.

To Jack's immense relief the ride was short. In the end, they pulled into a stable that was ready and waiting for them, and the stable doors closed smoothly on their heels. Jack had completely failed to gain his bearings.

He tried to throw himself off the horse almost immediately, but Halme kept him in his seat, such as it was, until he himself had slid off. When Jack finally made the ground, his legs could hardly support him. He found the way Halme was smiling at him almost intolerable. His scowl was at risk of becoming permanent.

"Follow me, you should meet your rescuer," Halme said to Jack, and then to their fellow rider, "Are you coming up Melanie?"

Jack started slightly at discovering the other rider was a woman.  She had ridden the entire way with reckless speed. Jack concluded that she must be an extraordinarily bold and fearless woman to be effecting escapes from malkemist compounds.

"No, I'll talk to him later."

"Varlay," replied Halme amicably.

"After you urchin," he said to Jack, indicating for Jack to go in first.

From the stable they passed through a narrow corridor of stone into a large kitchen. The smells coming from an equally large stove were heavenly, but Halme seemed to have no interest in the food.  From the kitchen, they entered a large foyer. Jack eyed the front door, but followed Halme's lead when he pointed to the staircase.  Jack's legs complained on the stairs, burning in uncomfortable places with each step. However his physical discomfort was completely forgotten when he reached the landing. Scalp tingling, the distinctive smell hit him as he stared down the hall.

He knew this hallway. He had been here only last night. The wall-mounted lamp glowed merrily, as though welcoming him back.

Halme rested a gentle hand on Jack's shoulder.

"In you go," he said, gesturing to the loung on the right.

"You tricked me!" Jack hissed emphatically, feeling shocked and betrayed.

"I tricked a lot of people today, but relax, I think I left you out. This doesn't mean what you're thinking it means."

He tried to pat Jack's shoulder, but Jack pulled back sharply.  Halme snorted in amusement.

"In you go," he repeated, an edge of the implacable in his voice.

Jack entered the study more ashamed than scared. He had been outmanoeuvred on a grand scale and thoroughly thrashed on his home turf. He heard Halme follow him in and close the door, but Jack could not lift his eyes from the floor.

"He seems more bashful than I expected," opined an unfamiliar voice.

"Never fear, he has his moments," replied Halme.

"The plith crystal?"

"Here," Halme affirmed, moving forward.

Jack snuck a peek from beneath his lowered brow as Halme deposited the crystal in the other man's hand. He was a little taller than Halme.

"That's wonderful," he said with obvious relief, "perfect."

Halme went and sat in a plush chair by one of the bookcases. He nonchalantly knocked his knuckles against the top of a small end table by the chair and a hidden platform rose into view, filled with crystal glassware and a whiskey decanting stand.

A solid silver decanting stand.

The soldier caught Jack's eye with a crass lack of tact and idly stroked the silverware with a knowing smirk before pouring himself off some refreshment.

Jack was so engrossed that he missed some of what the tall man was saying.

"... of what you saw?"

"Absolutely Master Amoth, there's no mistaking what happened. The only question is why," replied Halme.

Master Amoth considered Jack, and then asked "Well Jack, what do you think happened?

"Of course I know your name," he said, responding to Jack's look of surprise, "Your goldsmithing friend was hardly the soul of discretion."

"I don't know what you're talking about," Jack said.

"You don't remember setting off a rapid expander under Master Nuth's nose?"

"Oh, you mean the boom?"

Amoth smiled, "What a quaint vernacular. Yes, the boom."

Jack shugged, "I just threw it."

Master Amoth shared a look with Halme, then turned back in time to see Jack eyeing the window.

"You'll excuse me if I took the precaution of locking the window," he smiled wryly, "it was an impressive jump, but I do not want to see it repeated."

Jack examined the floor instead.

"Do you have someone who can send him up-country?" asked Halme.

Amoth looked up sharply, "You can't do it?"

"I didn't reveal myself to the Reds. I will go back tonight."

"Really?! That's good news! You're much more valuable there. But how did you manage it?"

Halme grinned, "I set a rapid expander in the boy's window slats. A boom. They'll be thinking you tracked him with your terrifying powers and plucked him from their holding cell. The dummy plith should have dissolved by now too, so that'll be another mystery for them."

The tall man laughed delightedly.

"I want to go home," said Jack softly, as the laughter settled down.

The two men shared another meaningful glance.

"There's a couple of reasons you can't go back for now Jack," explained Master Amoth. "For one, Master Nuth will pick up your trace as soon as the masking villend wears off, and I don't see him forgetting about you in a hurry. Second ..."

"The masking what?" Jack interrupted.

Master Amoth took a deep and slightly unsteady breath, as though gathering himself to make a complex or possibly duplicitous explanation, but Soldier Halme beat him to it.

"Come here lad," he beckoned conspiratorially, his eyes earnest.

Jack approached hesitantly, his eyes on the soldier's coat lining as he opened it.

"Closer, closer," he urged, opening the coat some more and...  spraying him full in the face with the same liquid he had used on Jack twice already.

Jack snorted in annoyance and backed off quickly, glaring at the soldier.

Halme shrugged off Jack's indignation and smiled smugly, "Well, you asked. That's masking villend. It obscures the signature of a person or object that a tracking villend uses to find them.  Unfortunately, the mask only works for a couple of hours. Half a day at most."

"Obviously," elaborated Amoth, "we cannot let Nuth get his chubby and ill-bred fingers on you, so we'll send you to a safe place to lie low. You can't risk telling anyone that we are getting you out of town, because it would place them in danger. Imagine what might happen to them if they spoke that kind of thing into the wrong ear."

Master Amoth waited for acknowledgement from Jack before he continued. Jack nodded slowly.

"I will organise transport and protection for you to get to safety. Not even Master Nuth would dare pursue you where I'm sending you."

"Why are you helping me?" asked Jack, "I stole from you."

"Well, technically, you only borrowed from me, as I have recovered everything that you took. Other than that, you can consider it my great pleasure to thwart any ardent desire of the reprobate Master Nuth," answered Master Amoth, though Jack noticed that he answering nothing at all.

Halme climbed out of his plush chair suddenly and bid Master Amoth goodnight.

"No game?" asked Master Amoth, eyes eager.

"No, I don't have time," Halme replied with regret.

Winking at Jack, he was almost out the door before Master Amoth called out for him to send Emily up.

When Emily, a petite woman in a brown dress, poked her head around the door a minute later, Master Amoth waved her in.

"Emily, meet Jack. Jack, Emily," he introduced efficiently. "Emily will settle you in Jack."

It was a dismissal.

Emily wasted no time leading Jack out, but as the door closed, Master Amoth called through the narrowing gap.

"Remember what I said Jack. Contacting anyone you know will put them in grave danger."

"This way, Jack," Emily instructed, descending the stairs. "Would you like a bath?"

Jack shook his head vigourously, all the while wondering when the best time to slip out of the house would present itself.

"Varley, relax," she reassured, though somewhat disgustedly, "it's your choice.

"I'll introduce you to Minnie first, then show you to your room. I don't know you, so I'm going to warn you straight up, whether you need it or not. Don't talk back to Minnie, even if you think she's saying the craziest bobble you've ever heard," she paused a moment, "Master Amoth himself doesn't correct Minnie or tell her what to do, understood?"

Jack just nodded.

He almost took an involuntary step backwards when he caught sight of Minnie. She was the largest woman he had ever seen. She had her back to them as they entered, and though she was on the other side of a large bench, he still had trouble shaking the impression of physical menace. Jack was used to almost everyone he interacted with being bigger than him, but this was different. For several moments he tried to imagine that he had somehow missed the sight of her as he passed through the kitchen earlier. He quickly convinced himself that such a thing was impossible.

"Minnie, I have another mouth for you to feed," Emily called.

Minnie looked over her shoulder with the distracted air of someone who was concentrating and just wants the peace to continue doing so.

"Wait," she called back in a deep and husky voice that still managed to sound feminine.

Moments later she swung around and fixed her eyes on Jack, and the first words out of her mouth were, "What is it?"

Emily tried to answer, but Minnie was answering her questions for herself.

"A dirty street rat! Why is it in my beautiful kitchen? Who thought it was a good idea to bring this filth into my kitchen? Ah, that Master Amoth, that's who. Never a care for putting me out that one."

Seeing Jack's mounting terror, she continued.

"I'm sure it isn't your fault poor one, you're likely an innocent in all of this. It's Master Amoth's doing for sure. Minnie could I have duck tonight? Minnie, why can't I eat your orange flan out of season? Minnie, feed my guests at odd hours? And now this! A filthy beggar in my kitchen. No offense my boy. It's too much! I have the want to march right up those stairs and give him a piece of my mind! But then, that wouldn't solve the problem of this dirty rat in my kitchen would it? No. It'd probably just make it worse!  That's what I'm thinking. He's gone and dumped this problem in my lap like it's my job to clean every filthy thing that traipses into this house. I never had this trouble with his father. That was a respectful and gentle sirness if ever there was one."

Minnie kept going. There was little in the way of pause as she moved around the room punctuating her more forceful points with thrusts of the ladle in her hand. She pulled a brass banded tub, which looked to be at least double Jack's weight from the wall with not so much as a feigned grunt for Jack's peace of mind.

"I was boiling this water for something else, but I see I have to sacrifice it for the greater good now," she sighed.

She pulled a large pot from the stove and swung it with uncanny dexterity from side to side as she walked it across the room to the tub. She emptied all forty odd lits into the tub, then scooped more from a standing reservoir in the corner.

She tested the water with a sausage-like finger.

"Good enough. Now for the salts."

She fetched a small wooden barrel and threw a handful of white powder into the water, then repeated this from another barrel.

She advanced on Jack ominously. He looked around for support from Emily, only to realise that Emily had left the room and closed the door to the foyer behind her. Jack decided to dodge a moment too late.

Minnie's powerful right hand caught Jack by the scruff of the neck and he became as compliant as a bunny within the blink of an eye.  She flicked his hat off, stripped him of his coat, and made similarly short work of his trousers and shirt. Minnie's monologue did not falter throughout.

"... you go, just as nature intended..."

She dropped him bodily into the tub and he yowled in anguish as the hot water scalded his skin. He tried to rise, but she just forced him back into the water.

"... best keep your complaints to yourself..."

She took to him with a boar bristle brush from nowhere. The boar must have been a monster, because each stroke threatened to tear skin off. He mewled piteously, but Minnie was pitiless and merciless in the face of his torment.

When she scrubbed behind his ear, he tried to fend off the sharp bristles, but that only earned him a painful crack to the head with the wooden backside. Jack quickly decided that the next time he tried to thwart Minnie he would be at a much safer distance.

"... lovely shade of pink you've come up..."

She repeatedly pushed his head under the water while he panicked, yet he dared not resist. Once his hair was clean, she rubbed oiled fingers through his hair roughly, then brushed it through with a fine silver comb.  Once it was unknotted, she trimmed his hair with quick deft cuts of a pair of scissors that seemed to have materialised out of nowhere. A literal first for Jack, who had only ever had his hair hacked off with a knife.

"Out you jump," she ordered.

Emily was back, but Jack was not bashful about being naked in front of anyone. She was holding up pants and a shirt made of the same material. They looked nowhere near as sturdy as his own beloved clothing, lying discarded on the wet floor.

"Pyjamas!" exclaimed Emily, "A little big, but we can shorten the legs and arms."

Minnie was using a brass scraper she called a strigil to slough off the water that clung to his body, and then began toweling Jack dry as gently as she was able, which is to say, not gently at all. In one final indignity she puffed scented powder in his face, behind his ears, and between his toes, before releasing him to climb into the flimsy baby-blue pyjamas.

While Emily fussed at his cuffs, pinning the hems of his pants so that the new hem hung just above his heel, he was forced to admit to himself that he smelled quite nice.

"... whip you up something to eat."

Then something extraordinary happened. Minnie stopped speaking. At the stove she was as silent as the grave, but Jack had no time to puzzle over the change because Emily demanded most of his attention.

"Sit down and I'll finish this off for now with a basting stitch so you're not tripping over yourself," Emily offered.

Jack sat on a stool by the central bench and watched in fascination as Emily threaded a needle with deft movements. She then knotted the thread and clipped the small excess with a tiny pair of shears.

Kneeling by his leg, she poked the needle from the inside to the outside and pulled the thread through until it caught on the knot.  Then with quick, economical movements, she ran the needle through four or five folds of the material at a time before pulling the thread through to reveal multiple, near perfect stitches.

As she worked, her cool hands incidentally bumped the sensitive skin on the top of Jack's feet. Sometimes a light brush, at others a rougher contact. All the while Jack stared down in mute fascination, his head cocked bird-like to the side. A strange feeling was growing somewhere between his belly button and his nipples, a place where he was only used to feeling stabs of anxiety and panic. It spread like a dull warm glow from his centre and infused every limb. He imagined blue butterflies perched delicately on the two twists of hair she kept at the sides of her head to keep it up and out of her face.

He was completely infatuated with her by the time she finished the second hem.

Minnie slid a wooden tray across the bench to Jack. It held a bowl of soup and two thick slices of bread.

"Butter?" queried Minnie.

"Butter?" Jack repeated dumbly.

"Yes, Butter. Do you want butter?"

"I guess."

"I guess what?" challenged Minnie crossly.

"I guess... so?" replied Jack in confusion.

"Please! Say please!"

"Please," Jack said promptly.

Minnie seemed poorly satisfied, but she quickly conjured up two slabs of pale yellow something, which Jack naturally assumed must be butter, and deposited on the lightly toasted bread.

Jack, never a fussy eater, bit down on the bread and butter, and was rewarded by the best tasting bread he had ever eaten. The slightly salty butter, with its satisfying fatty texture completed the bread in a way that exceeded his narrow expectations of bread.

"No! No! No! That's no way to eat. I didn't clean you up so you could eat like a pig at a trough. You're going to soil those nice pyjamas Miss Emily went to the trouble of getting for you. You're making me regret not drowning your sorry butt in the tub. Eat like a gentleman, or there will ..."

Minnie kept going, but Jack had stopped eating. He put his hands at his sides and just sat there; a torn but unchewed piece of bread poking out from the side of his mouth.

"... there is no need to stop eating boy, just eat slowly. I've never seen a child eat like ..."

Jack ventured a slow bite at the bread that was already in his mouth, then another with his hands still by his sides.

"... with your mouth open, do you think anyone here wants to see what's going on in your stomach? Close your yapper when you chew. I will slap the uncouth out of ..."

He closed his mouth and swallowed. Hesitantly he reached for another piece of bread.

"... the soup first boy! You can't finish the bread before you've even tasted the soup. Here take this spoon and ..."

Minnie took the solid silver spoon from the side of the tray, polished it absently with her apron, and skimmed some soup; scooping from front to back.

"... the way to eat soup ..."

She then put it to Jack's lips to sip. Jack's tongue reacted in ways that he could not understand for a moment.

It was tingling with pleasure!

"... your turn. Mind you don't spill it on yourself. Sip over the bowl, not your lap..."

Jack took the proffered spoon and scooped and sipped as he had been shown. It was frustrating, but the taste more than made it worth his while.

"Here, drink your kefir," said Minnie, pushing a crystal glass his way, filled with what looked like milk.

Milk was a very rare treat for Jack, so he reached for it immediately. He jerked in surprise as the taste of the kefir filled his mouth, sour and clean. Though he had been expecting the mild taste of milk, this new taste grew on him quickly.

Emily had a big smile on her face as she watched Minnie alternatively scold and instruct Jack in the niceties of tableside ettiquette. For some reason, that made it much more enjoyable for Jack. He was not smiling, but he was not miserable either. He had just eaten some of the fatty duck in the soup and was honestly wondering how anyone could make food taste so delicious.

"... now comes the best part, and certainly it will appeal to your natural inclination. Dip the bread into the soup and eat it like..."

Jack did as instructed, though he had certainly mastered this skill long ago. Minnie kept talking. She seemed not to stop when she was excited. Within a short span the meal was finished, and Minnie prompted him for, and got, a "thank you."

Jack yawned mightily.

"... cover your mouth when you..."

He nodded sleepily.

"Varlay Jack, I think it's time to show you to your bed. Goodnight Minnie," said Emily.

Jack was so sleepy that he did not even try to palm the silverware as Emily urged him out of his seat. Nor did he hear anything else that Minnie may have said. A part of his awareness told him that he should not be so sleepy, since he had slept most of the day away, but the rest of him did not care. In short order he was in a bed even more luxurious than the one he had slept in during the day.  Emily had made him wash his hands and wash his mouth out with salty water, and then tucked him into a bed with actual sheets and a blanket.

***

He dreamed of unexpected puffs of wet mist in his face.

***

Jack woke to the sensation of falling a bare instant before he hit the floor with a thud. It took him several moments to remember exactly where he was, and even then he could only narrow it down to the malkemist's home. He did not remember going to sleep very clearly at all. More embarrassed than hurt, he was just thankful that no one was around to see him struggle to kick himself free of his tangled blanket.

The bed that he had just fallen from was suspended on a frame a little higher than his knee, which in light of what had just happened, he did not think was a particularly inspired design.

As he stood up he realised two things. First, that there was light streaming through the slats of the shuttered window, telling him that he had slept unusually long. And second, that he really needed to pee.

He looked around the room for the bucket that should be there for the purpose. There was no bucket. In the mudbrick palaces, he used a dilapidated pail that was always threatening to fall apart and escape its lowly role, but which never actually gave up the ghost.  In the shanty town he had done his business directly into an open air latrine from a rickety platform suspended above the quagmire on thin poles.

Here, there was nothing. It seemed that while his other circumstances were slowly improving, this particular aspect was deteriorating. A latrine was no work for him, while a bucket meant work, as he was generally the one who had to empty it. Now he could not go at all. Surely, malkemists had a better way.

He hurriedly opened the door and stepped out. Fortunately, he recognised the foyer from there and immediately rushed to the kitchen. Minnie looked up as he entered. He jiggled up-and-down and from side-to-side, completely discarding his dignity, and was rewarded with a vague gesture towards the stables.

He rushed down the short connecting corridor and noticed another door that he had not seen on his way into the house. It seemed like a much more likely place to keep a latrine than a stable, so he took it, and was relieved that it led outside into a relatively narrow courtyard, only a dozen feet wide, but three times as long.  There was a raised flower bed by the side of the house, a pile of refuse, a tiny wooden house at the far end, and a well by the door.  But nowhere could he see what he needed. In the end, and in desperation, he stepped up on the low stone wall of the raised bed and whizzed among some pretty yellow flowers. His relief was intense.

"I wouldn't let Minnie catch you doing that. Those are her flowers," said Master Amoth, as he exited from the tiny house at the end of the courtyard. Jack froze.

"The toilet is free," he said, thumbing over his shoulder at the tiny house as he passed Jack by.

Jack finished up uneasily. He decided he would investigate what this "toilet" was later.

Back in the kitchen Minnie turned on him immediately, "Wash your hands! Goodness knows what you touched"

To Jack's surprise, those words were not the beginning of a tirade.  She was busy beating at something in a bowl, and it seems to consume all of her concentration. He vaguely remembered the basin at which he had washed his hands the night before and used it.

He approached the stool, but before he could sit, Minnie ordered him off to fetch water and pushed a pail into his arms.

It took him over twenty pulls at the well to fill the kitchen reservoir, but it was relatively easy work, since his hands were already toughened and callused from similar work.

When he finished, Minnie served him up a delicious breakfast of buttered toast and fried eggs that he demolished in short order, along with a condiment that Minnie called her special chutney. He was used to watered porridge for breakfast, sometimes more water than porridge, and he decided that he could get used to this new fare quite quickly. Although he did spare a thought for Snot and Hat, who were no doubt eating porridge and worrying about him to boot. Snot would be worrying anyway.

He was so impressed that he even asked Minnie if she had any other chores. It was an ill-fated question, as it soon became apparent that Minnie had very many chores that could be assigned to his idle hands. He ended up minding simmering pots, beating butter from cream, and washing dishes among other tasks.

Sometime after his breakfast, Melanie came in and told him that she would be applying the masking villend, ironically none of it needed to be sprayed in his face. It was a welcome change to be told before someone sprayed something on him, and he found himself looking forward to the next one. He did not after all, cherish the idea of facing Master Nuth again.

Several people he had not yet met came to the kitchen throughout the morning. Most were malkemists of different stripes, usually passing through before or after meeting with the master. Their reputation was so fearsome that Jack could not control the instinctive cower that overcome him every time he saw a black malkemist's hat.

He also met Alfred, the only servant he had been yet to meet. He was a tall bald man with wispy strands of ginger hair poking out from the sides of his head. After he left, Jack asked Emily about him, and he learned that he cared for the horses in the stable, as well as the carriage and tack. This meant that he was often out gathering feed or exercising the horses. Emily did not say so directly, but Jack got the impression that he also ran errands for the master.

After lunch—a meal that Jack, until the very moment it was called, had not known existed—Emily pulled him out of the kitchen to help her with folding laundry and making beds. Initially, Jack was excited to learn that the house employed the city washers to wash the laundry, but when the laundry delivery came, the washer woman was unknown to him.

He had never made beds before, so of course he made a complete hash of it. Emily often had to redo his side of the affair. She did not complain though, which made Jack more determined each time to do a better job.

Jack did all of these chores in his pyjamas. His former clothes had disappeared without a trace, which upset him somewhat, since his coat was his most dearly cherished possession. It was old, it was worn, but at one stage it had been a very sharp coat. Jack loved it for the glamour it had once bestowed on its owner. Though that owner had never been Jack.

Like a bad penny Jack was passed from house servant to house servant, and in the afternoon Alfred took over as his nanny. One thing that Alfred taught Jack almost immediately, since he had been too embarrassed to ask either Minnie or Emily, was how to use the toilet. Jack had already looked inside the tiny house at the end of the courtyard, but the little white throne made absolutely no sense to him.

Alfred laughed heartily to hear Jack's confusion.

"You want to know how to use the toilet?" asked Alfred, his eyes crinkled with good-natured mirth.

Jack shrugged his shoulders and gave a lop-sided nod to indicate that that was of course what he wanted.

"Well, let's go to the outhouse, and I'll show you what's what," said Alfred with a smile.

"I what? Where?" Jack asked incredulously after the explanation.

"You lift the lid and poo in there!" Alfred indicated emphatically.

"In that? It's too pretty to shit in," Jack complained.

"Yeah, it's a pretty place for it. But that's what it's for. After that you can wash yourself with the water in the basin here. Don't go squatting on the seat like a monkey, Minnie will find you out for sure, and I can't imagine she would be any gentler with you than the last person who tried to pull that. Let me save you that lecture, cause she'll just say 'your feet belong on the ground, not on the seat!' You know I'm giving you the short and sweet version.

“You know how to wash your own butt I presume?" he asked, indicating the water.

Jack nodded, though he had no idea at all. <i>With water? What for?</i>

"What is this for?" Jack asked, pointing to some soap suspended from a rope.

"To wash your hands afterwards of course. Don't let Minnie catch you skipping that step, she's a sharp woman. She'll know. Let's get back to the stables, I'm sure you can figure all this out for yourself."

There were three horses in the stable. Each, Jack was assured by Alfred, was a credit to the breed, and Jack had to admit that they were very beautiful and majestic animals.

He had ridden a horse just like them the night before, but had not really had the chance to appreciate one face to face. Only rich people rode, and Jack had lost count of the number of times he had been shooed or cursed at to make way for a passing horse, or to simply get away from one.

Feeding them hay as they hung their heads over the highest plank of their enclosure was mesmerising for Jack. Alfred had to stop him from overfeeding them in the end.

"That's enough of the sweet hay lad. Too much of that everyday and you'll make them sick. They have roughage there to satisfy them."

Alfred moved into a stall with a large chestnut-brown horse with a splash of white on its forehead, and began rubbing her down with his bare hands.

"Pass me the dandy brush lad," called Alfred, "the one with the boar bristles."

Jack quickly picked up a brush and was about to pass it when he realised that the bristles were rice stalks, but before he could fix his mistake, Alfred called out again.

"Not that one, the soft one."

Jack rushed to correct the blunder, practically launching himself up the rails of the stall to pass the correct brush. The horse, not expecting the sudden movement, shied backwards with its haunches falling. Alfred seemed to take the violent reaction of the large creature in his stride, keeping a firm and calming hand on the horse's shoulder as it recovered, shushing and cooing throughout.

"Gently Jack, they aren't dogs," he admonished when the chestnut had settled.

Alfred made quick work of the rub down, explaining that the horses had not been ridden today, so there was little to be done. He showed Jack how to pick up the front hooves by running his hand down the back of her leg. He then did something similar for the rear hooves. He lifted each hoof twice. Once to remove any dirt, mud, or stones from the hoof with a pick while checking that the shoe was secure, and once again to give the outer hoof a quick buff and shine. Jack watched it all intently.

The clack of hooves in the alley drew Alfred to the door. He sighted through a hole in the wall for a moment, and then quickly swung the stable door open. Moments later two malkemists, ducking under the lintel, rode into the stable and dismounted. One pointed hat hit the lintel, deformed briefly, and then sprang back into its original shape.

Both riders dismounted and strode purposefully from the stable in the direction of the kitchen with serious expressions, wasting no time with talk, except to tell Alfred that they would be leaving again within the hour.

Alfred closed the stable door, then led the two horses to a trough of water. They drank intermittently between snorts and heavy breathing, obviously struggling to catch their breathes after what must have been a strenuous ride. Meanwhile, Alfred removed their saddles and gave them a quick rub down before lifting and inspecting each hoof. Jack was very impressed by how thoroughly he cared for the horses.

"We can't let them drink too much at once. Come, help me walk them."

Alfred offered the reins of one horse to Jack and led his own to the barn door.

"Stay close to her shoulder, keep two firm hands on the reins, and don't take any nonsense."

They walked both horses up and down the alley several times before returning them to the stables for another drink and lick at a salt block. Jack was surprised at how quickly they seemed to recover.  Once Alfred was happy that the horses had drunk as much as they wanted, he backed them into a stall each and offered them hay.

"I think we're done here boy. Go ask Minnie if she has something for you to do."

Jack presented himself to Minnie, who promptly set him to peeling potatoes after seeing to it that he washed his hands carefully.  Minnie herself was busy cooking, which meant that the kitchen was almost silent.

While he peeled, Jack puzzled at what business brought other malkemists to visit Master Amoth, and whether it had anything to do with him. It must be important and urgent for them to run the horses until their flanks heaved. Had there been a confrontation between Master Amoth's malkemists and the malkemists of Master Nuth? Would there be fighting?

Jack could not believe that such a thing could occur because of him, so there must be a deeper reason for the conflict between the two masters. As far as Jack knew, there were only two masters in Corsisan. Surely it was big enough for the both of them.

Minnie growled as she walked by, "You're cutting off more potato than skin." She pinched his ear lightly.

Jack tried to concentrate, but just then the two malkemists returned. The shortest of the two greeted Minnie as they passed through.

"Ho Minnie, any treats for a poor scout?"

"I couldn't bare to let you go without one you handsome man," replied Minnie, practically simpering. A package miraculously appeared in her hands and she pressed it on the man with unseemly forwardness. Marken grinned wide with pleasure, his torso leaning towards Minnie, but his feet following his fellow without so much as a misstep.

"You're a gem of a woman, Minnie. It takes all my will not to ravage you. If only I were free to follow my heart," he winked and was gone.

Jack watched with wide-eyed fascination as Minnie flounced back around her kitchen bench with a look of deep pleasure on her face.  She was the happiest that Jack had seen her. She completely ignored the fact that Jack was still butchering the potatoes mercilessly and ruffled his hair as she swept by. She resumed processing defatted milk into kefir with a lingering smile.

That Marken fellow was some kind of genius.

Jack cut the potatoes into the chunks that had been requested and transferred them to a pot on the stove just as Emily came in. The mood became even rosier, if it were possible, as Emily recounted her day. She had been in the same house the day through, but to hear her tell it, it had been quite an exciting day. She poked fun at Jack's blanket folding and prompted Minnie for other examples of his ineptness, which the other woman was more than willing to give in the moments she turned from her cooking.

Jack mashed the potato and Minnie seasoned it with some herbs, butter, clotted cream, pepper, and salt. It was heavenly. Jack felt a stab of guilt that his family was not enjoying the same back home. The roast that Minnie had set to cook came out of the oven, and she set Jack to stirring a gravy she mixed from the leftover pan juices. In the meantime she plated several meals, one for each of the malkemists staying in the house, and waited on "Jack's gravy" as she called it. She had a clever way of passing on the ownership of tasks that made the person doing them feel like they had some kind of special stake. It was a dirty trick.

The three of them ran full trays over to the dining room across the foyer and Minnie rang a bell. There were five places set for dinner. One each for Master Amoth and Melanie, and the others for three malkemists that Jack had only glimpsed in passing.

Back in the kitchen Alfred had presented himself, and they set about plating their own meals. Jack served the others, taking special care to ensure he handled his own food. He was deeply suspicious of how thoroughly and deeply he had slept the night before, and did not want to eat anything that everyone else was not also eating.

A bell rang and Minnie bustled out to check on the dining malkemists. The rest of them dug into their food, Jack taking care to eat much more slowly than was enjoyable or even comfortable, though Minnie was out of the room.

When Minnie returned she went to the counter opposite and began pouring a glass of kefir for each of them.

"... nothing better for digestion than kefir. I wouldn't choose to live without it myself," Minnie warbled.

Jack grew suspicious when the task took her slightly longer than it should. Unfortunately, her bulk hid what she was doing with her hands. The spice rack was directly in front of her, so she might have been doing almost anything.

Nevertheless, Jack did not take his eyes off her back. He was rewarded moments later when under her elbow he saw her replace a tiny blue bottle on the spice rack.

She was drugging him.

He was almost completely certain, but there would be no way to find out except by falling for it. He struggled with himself briefly. It meant that he would not be able to go out tonight to see his family. <i>Patience</i>, he schooled himself, <i>tomorrow is just as good.</i>

Jack shoved a large hunk of meat into his mouth in petty vengeance.

Alfred took up where Emily had left off telling them of her day, and they were treated to the comings and goings in the stable that they may have missed. Jack finished his food and began on his milk kefir as Alfred explained that he would need tallow to grease the stable door hinges tomorrow, as they were beginning to creak.

Apparently Marken's companion had complemented Alfred on his care of the horses and pressed a silver piece on him. It was evident that Alfred was much more delighted by the compliment than the coin.

"The lad is falling asleep," Alfred commented, "I don't think I worked him that hard. Am I boring you lad? It looks like he'll miss dessert, the poor little guy." The last was spoken hopefully, but Minnie did what she does best. Quashed his hopes.

"There'll be no dessert tonight, so he won't be missing anything," she said firmly, her eyebrows drawn down.

Alfred sighed heavily.

"Wash your mouth out Jack," Emily coaxed as she continued to eat.

Jack obediently picked his teeth clean and gargled with the salty water by the wash basin. He returned to his seat and tried to fight off the waves of sleepiness he was feeling.

He laid his head on his folded arms for a moment, to gather his will, and...

***

Jack woke to the chirping of early springtime birds outside the slats of his window. He could not remember dreaming, but he did have a plan. He had also woken up in bed, rather than on the floor, which was an improvement.

Disentangling himself from his blanket he noticed that his pyjamas were different. Still pyjamas, but made from a thicker and sturdier material. They were also brown, which he rather liked. The blue pyjamas had had no pockets, but this pair had a small pocket over the left breast.

He was excited to start his day, so he went directly to the kitchen, where he found Minnie was washing the dishes left over from a breakfast that he had slept through.

"Good morning, Miss Minnie," Jack greeted as he went to the half full reservoir.

"Morning," said Minnie without taking her attention from what she was doing.

Jack immediately took his pail and began hauling water, with one detour to the toilet. It took him a few less trips than the morning before. Minnie had a simple breakfast of cheese, bread, and pickles on the table for him by the time he had finished. Jack spared a single glance for the little blue bottle in the spice rack. With his mind suitably occupied, he managed to eat with rare decorum.

At some time today he wanted to be alone in the kitchen with that bottle, but making that a possibility without revealing the desire seemed impossible. He did not want to rely on blind luck. He caught his gaze sneaking towards the spice rack and he yanked it back with a mental lurch. He reasoned that Minnie must leave the kitchen to go to the market, but for all he knew she did so in the small hours of the morning.

He also thought she must need to go to the toilet like anyone else, but a trickle of memory from her endless narrative the day before reminded him that she took great pride in her regularity, and that meant that she had gone long before he woke.

Undiscouraged, he finished his breakfast and washed his plate, Minnie's silence a compliment in itself. Minnie set him to stirring a great pot of milk and a plan began to form as he kept an eye on the unexciting liquid.

Lunchtime. Minnie would almost certainly deliver the master's lunch upstairs, and Jack would remain in the kitchen when she did. A few minutes alone and the little blue bottle would lose its power to send him to sleep.

Jack worked as dilligently and unobstrusively as he could, trying to anticipate Minnie's needs before she had to mention them, and to not be under foot when she needed him out of the way. The last thing he wanted was to be sent away before lunchtime. Minnie had not spoken two words to him for quite a while, which he imagined meant that his plan was on track.

Lunchtime was drawing near and Jack could almost feel the elation of victory in his grasp. It was a good plan, and importantly, very simple.

Emily ruined everything.

"Jack, I need your help, let's go," she called from the door. Jack stood paralysed for a moment, his brain racing for a way to keep him in the kitchen.

"He's been an angel this morning, I almost feel like holding on to him," said Minnie, heartening Jack for a moment before continuing, "but you can take him if you need him."

Jack followed Emily out in despondency, his one shot at getting rid of the sleeping draught was gone. He cheered himself up with the thought that he would have another opportunity tomorrow, but it still meant that Mardy, Stine, Snot, and Hat would go another day not knowing what had become of him. Emily had him help her fold sheets recently delivered by the laundry ladies. The smell of the sun, soap, and fresh air still clung to them, reminding him of Mardy.

Emily was so cheerful that Jack was similarly disposed by the time they went back to the kitchen for their own lunch. Both Minnie and Alfred were already eating, and Alfred was talking of fetching fresh feed for the horses in the afternoon. Jack washed his hands and sat down to a delicious lunch. Enjoying regular meals was novelty enough to eclipse his disappointment.

"I'd take you with me Jack, but you don't have proper clothes yet," explained Alfred.

"He'll have clothes soon," said Emily smiling, "they are being tailored for his young sirness."

Jack's ears perked up at that, but Minnie clucked disapprovingly, ending any further disclosure.

Alfred was the first to finish eating, followed by Minnie. She stacked their plates by the washing trough and he went to run his errands. Then Minnie left in the direction of the foyer.  Leaving Emily and Jack alone.

Jack carried his own plate to the trough and began washing.

"Come find me when you've finished the dishes Jack," said Emily as she left in the same direction as Minnie.

Jack found himself alone in the kitchen.

He wasted no time before scrambling for the small blue bottle. He uncapped it and tried to pour the contents out in the drain, but the mouth was so small that the contents only came out in a squirt when he knocked the base. He jogged it back and forward desperately trying to get it all out, his heart beating furiously under the threat of someone walking in on him at any moment.

He heard conversation from the foyer and almost lost his grip on the bottle in his haste to empty it. He was sure that he not going to make it, the draught just would not come out. He would be discovered for sure.

Still, no one came through the door, and slowly the bottle emptied.  Unfortunately, that was only half the job, he still had to fill it again for Minnie to use it without suspicion during his evening meal.

The bottle was finally empty and he plunged it into the reservoir to refill it, but he encountered the exact same problem again. The mouth was too small to allow much water back into the bottle at a time. He shook the bottle back and forth in the water in a frenzy, rushing to fill it.

The foyer door opened.

Jack picked up the drinking ladle and brought it to his lips, the blue bottle hidden in his left fist. Minnie entered, casting him a curious glance as she went to the stove.

Jack had no time to check how much water he had managed to put into the bottle. Desperate and uncaring, he twisted the cap back on and rolled the wet bottle in the absorbant material of his pyjama pants.

Minnie was adjusting the stove to cook.

Jack spun the die. He walked towards the dishes, hoping that Minnie would not turn too soon. As he passed the spice rack he reached out with the blue bottle in hand, and... pulled it back sharply as Minnie turned around. His heart and breath motionless in his chest.

Minnie looked at him but said nothing, and he continued to the dish trough as nonchalantly as he could manage, certain that Minnie had grown suspicious.

The blue bottle was tingling in his hand. He had to get rid of it somehow, but he could not do it directly under Minnie's nose. He considered putting it in the bottom of the trough while he washed the dishes, but it seemed much too risky. His only chance was to slip it into his pyjama shirt pocket, but with his back to Minnie, he had no idea whether her eyes were on him or not.

He only had a moment to consider all of this, as any delay would be suspicious. He took the risk. Not knowing whether Minnie was watching him or not, he transferred the bottle to his right hand, dropped it into the shirt pocket over his heart, and began washing the dishes.

Minnie was quiet. In fact, the only sound he could hear at all was the soft, soft squeal of his soapy cotton dishcloth on the glazed plate in his hand. She should have been doing something; taking a pot or utensil, fetching ingredients, breathing. Nothing.

The silence stretched on.

Jack knew that he had been caught. All that was left was to turn around and face it. He dropped the dishcloth in the trough and set himself to turn around.

A pot clanked as it was placed on the stove. Minnie's feet shifted and her moccasins scraped against the stone floor.

Jack took up his dishcloth again and got back to washing the dishes. Relief riding like cool fire on his shoulders. However, he quickly realised that he was washing himself into a corner. As soon as he finished the dishes, he would have to leave the kitchen, and if he could not replace the blue bottle by then, he might not have another opportunity before Minnie realised it was missing.

Finishing the dishes, he rinsed the suds down the drain, rinsed and wrung the washcloth, and then hung it to dry on the edge of the washing trough. He was about to head to the foyer when Minnie brushed past him, turned left at the reservoir and disappeared into the pantry.

Jack had his chance. He fumbled with his pocket, knowing that he only had a few moments to spare. The bottle had lain down sideways and caught in the soft fabric as he tried to pull it free. Pinching the bottom of the pocket with his other hand he managed to pull the bottle out and deftly deposited it back in its place on the rack.

He practically jogged from the room, his face split in a fierce grin of triumph.

***

The rest of the day threatened to drag by like running molasses on a cold day, and even Emily's busyness did not help to drive the timeparts forward against their inclination. He and Emily carried floor runners from upstairs out into the rear courtyard and used iron rods to beat dust from the dense fibres. It did wonders for dispelling the nervous tension that had been building in him, but did not rush him towards dinner any faster.

Together they returned upstairs and laid the largest runner down the hallway. They were about to return to the courtyard for another when Master Amoth stepped out of his study.

"Jack, could I have a word with you?" he beckoned. "My apologies Emily, you'll have to do without him."

Jack felt a thrill of unease as old stories about what malkemists could do rose into his mind. Did Master Amoth already know that he had tipped the sleeping potion down the drain? Was it possible?

Emily curtsied without saying a word and went upon her way.

Master Amoth smiled as Jack passed by him into the study and closed the door. He then went to the large grimense board and sat down.  Scooping up a letter from the table, he read it idly, as though he had forgotten about Jack for the moment.

Jack tried to stand at ease, but it was difficult, given that he did not know what was coming.

"Do you know what this is?" Master Amoth asked, fluttering the paper in his hand slightly.

"No sirness," Jack replied, feeling trapped.

"It's a report. I read dozens of them a day. They tell me about the world outside," explained Amoth, indicating with his other hand that Jack should approach.

He passed the letter to Jack and instructed him to read it.

Jack knew that he was being played with. The letter surely held information about his actions in the kitchen, somehow transferred to the paper through a mechanism that only the malkemists themselves understood. He beat down the surliness that threatened to overcome him, and managed to reply civily.

"I cannot read sirness."

Master Amoth reached out his hand and took back the letter, his face inscrutable.

"Do you know what sets malkemists apart from koyim Jack?"

Jack shrugged his shoulders.

"We can't do magic."

"Technically we don't do magic either, it just looks like magic.  The abilities the koyim think of when they think of malkemists are linked with bloodlines and families, but that isn't really what sets us apart. Would you like another guess?"

Jack wanted to say, their hats, but he was not feeling anywhere near comfortable enough to be so flippant. He shook his head.

"This." He gestured to the bookshelves, "This separates us. The ability to record our experiences from one generation to the next.  Our literacy is our defining characteristic. Our children learn the power of the word almost from the cradle. We take pride in a heritage of transmission that spans centuries, and further if you consider works that were not written by us. While the guenic tribes were still living in huts we were passing on the accumulated knowledge of a hundred generations.

"We take care to keep our written works out of the hands of the koyim, and we discourage the koyim from learning letters at all, though the rich still do with their cobbled together alphabets. It is, and I imagine always will be, a taboo among us to teach letters to outsiders. Some of our libraries go even further and have laws and harsh penalties against it."

Master Amoth had been staring into Jack's eyes, but when he stopped talking, it became uncomfortable. Finally, he asked a question.

"Would you like to learn Jack?"

Jack nodded.

***

Jack sat at the kitchen bench and pulled the small folded slip of paper out of his pyjama pocket. Ten words were neatly written on the thick paper, written from memory by Master Amoth himself. They were the ten most commonly written words, and Master Amoth had recited them for Jack and made him remember their sounds before leaving his study.

Jack ran through them now, reciting them under his breath. Master Amoth had forbidden him to speak the words out loud for others to hear. Minnie caught sight of the paper with a start, and a considering look entered her eyes.

"Master Amoth has taken a shine to you boy. I've never seen anything like it. You had best not ruin it with any foolishness.  For whatever crazy reason, he has taken into his master's head to place great expectation on you. I think he's crazy, but while he's coming to his senses, you take care to not let him down," Minnie said, her words hard, but something in her eyes that may have been easily mistaken for care on someone else's face.

Jack nodded carefully.

Both Emily and Alfred pretended as though they had not seen the paper at all.

Jack's food beckoned and he began to eat. Minnie meanwhile, with her back turned, was preparing a fermented drink she had made from toasted rye bread, rock sugar, and the yeasty dregs of a previous ferment. She promised Jack that he would like it even more than milk kefir. Jack was skeptical, but open to the experience, especially since he anticipated that it would not send him directly to sleep this evening.

He did not see Minnie take or replace the small blue bottle, but he was sure that she had used it yet again.

He drank down his sweet and yeasty drink without a hint of unease.  As Minnie had promised he really did like it more than the milk kefir. He might have smiled but for the fact that he was wondering how best to fake falling asleep. How long had it taken last night?  Not long, only a few score heartbeats.

Judging the time roughly he began to blink his eyes, as though trying to clear them. Then a jaw cracking yawn. He could see that Minnie wanted to scold him for not covering his mouth, but she restrained herself. He did it again.

Instead, she told him to wash his hands and face and rinse out his mouth. He did as instructed and returned to the table to lay his head in his arms with his eyes closed. The theatrics were over.

"He's a sweet boy. It seems wrong to drug him every night, but I suppose the master knows what he's doing," said Emily.

"Of course he does," said Minnie.

"Alfred, could you help me carry him to his room again? He's heavier than he looks," Emily requested.

"My pleasure Miss Emily."

The same strong gentle hands that tended to the horses all day scooped Jack from his seat, and Jack relaxed into the cradle of corded muscle. It felt good. It felt nice. He could not remember ever being carried like this before.

Alfred's steady movements had him in his bed in no time, leaving Jack with the fleeting impression of loss. As Emily and Alfred retreated from the room, so did their lamplight. Within moments Jack was immersed in darkness.

But he was awake.

As much as he wanted to launch himself out of bed and be away, he tempered his eagerness. The house would be a hive of activity for a good time yet, so he set himself to wait out the tardy sleepers of the house.

***

Jack woke to a puff of cold mist in his face, and barely had the presence of mind to keep his eyes closed and a grimace of annoyance off his face. Instead, he groaned a little, turned into his pillow, and lay still.

Melanie, at least Jack assumed that it was Melanie, stood over him for a few heartbeats; apparently satisfying herself that he was really sleeping.

Jack listened carefully as she left the room.

<i>Did she close the door?</i> Jack wondered in paranoia. He had not heard the door move. He imagined her in his mind's eye watching from the open doorway, a knowing smirk on her face.

Jack waited. There was no sound.

He almost opened his eyes, but then thought better of it when he imagined opening his eyes to the sight of her face only inches from his own. He waited again.

Finally, he hit upon a clever strategy. He rolled as though sleepily shifting in bed and flung an arm out into the space where he had imagined Melanie's face. The air was empty.

Emboldened, he cracked his eyelids a fraction and peered between his lashes. Nobody stood beside his bed. Then, lolling his head in the sleepiest manner he could manage, he pointed his shrouded eyes at the door.

The door was closed.

Irritated, Jack opened his eyes and swung out of bed. He had wasted precious time hiding from a phantom. His slat filled window looked out on Minnie's courtyard garden, but it was locked tight against intruders. Padding to the door, he applied slow gentle pressure to the lever and drew the door inward.  Outside, the hall was empty, as was the foyer. He closed his door behind himself and moved quietly over the stone floor to the kitchen. He noticed a light fanning out from beneath the door of the room next to his, but had no idea who was inside. The kitchen was dark, so he pushed through that door without trepidation and moved out to the courtyard. He would have preferred to leave via the stable, but he was sure that Alfred slept there at night, or how he would lock the postern behind himself, so he avoided it.

Under the light of the moon, Jack picked out the path to the roof he had planned during the day. He climbed to the steepled roof of the well and was sizing up the jump to the lintel above the door when he realised that he could make the courtyard wall from where he was. He made the leap to the wall instead. Within moments he was outside, once more on the streets.

Before he moved off, some growing impulse demanded that he fold up the pant and shirt sleeves of his pyjamas. It would not do to have Emily complain about how dirty they were. That is what he told himself at any rate.

The street felt comfortable. He felt at home. It made him realise that he had been feeling uncomfortable in the house, despite the luxury and the food.

He began to run. The smells and sounds of the town guiding him home. His feet beat a steady tattoo on the stone and he moved swiftly. He kept away from the streets that the city guard patrolled regularly, and it did not take him long to be among the mud palaces with their rain eroded streets and snarling curs.

That's when the smell struck him. He had been out of the mud palaces for two and a half days now, and the smells of the place hit his fresh nose with a raw honesty that shocked him. <i>Had it always smelled like this?<i> he wondered, wrinkling his nose in open distaste. He shook his head and snorted softly. This was no time to be getting distracted.

He had to be more careful here, not less. The city guard advertised their presence in the town proper, that was their job. The watchers among the mud palaces never advertised a thing, they might find themselves dead if they did. Jack knew where many of them lurked through long familiarity, but even he could not pretend to know them all. Instead of trying, he headed for the rooftops as soon as he knew there was a direct route across them to his home. These rooves were much less trustworthy than the tiled world of the upper town, but his light frame and knowledge held him in good stead.

By the time he arrived at his building, he had disturbed birds, rats, and mice nestled in the thatch by the score. He slid from the thickly layered thatch to a second story landing, thankful that there had been no rain to make the thatch slimy and treacherous. He slipped within the building and moved quickly to the room he shared with his family, overjoyed to finally be home.

He tested the door, ready to knock for Stine or Mardy to unlatch it from the inside, only to discover that it was not locked. Perhaps they had worried that he might not be able to rouse them when he returned, and left it open for him. It did not seem right, but he grasped at the explanation. He let himself in.

He noticed immediately that the smell was wrong. When people sleep in close quarters with little air, a distinct scent develops. He was used to being assaulted by it whenever he came home in the small hours of the morning.

That smell was not here. He smelled musk and mould, but not his family. Something was wrong. Jack felt around on the floor for a sleeping form, but he knew he would find no one. The floor was bare. No blankets, no clothes, no pots, no warm bodies. Empty.

Jack grew scared. They would not have moved. Something must have happened to them and he needed to find out what.

Unwilling, but determined, he knocked on the next door. Their immediate neighbour was an unpleasant old man who worked on the river docks. He was grouchy, but not dangerous.

Jack knocked a second time as the door swung inward just enough for the occupant to peer out.

"Who is it?" came the annoyed whisper.

"Jack."

"What do you want?" the whispered became laced with disgust.

"Where did Mardy and Stine go?" Jack asked in a whisper, ignoring the tone.

"Didn't see, but..." he mentioned the wife of a heavy drinking neighbour, and certainly not someone he wanted to wake in the middle of the night, "... said they were taken by some men yesterday."

Jack was shocked. <i>Who would care enough about them to cause any trouble?</i>

Before Jack could ask for details, the old man was closing his door tight with a muffled and uncharitable suggestion towards what Jack should do with the rest of his evening.

Jack sat back on his haunches in shock. Not shock at the inventive cussing that had just sprung from Old Makky's mouth. That he had expected. He was paralysed by the questions coming too quickly to his mind for him to focus.

No one would have come for his family with anything but harm in mind. They were not valuable enough for anyone to care about. He was certain of that much.

He was no malkemist. There was no way for him to track the people who had done this. For all he knew, it might even have been one of the two rival malkemist groups in town, or another he was not yet aware of. Although he would have expected malkemists in this area of town to have caused a great flurry, like a fox suddenly set among the hens. Old Makky would probably not be here himself if he thought that malkemists had paid a visit. The superstitions and old wives tales of the mud palaces could rival the best that the shanty town, or even visiting rural workers, had to offer.

Jack crept out of the place that was no longer home, feeling uprooted. He was scared now. Deeply scared in a way that the threats to his own body and life had not had a hope of touching.

He returned to the malkemist house via its roof. Lying flat, head first down the steep roof, he reached over and under the edge of the tiles to grasp the hidden frame of the eave and lowered himself in a slow, controlled forward roll; taking particular care not to pop the buttons on the front of his pyjamas, something he had never had to worry about in the past. Dropping from the eaves with his bum turned out from the wall, he landed on the generous lintel above the courtyard door, then scrambled down from there to the ground.

Dusting himself off quietly, he then washed his feet and hands at the well, all the while telling himself that being clean was necessary to avoid suspicion.

By the time he made his way back to his wide and comfortable bed, he was bone weary with grief and helplessness.

***

Jack opened his eyes in untroubled comfort, but as everything from the night before came back to him, a heavy weight settled on his heart.

He was awake earlier than usual and had to confine himself to his bed. The worry eating away at his gut needed him to do something, anything. He wanted to be out. He wanted to get to his chores.

The wait was torturous. He was sick with worry by the time he judged the sun to be high enough for him to get out of bed.

He wandered into the kitchen.

"Get those pyjamas off and give yourself a bath," greeted Minnie.

Jack did as he was told, striping down to the skin. He drew a pail of water from the reservoir and started washing the important places. There were really only a bare few of them according to Jack.

Halfway through his ablutions, Minnie gave a growl and came charging across the room like a wounded bull. Jack cringed before her, expecting to be struck, but she just grabbed him by the hair and upended half of the contents of the pail over his head.

"... if you can't be trusted to do it yourself, I'll do it for you!  But if I do it, you won't enjoy it. Not one bit! Start at the top and..."

She did not use the brush this time, which was a small mercy, but she did use the grit-filled soap. Jack suspected that that was not an accident. Minnie said what she meant, and meant what she said. However, from soap, to woolen flannel, to rinse, the process was thankfully short.

Jack was allowed to scrape himself dry with a proffered strigil, for which he was terribly, and shamefully, grateful.

Once he was dry, and Minnie had powdered him, he slipped into his baby-blue pyjamas. He noticed that the hems had been properly sewn.  Thinking of Emily taking the time to improve his clothes, even if they were his baby-blue pyjamas, touched him. That same feeling made him remember his family, and the fear was back in a moment.

Minnie must have noticed the look on his face.

"You think that reservoir is going to fill itself. It ain't. Off you go. You know where your pail is."

Jack set to work.

***

Soldier Halme breezed into the kitchen near midday, and Jack noticed for the first time that he dressed immaculately. Even after what must have been close to an hour in the sewer he had emerged looking ready for the ball. Jack did not know whether he should be impressed or appalled. He was not wearing his malkemist hat at the moment, but it hardly mattered now that Jack knew what he was.

"Good morning to you Mistress Minnie," said Halme, offering a respectful bow, "I brought you a treat from the market."

He placed a rough hessian bag on the bench and drew out a strange purplish fruit.

"Passionfruit!" exclaimed Minnie, "Thank you soldier. This is a treat."

Jack noticed that although she was pleased, she did not react with any of the warmth that she had shown Marken.

"Well Jack, have you had your dose of masking villend this morning?" asked Halme, drawing back his coat in a show of eagerness.

Jack nodded twice, his face serious.

"Oh? That is disappointing," he complained lightly as he let his coat fall back into place. His brief smile touching his eyes.

"Minnie would you mind if I took your charge for a short while?  Master Amoth has requested a game, and we both thought young Jack might be enriched to watch on."

"Be my guest. Just don't wear him out, he still has quite a few chores to do this afternoon."

Halme thanked her and beckoned Jack to the foyer.

On the way up the stairs Jack blurted, "She doesn't like you."

"What a nasty thing to say," replied Halme easily, completely disarming Jack. "Do you think she'll warm up to me?" he asked in a tone that Jack could not decide was mockery or earnestness.

"No."

Halme laughed.

Knock, knock.

"Come in," called Master Amoth.

Once inside the study, Jack noticed that Master Amoth looked quite tired. The master dry washed his face with his hands as though bringing himself out of a stupor, but then belied the impression by practically bounding around the desk to greet Halme.

"I thought I'd bring the boy up to watch our game," Halme said as he reached Master Amoth and clasped his forearm, "if you don't mind being humiliated in front of company."

Master Amoth laughed with genuine pleasure at Halme's bravado.

"Come, come. Let's play."

Both men sat at the grimense board facing each other across the checkered squares. The board itself was composed of sixteen by sixteen alternating black and white squares. The pieces, arranged facing each other, filled the first two rows and two squares in the third row. There were ten distinct types of pieces on the board, but each player had thirty-four pieces at the start of the game.

"Draw yourself up a stool Jack, you'll want to catch this," invited Master Amoth.

If it were really their intention to instruct Jack in the game, they did a poor job as they opened quickly without regard for Jack's confusion. Master Amoth moved first and then they took turns. Often barely waiting for the other person to place a piece before they picked up their own piece to play.

"Our old friend Nuth has been busy. It was quite risky to get word to you."

Halme advanced a piece with a decisive click.

"Yes, it's a good thing we got wind of that before he pounced," said Master Amoth.

Halme nodded in agreement.

"They are safely away?" asked Halme.

"Very safe. We have people watching the young ones and throwing them a few coins here and there. We might even be able to get the girl a higher post."

Master Amoth slid one of his pieces forward, covering one of his extended pieces.

"And the older boy?"

"Discrete inquiries turned up that he is a dilligent and skilled worker, he will look after himself. There was no cause to interfere. Since the girl keeps them together, we thought it better to assist her more directly than the others.

Halme responded with another decisive move that drew a frown from Master Amoth. The pace of the game was slowing now, both men considering their moves with much more care.

"What about our rodent problem?" asked Halme.

"No problem," answered Amoth. "It couldn't sleep and wondered from the nest, but it was back by morning.

"Fascinating," replied Halme, though whether he was talking about Master Amoth's answer, or the board, Jack could not tell.

Of course Jack knew what their conversation was about, but he studiously avoided eye contact with either man. It jolted him to realise that Master Amoth knew that he had left the house. That he knew Jack had left the house despite the master very carefully warning him not to. Jack's eye's slid up Master Amoth's arm to his jaw, but he could not bring himself to look into his eyes. Jack's gaze slunk back to the board.

Then the rest of what they had been saying finally sank in. These men were discussing the safety of his family. They had done things to protect his family. It defied every experience and expectation that he had ever had. That grown men would move a finger beyond their own interests was incomprehensible. Strong men ruled weaker men, and weaker men ruled over women and children.

Jack was crying. He had not meant to cry. He never cried. Tears were welling in his eyes nonetheless. There was no sobs, no twisted features, but there was nothing he could do to control the flow of tears.

He was mortified. He tried to stop them. He lowered his head so that the men would not see and willed the tears back to wherever they had sprung from. But it was a useless effort because another wave of relief was washing over him.

A single tear fell from his left eye and rolled down his impassive face. His eye felt drier for it and he was glad.

<i>Good,</i> he thought, <i>It's under control.</i>

A single tear fell from his right eye. It too felt drier. He blinked both eyes quickly.

Master Amoth's hand entered his vision. It was upturned, and upon it sat the cleanest and whitest handkerchief that Jack had ever seen. He took it slowly, still not daring to look him in the eye.

Jack braced himself for a taunt from Soldier Halme as he dabbed first one eye and then the other, but all that came was a loud click as Master Amoth made a confident move.

Jack returned the handkerchief to Master Amoth, noting two tiny blue birds embroidered into one corner.

He had to get this over with, so he lifted his head and practically glared at Soldier Halme. <i>Go ahead,</i> he challenged.

But Halme just looked back. There was no twinkle in his eyes, no smile on his lips, or worse yet, and what Jack had been expecting, a smirk. He merely looked at Jack a moment, then transferred his attention back to the grimense board, one hand idly scratching at his goatee.

And suddenly his perception of Soldier Halme shifted.

Jack finally looked at Master Amoth.

Unlike Halme, Jack saw sterness there, and some anger.

"Have you finished your words?" he asked, his tone hard.

Jack stared at him in confusion for a moment, trying to wring the meaning he had been expecting from those simple words. <i>How dare you do the thing I expressly forbade!</i> But it was not there.

Eventually Jack managed a nod.

"Can you handle twenty more words?"

"Yes."

"Varlay, give me your paper."

Jack handed it over and the master neatly scribed another twenty words between moves. He spoke the words out loud and made Jack repeat them until he had the twenty committed to memory.

"Make sure you review each word out of sequence. Backwards and at random. If you don't, you'll be wasting your time, and more importantly, mine."

"Yes, sirness."

Halme played a move that injured one of the master's pieces. A strong piece suddenly became a weakness and threatened to drag the pieces around it into a depressed state. Both men were calculating the new movement abilities of the remaining pieces. Since attempting to move a piece further than it legally could resulted in injury, it behooved the opponent to keep a very close eye on exactly what the other could and could not do.

Jack struggled to understand what was going on, since the rules had not been fully explained to him. Maybe one of the books on the wall could tell him. With that thought in mind, he ran through his first ten words, recognising them easily in any order, before he began on the new twenty.

Master Amoth had told him that a vocabulary of only two hundred words would be enough for him to begin reading by himself. It seemed like a very small number of words to be able to read a whole language, but Master Amoth insisted that all malkemist children learned this way. Although, he admitted, at a much younger age than Jack.

Almost an hour later the two men were still battling furiously.

"Has there been any trouble over at the Red Library?" asked Master Amoth, considering his next move.

"None that I didn't stir up," replied Halme sheepishly.

The master looked up sharply.

"No, no, not recently, this was from long before." said Halme quickly, his hands patting the air in front of him in placation, "A malkemist from Lobiah, his name was Nywrist. The idiot challenged me to a duel right there in the library."

"By the Prime Imaginer! Why?" asked Amoth, his eyebrows raised in incredulity.

"He had some cause," said Halme, "at least I can imagine how he might see things poorly, as they were."

Jack watched Halme carefully. He was getting to know the man's mannerisms, and they were presently screaming understatement.

"I swapped around some of his store creatively, and since he had no talent for sensing, he didn't notice. His own fault really, he ought to have paid more attention in class. Long story short, he ended up losing all of his hair. And I mean all of it."

"For what purpose?" asked Amoth, intent.

Halme grimaced and pursed his lips in mild embarrassment, "I don't recall there was a purpose. Well, besides him being a..." he glanced at Jack, "pain."

Master Amoth snorted in disbelief.

"So, what happened at the library?"

Halme shrugged, "He lost. Nasty business a man dying for his pride.  Best to swallow it and live."

"I don't suppose he would have challenged you to a duel if he expected to lose."

"Nobody expects to lose a duel to a half-breed," replied Halme glibly.

Master Amoth nodded in agreement, "The old ways are strong in some families. Underestimating a half-breed has been the end of quite a number of full-bloods.

"It baffles me that you have accumulated so many casual enemies."

"It baffles me too," said Halme in a wry tone that indicated anything but, "though some are less casual than others."

Master Amoth seemed to suddenly become aware of Jack, who was sitting quietly in open and plain sight.

"Jack, you can run along if you want, I'm sure Minnie is missing your services by now. I have decided that I do not want any witnesses to my looming defeat afterall."

Jack returned his stool to the place where he had found it.

"Do knock on my door if you think you're ready for more words, or ask Melanie, she used to teach at Huxlots," Master Amoth offered.

"You could ask me too," Halme said with a slightly mocking smile.

Jack offered his best bow, which made him feel like a gigantic fool, and left the room.

***

Jack did not see the little blue bottle at dinner, which relieved him of the need to feign slumber after he ate. He watched everyone very carefully until he realised that none of them were taking special notice of him at all. With a inward sigh, he relaxed.

To Jack's surprise, Minnie, Emily, and Alfred did not immediately go their separate ways after the dishes were cleared and washed.  Instead, they sat down again at the kitchen bench and Alfred pulled a small wooden box from his coat.

"Can you play cards boy?" Alfred asked.

Jack shook his head.

"We'll have to teach you then. Do you know your numbers?"

Jack shook his head again.

Alfred just nodded, taking Jack's ignorance in his stride.

"This is a two," he explained, pointing to the numeral two, "notice that the card has two acorns. This is a three, with the three hearts..."

"Argh, skip it Fred. Let's just play crazy eights and let him pick it up as he goes," groused Minnie as she returned to the table with a large bottle of her special brew.

"You're right I suppose Min, but I was hoping to get him up to speed for a game of Contract..."

"Ooh, yes!" exclaimed Minnie, her eyes lighting up, "I wasn't thinking. Do you think he'll grasp it?"

Alfred just smiled as he shuffled the cards, and Minnie poured out a small glass of her brew for each of them, including Jack, although his fell far shy of a full portion.

"My potion here has been known to set grown men on their ear, so you take it easy," she explained to Jack.

Jack picked up the game of Crazy Eights quickly, since all it took was to match the numeral on the face-up card or it's house; hearts, bells, acorns, or leaves. For the first half dozen games Alfred tallied his loses for him, explaining how the numbers added up, while Jack struggled to make sense of it. Mardy had tried to explain numbers to him once before, but she had not really known how they worked herself, which meant that she had not been able to tell Jack the use of them.

Then all of a sudden it clicked that tens were groups of ones and he was off and running with his own figures. He was slow, but he was doing it himself.

Minnie was cheered by his progress and gave him great encouragement. It turned out that she was a passionate player of the game Contract, and three people were not enough to play. In her excitement she forgot herself, plying Jack with both praise and hard liquor until Emily actually had to take his glass away, lest he fall over drunk. Minnie laughed uproariously when she realised what she had been inadvertently doing.

The three of them became cheerier as more and more hands were dealt.

"Has your suitor come calling this week Miss Emily?" asked Minnie, throwing out a pair of fives.

"He did," replied Emily with a prim smile.

"Well?"

Emily shrugged. "He's shy. I'm hardly ever sure if he's calling on me, or just enquiring about the weather. He did give me this though." She pulled a string necklace from her blouse, with a small wooden bird hanging from it.

Jack felt a sliver of jealousy.

"Now you be careful Emily, you never know what those far-off country folk have up their sleeves, and what strange witching they can call upon!" Minnie warned, heartening Jack no end.

"I'm sure it isn't enchanted Min. I thought it was quite sweet of him."

Alfred reached out his hand. "May I?"

Emily slipped the necklace over her head and passed it to Alfred.

"It's very fine. He could be a scultor with this skill," commended Alfred.

"Oh, I do like a scultors. Lovely hands," said Minnie with arch innocence. She made a show of rearranging her cards, though it was not her turn.

Alfred gave Minnie a look of amused reproof, but Emily only laughed and took back her necklace.

Jack won the round and Alfred tipped over the losing count, finishing the game. Emily crowed in triumph.

Minnie gave Alfred a questioning look.

"Varley, let's try Contract," he responded. "The play itself is easy Jack, but it follows from the negotiations at the start, and that part's not easy." He fanned the deck out on the bench and Minnie, Emily, and himself took a card each.

"Take one Jack," Alfred urged. "Then turn it up."

Jack turned over a malkemist, Emily a seven, Minnie a queen, and Alfred a knight.

"Your malkemist and the queen are high, so you and Minnie will be partners. I'll look at your hand for this first round to get you going."

Alfred took the cards and reshuffled them, then dealt out thirteen cards to each person.

"Lay out your cards Jack, we'll run through an open hand."

Jack did as he was told, which was easier than holding thirteen cards in his hand anyway. Alfred sorted his cards from highest to lowest, and then suggested the bid for Jack to signal to Minnie that he had a good chance of winning seven or so tricks on in hearts. Emily, Minnie, and Alfred followed with their bids, cards hidden. He kept talking, explaining different bids for different circumstances, but Jack could not follow it.

Jack won the bidding, and Emily played the first card before Minnie opened her cards up on the table.

The first couple of rounds went went by in a befuddled blur for Jack. All three adults were using terms and phrases he had never heard before, and each bearing little seeming correspondence to its actual meaning. However, before Minnie's brows actually touched he began to get the hang of it.

Alfred schooled him in his numbers as the scores rose, expecting Jack to keep both sides of the scoring in his head, and add the new tallies as they were counted.

By the end of the night his head was aching.

***

The next morning Jack went straight to the reservoir to quench his fierce thirst. Minnie greeted him with a broad grin and a pat on the back that almost sent him to the floor.

"Jack my boy!" she boomed, "Let's get you into some clean clothes." She was in frighteningly high spirits, and Jack was not at all sure if he preferred it to her usual grumpiness.

He stripped off his clothes and endured a cold wipedown.

"You'll make a fine Contract player, my little nugget. If I'd only known you had a natural gift for the game, I'd have had you playing with us every night..." Minnie's voice faded towards the end of her sentence and she fell silent.

Before Jack could puzzle over what had come over her, a pair of malkemists clumped their way into the kitchen from the direction of the stable.

They looked like hard men, the kind that Jack would certainly stay far away from if he ran into them in the shanty town, or anywhere else for that matter. Both men had eyes that sized up the room in a cursory fashion and then ignored it as soon as they were sure there were no threats. How they managed to come to that conclusion with Minnie beside him, Jack had no idea.

Jack shrank in on himself and kept his eyes down. He felt naked.

"Ho Soldiers, you'll be wanting to see Archivist Melanie, do take a seat in the foyer, and I'll let her know you're waiting," encouraged Minnie with a nod at the foyer door, plainly wanting the men conveyed through her kitchen as quickly as possible. The lead man acknowledged her words with a dour nod as he opened the door to the foyer and went through. The second man followed. An auburn haired boy, a little bigger than Jack, suddenly appeared from the corridor, scurrying after the malkemists. He was dressed in nice clothes, though travel stained. He dismissed Jack's naked and cowering form as readily as the men and followed them into the foyer. Minnie did not speak again until the door was firmly closed behind them.

"I don't like strange faces in my kitchen," she muttered, surprising Jack, who had come to expect only the bold and forceful from the large lady. He felt an irrational desire to pat her arm.  The same arm that could no doubt launch him through a window with ease.

"I think I know the boy though, he must be the Grand Imaginer's son.  Did you notice his left hand? He kept it hidden in his sleeve."

Jack had noticed that peculiarity.

"Here you go, quick step into your pyjamas, and go fetch Melanie to the foyer for us."

With his brown pyjamas on he passed both malkemists and the boy sitting in the foyer and went to Melanie's room. He knocked on the door quietly and waited. Melanie answered within moments in her robes and dress hat.

"Yes, Jack?"

"Malkemists for you in the foyer Mistress Melanie," said Jack, exhausting every scrap of breeding that he had ever managed to beg, borrow, or steal. He certainly had not been born with any.

"Thank you Jack," she said, smiling at him. To his surprise, she pulled the door closed behind her and went directly to the foyer.

Jack hung back as she greeted them there. It seemed that she knew at least one of the soldiers and she conducted them upstairs almost immediately.

He returned to the kitchen burning with curiosity, but before he could work up the courage to ask Minnie any questions she had sent him to haul water.

When he finished that task, Alfred snagged him to walk the horses up and down the back alley. If Alfred had any curiosity about the newcomers and their young charge, it was subsumed by his care for their horses.

"Why is this horse smaller than the others Alfred?" Jack asked.

"Because it isn't a horse," he grunted.

"It looks like a horse," Jack replied in confusion.

"It's a mule. The offspring of a jack and a mare."

"A jack?" Jack asked.

Alfred laughed. "You know I've never thought about it, but I suppose that is what you're named for." He chuckled to himself a little longer before letting Jack in on the joke. "A Jack is a male donkey lad. Don't feel bad, a donkey is a very clever animal. Much smarter than a horse in fact; just no where near as majestic. They probably chose a mule for the boy since he's crippled on the left side. A mule has nearly the size, strength, and endurance of a horse, but is more intelligent and better tempered, if a bit stubborn. A perfect mount for a young one."

The mule was, despite Alfred's mistrust of its intelligence, a well-trained and obedient animal. Unlike the horses, which all towered above Jack, the mule was much closer to his size. It quickly became his favourite.

"You have these beautiful creatures before you," Alfred gestured to the slick and powerful steeds in the stalls, "and you're fawning over the illegitimate offspring of two creatures that would never choose to breed in the wild." He sighed heavily in mock disgust.

Jack received that quietly as he continued to rub down the mule.

"Do you have a father Jack?" Alfred asked suddenly.

"Everyone has a father," Jack replied.

"Do you know him?"

"I don't even know who my mother was."

"That's weird. It's easy enough to misplace a father, but not a mother."

"It isn't that strange," Jack replied. "You've heard of the Crystal Shade?"

Alfred gave a long low whistle of recognition. The Crystal Shade was a whorehouse in the town proper.

"I've heard that the girls there take a malkemist potion so they don't grow a bump."

Jack gave a half cock of his head. "Well, it must not work all the time."

"I guess not," Alfred acknowledged with a lop-sided wince. "Still, I haven't even heard whispers of any such."

Jack concentrated on rubbing down the mule, and Alfred let it lie.

The slowly extending silence was interupted by a smart tattoo of knocks on the stable door. Alfred frowned in surprise and rushed to his spy hole, only to grunt in consternation at what he saw.

"It's covered," he muttered, and then in a deep, strong voice demanded, "Who is it?!"

"I am the terror that lurks in the dreams of the bold, the ghost of true fear, the frightener of brave men, the siphon of souls," came a horribly rasped reply, "I am an abomination. I am Greon!"

The last was yelled with some force, but Jack kept his eyes on Alfred's face, looking intently for some clue to the danger, his heart ticking a little fast. Alfred however, looked back at Jack and rolled his eyes, dispelling Jack's tension.

Alfred lifted the bar on the stable door and drew it inwards.

"Welcome Master Greon, I'm sure Master Amoth is expecting you."

"Indeed, he may well be," rasped Master Greon, guiding a huge black horse into the stable with his knees. His head was covered by his malkemist hat and his face by a black scarf. In fact, between that and his gloves, only his eyes were visible.

"What do we have here?" asked the man as he dismounted. "Did you get yourself a helper Alfred?"

"Not in so many words, but he is quite handy."

"Has anyone else noticed that he has no shoes? He'll lose a foot to this pre-spring chill or a horse if he's not careful."

"Doesn't seem to notice the cold," replied Alfred, "and I don't think he's ever worn shoes. I guess we figured that if it was good enough until now, then he's comfortable."

"Well, I hope he's got a strong stomach," rasped Greon. He pulled at his scarf and began to unravel it.

Jack recognised the challenge and watched. The first unwinding of the scarf revealed two pits in a low mound where a nose should have been. The flesh either side of the nose was layered with burn scars that extended up and over the left eye, although the eye still seemed to function. The flesh of the cheeks were terribly gouged and uneven. Both ears were partially hidden by the malkemist hat, but they looked to have been burnt away as well. The second unwind revealed more scars and a mouth that seemed to have melted and sunk on the right side. As the scarf was unwound until free, there was no flesh revealed that was not covered by scarring except for a splash, like a large patch, over his right eye.

He pulled off his malkemist hat last. No hair grew on his head, as it too was completely covered in burn scars. The only hair on his entire head were the eyebrows and eyelashes of his right eye. In a startling contrast, his eyes were a deep and clear blue, giving Jack the impression of a perfectly formed person staring out from a deformed mask.

"Well, he's a tough one, I'll give him that. Even I flinch these days when I accidently catch my reflection," he joked. Looking Jack directly in the eye, he continued, "This isn't as bad as it was though. Not so long ago I was able to stick my tongue out this cheek," he pointed at the left side of his face, "that used to get me the screams."

The way he rasped "screams" chilled Jack's blood.

Master Greon hacked a laugh, "I got him. See, he's gone white." He petted his big black horse and warned, "Be careful with Tornado here, he's got a mean streak," before heading for the house.

"Two soldiers from Hunter's Vale upstairs," Alfred called after Greon, who nodded without turning back.

"Shaken?" asked Alfred when they were alone.

Jack shook his head.

"What happened to him?"

"That's his story, you'd have to ask him yourself."

"You don't know?" asked Jack in a polite tone, though he knew it was a rude question.

Alfred refused to be prodded and cuffed Jack lightly behind the ear. "I don't know all of it."

Jack put his hand on Tornado's shoulder and then slipped near to put his shoulder and back to him. In line with Master Greon's warning the big black horse tried to take a nip at him. Jack gave a short bark of a chuckle and responded by tickling his chin.

"Have you been around many animals Jack?" Alfred asked, a considering look on his face.

"No. The first time was when Halme threw..."

"Soldier Halme."

"Soldier Halme threw me on the back of his horse."

"Cats?" asked Alfred.

"I've seen a few cooked ones. Our people," Jack was referring to shanty town people, "won't let a cat run from one end of town to the other. That's what Mardy says."

Alfred winced. "Yes, she's right. Of course," Alfred replied sheepishly. "But you have dogs. They're a sacred animal," Jack looked up sharply from his game with Tornado, "even the shanty towners wouldn't violate the doctrines of the Cayophant. Dogs were companions to the one true emissary of God."

"I wouldn't mind if people ate dogs instead," Jack responded uncharitably.

Alfred snorted, "I'm not a devout man Jack, but you be careful with your mouth outside this stable. People take their religion seriously, even this far east."

There was a loud crash as the kitchen door struck the stone wall of the corridor, and one of the malkemists who had escorted the boy into the house came barrelling into the stable, his face contorted with rage.

Tornado jerked backwards and lifted his nose high, almost pulling his reins free from Jacks hands. Jack managed to keep his shoulder against him and crooned as he had seen Alfred do. Alfred himself got out of the way as the malkemist bore down on the stable door and threw the bar back. The angry malkemist's left eye and cheek were red and abraised, though the rest of his face was also flushed. Jack only got a bare glimpse before he stormed out of the stable.

Alfred rushed forward to stick his head out the stable door.  Satisfied that the malkemist had not lingered, he popped his bald head back in. "See," he joked, "that's what happens when you don't respect people's dogs. They get angry and throw tantrums."

"Someone hit him," Jack said, stroking Tornado.

"There's no putting anything past you Jack, I see that now," Alfred mocked, "You could laugh at my jokes once in a while though. Leave a man his face."

Alfred barred the door, then pulled the saddle and rug from Tornado's back.

***

Soldier Halme came in before the evening meal, wearing a strange cloak and no malkemist hat. He disappeared into the house without pausing to greet anyone. Meanwhile, the malkemist who had stormed from the house had not returned and Jack had no idea if he would or not.

Jack helped Minnie and Emily serve the diners in the dining room.  It seemed to be a busy night, with the visitors from Hunter's Vale, Master Greon, and Halme rubbing shoulders with the usual assortment of malkemists. The new boy did not even glance at Jack when he set a plate in front of him. Jack wondered if he was pretending that Jack was invisible, or if he was genuinely oblivious.

Emily was subdued as they returned to the kitchen and Minnie reached out and petted her arm.

"Yes dear, it's a gruesome sight. I'd like to say I've seen worse, but I'm not sure that I have. I don't know what's gotten into the man. I much prefer it when he covers himself decently. What's he trying to prove?" Minnie asked.

"He's gone through hell. You shouldn't begrudge a man a little uncivil behaviour," Alfred allowed.

"He doesn't need to listen to the likes of me on the topic, but still," Minnie hurrumphed mildly. "It would be enough to turn me off my food."

"I wonder if that's not his purpose," finished Alfred.

Dinner was delicious as usual, and following Alfred's lead, Jack told Minnie so. Minnie responded by pouring an extra nip of her special brew into Jack's cup.

Alfred was in a jocular mood and took three coloured bean balls from his vest to impress them with his juggling skills, and perhaps to cheer up Emily. The balls flew into the air in the familiar pattern of the street performers on the main way. Jack had watched the street jugglers many times and could juggle himself, but he appreciated it nonetheless. Importantly, the stableman did not fumble a ball once.

They clapped for Alfred's performance.

"Are you going to gift us one of your songs Emily?" asked Minnie.  "We'll make a show of it."

"Perhaps later," replied Emily shyly, her eyes down and a blush on her cheeks.

"I've already performed, and you've all eaten it up," Minnie laughed.  "I'd dance, but I'm too old for it these days."

Alfred turned to Jack. "And what of you lad? Any special skills that we don't know of?"

Jack had already been wracking his brain. Prompted by Alfred's juggling, he thought he might have an idea. He usually used the skill far more pragmatically, but he supposed it could make a passable trick.

"I can do something," he said nodding. "Do you have a silver piece sirness?"

Alfred's eyes narrowed in amused caution. "Am I going to get it back?"

Jack nodded, smiling.

Alfred pulled three silver pieces from a purse and handed one to Jack. "There you go. I hope that wasn't the admission fee."

Emily laughed prettily.

Jack put the silver piece on his tongue in clear view of his audience. He closed his mouth and let the silver slide down his throat.

Emily gasped and Minnie started laughing.

"Ho, you'll get it back Alfred," Minnie laughed; then roared, "in a couple of days!"

Alfred was looking a little green. Jack opened his mouth and moved his tongue around to show that it was empty.

"No Jack! You didn't!" scolded a scandalised Emily. "Poor Alfred."

Alfred was taking the loss much more stoicly, but he was obviously struggling with himself.

Jack felt for the coin in his throat and worked it back up into his mouth. He sucked it dry as he withdrew it with his thumb and forefinger.

The look of relief on Alfred's face was appreciation enough, but both Emily and Minnie clapped and hooted. Jack went to the cistern and washed the coin over the drain before drying it on his pyjama shirt and handing it back to Alfred.

"You had me good and proper lad. I was thinking of ways to knock it out of you," said Alfred with a laugh. The comment caught on Minnie's particular funny bone, and she laughed harder.

Their game of Contract began as soon as the dishes were washed, but was soon interrupted by a call to the dining room to clear plates.  No sooner was that done than Master Amoth himself came into the kitchen, Soldier Halme on his heels.

Jack heard Master Amoth's voice just before he pushed the kitchen door inwards.

"...last thing we need. We don't want to frighten her."

Master Amoth gave Minnie a respectful nod, but addressed himself to Alfred, "Alfred, could you drop the bar behind us please, we're heading out."

Alfred abandoned his cards immediately and followed the two men towards the stables. They commanded so much attention that it was a moment before Jack noticed Master Greon standing in the doorway to the foyer.

"Come with me Jack," he rasped.

Minnie was frowning fit to break something on her face, but she kept quiet as Jack followed Master Greon out into the foyer.

"Come," he beckoned again with a heavy croak, drawing Jack towards the dining room.

The dining room was empty except for the two visitors from Hunter's Vale. The boy looked up from his book and frowned at Jack as though seeing him for the very first time. He shifted slightly in the armchair he occupied by the fire. The soldier, for his part, watched them enter attentively. Jack could almost see him gauging distances and possible attacks.

"You may retire, Soldier Mond. I will be giving these boys a lesson."

"I stay."

"No. You don't. Get out before I kick you out."

"It's my responsibility to see him safe to the highlands. The Grand Imaginer will have something to say if you interfere with my duty."

"I don't give a rats dinner what the Grand Imaginer has to say on just about anything, let alone this. But if you stay, you will find out exactly why the many men who have tried to kill me have failed.  That was your friendly heads up."

Very little about Master Greon could be mistaken for friendly.

Jack watched Soldier Mond flicker through anger, outrage, and then uncertainty before coming to rest on fear. As soon as Jack realised what had just occurred he dropped his eyes to the throw rug he was standing on and kept them there studiously. It was unhealthy to watch a dangerous man backed into a corner and then cowed. He did not peek up again until he heard Soldier Mond exit and close the door behind himself.

"My father says you're an animal. That it would have been kinder to put you down," the boy said, glaring at Master Greon.

Master Greon made a terrible noise. It took Jack a moment to realise that it was supposed to be a chuckle. "After all I've done for the man. Last I checked, parents do not confer their rank on their children." Rasping, clawing voice. "You'd best remember that, or this lesson may prove more painful than most.

"Look at me, this is more than I've talked in months. I've parched myself." He went to the dining table, poured himself some wine, and took a healthy draught.

"Wine Jack?"

Jack shook his head, uncertain about exactly how much trouble he was in right now.

***

Halme unwrapped two cloaks and handed one to Amoth. The night air in the dark alley behind the house was cold and biting. He was quite glad that he needed it as a disguise, though less impressed with the sad quality of the garment. Still, it appealed to his sense of the dramatic to be lurking the streets on a covert mission, so the tatters and stains did not bother him as much as may have otherwise.

Amoth shrugged into his cloak with no evidence of such nonsense. He was all business.

"Are you ready for your face?" asked Halme.

"Do the boots first. Who walks the streets with boots like these?" he replied, gesturing to the immaculately maintained black leather encasing his feet.

Halme nodded in agreement and quickly applied a scuffing villend to their boots. The villend covered each boot and gave them the appearance of age and hard wear. Halme was gratified by the result.  He loved his craft.

Halme could not help a slight upward curve of the lip as he applied his selected facial disguise to Amoth. Amoth's cheek twitched with discomfort and Halme could sympathise, this type of villend really gripped the face and gave the uncomfortable impression that the face was actually being changed.

He handed Amoth a small mirror so he could view the handiwork, the moonlight was strong enough for Amoth to be able to make out details.

Amoth almost dropped the mirror with a cry, nearly making Halme regret his joke. Nearly.

Amoth had been transformed into the spitting likeness of Master Greon, disfigurements in place.

"That was not funny," Amoth scolded with a hard look at Halme.

"Trust me, it was funnier looking from the outside in," he responded without the least hint of chagrin. He drew the living villend back into its vill, and cast a new one back in its place.  "Better?"

The new face was the one Amoth had used before for this task. He did not deign to gratify Halme with a response.

With both disguises in place they set off at a brisk walk.

"We need to be careful," said Halme. "It wouldn't do to be picked up by the city guard in these clothes. They won't believe a word out of our mouths."

"Surely you could handle them for us. A dozen guards should be a light warm up for a psar soldier."

"Oh, and where would you be while I'm busy dispatching a dozen of the Duke's finest?"

"Don't kid. They're hardly the Duke's finest. I'd be appreciating your efforts and taking notes. I am a great appreciator."

Halme snorted crudely, but walked on in silence for a few moments.

"I've been hearing rumours of war in the west, or more war if you like," prodded Halme.

"I've heard the same thing. The western malclave has always been far heavier handed than we are here in the east, but it feels excessive even for them. It seems they can't go a decade without a major upheaval to thin the koyim."

"Umbral?" asked Halme.

Amoth tilted his head in disbelief, "You've actually heard that? A myth. No such thing. Why would they exist in the west, but not here?"

"I've heard stories of the umbral. Recent stories. Crazy stories.  Maybe someone is trying to bring the myth to life?"

"Stranger things can and do occur, but I can't believe that any malkemist would turn against the docrine of the malclave. It's impossible."

"Impossible for any properly initiated malkemist, but you're presuming that all are properly initiated. It is a weakness to believe that all other malkemists think like us," responded Halme.

Amoth looked to considered this for a moment. They paused at a street corner to make sure there was no patrol before turning into the crossing street.

"Varley, what crazy stories have you been hearing?" he sounded like a man who did not really want to know.

"I've been hearing a lot of chatter about Pomede."

"Pomede!" Amoth exclaimed so loudly that Halme actually shushed him.

"Pomede? What do children's stories have to do with anything?" Amoth asked in a quieter voice.

Halme was a little embarrassed to go on, now that he had said it out loud, "There's talk that a group of malkemists have been searching for him."

He scratched bashfully at his brow.

"Let them search. If he is anything more than a myth, he's almost certainly a thousand years in his grave. If not more.  Absolutely a myth. I'm quite sure he was invented by the early Trium to scare any malkemist who managed to fool his way past the gatekeepers. I'm starting to think that having you infiltrate the Red Library has been a complete waste of your skills."

"Probably. They do little enough over there. Not to mention that we are technically on the same side. Working under a different Grandmaster shouldn't make them our enemies."

"It's tiresome, I know. I certainly didn't start these rivalries.  Half the time it seems we are busy tripping ourselves up. One day the western malclave is going to walk in here and take over while we're busy duelling and spying." He gave Halme a pointed look.

"He had it coming."

They walked on through the town proper, the street sloping gently downward. They passed a man selling grilled fish paste, the spices strong enough to bite the nose. It smelled tasty, but he knew Amoth did not eat street food, and he himself was not in the mood. A little farther on they avoided an intense exchange between two drunks in front of the River Queen, a well kept tavern. Halme had drunk there himself.

"Maybe they're connected," mused Amoth suddenly. "The Umbrals and Promede. I mean they must idolise him. I've never really thought about it before, but he stood for everything they stand for.

"Not that I think the Umbrals exist any more than than Promede did, <i>but</i> if they do exist, then it stands to reason that they would be interested in finding his dusty corpse."

"Oops, too late," Halme interjected incongruously into the conversation, having just noticed a complication in their path.

Amoth turned on Halme to frown, only to catch sight of what he was talking about. A troop of four city guards had just turned into the street some distance ahead and were coming their way. Halme straightened himself, trying to bring some authority into his bearing. They would have breezed past the guards in a malkemist hat. In fact, the guards would most likely have found a way to turn from their path, rather than walk past them. But with the tattered cloaks and no distinquishing marks, they were out of place here, and fair pickings for the guards.

Halem focused on the approaching men. He was reading them. Though, not with any malkemist skill. He was reading them with skills he had developed long before he had every visited a malkemy academy.  This is what made him a good soldier. When other men were worrying about things that may or may not happen, he was watching.

He felt more than saw Amoth flutter beside him. He was a bookworm and a very clever man, but useless in bare conflict. Meanwhile, Halme had found the leader, sized up two of the others as time tickers—his own term for men with no interest in their own work—and the last as one who might enjoy the use of his sword a tad much.

Halme adjusted his cloak, a cover for palming a vill from his inner vest pocket. He could see that the leader's interest was peaked and Amoth and himself would definitely be stopped. He waited until they were quite close before, with an incidentally stalling hand on Amoth and an unsteady stumble, he pushed himself to the fore.

"Halt." The leader put out a hand to bring them to a halt, and Halme stumbled one last step to the man's left, which obliged him to stop Halme with his outstretched arm.

Halme grunted with the roughness of the contact, which was all he needed to spray a tiny amount of the villend into the leader's face. He had positioned himself opposite the vigilant one, with the leader between them as a shield. He recovered himself and offered a flowery bow as apology for the contact.

"What are you doing here so late?" the leader queried angrily, "Worker curfew begins an hour after dusk. You're going to spend the night in a damp hole."

"Is it so late, Captain?" queried Halme in a slightly slurred tone, deliberately over-estimating the man's rank.

"Far later," said the leader coldly.

Halme swayed backwards and blinked his eyes at the rooftops, as though clearing severely addled wits. "At any rate Captain, we are not workers. We are artisans. Allow me to introduce myself," he proclaimed, all the while watching the man's face for signs of compliance.

"I am Master Pond, a skilled confectioner, and this is my apprentice Pool." He gestured vaguely at Amoth, smiling inwardly at the lowly role he had assigned the master.

The leader stood still, as though weighing Halme's words, but Halme knew better. He was befuddled. Taking advantage, Halme moved close to the man and gave simple instructions that he would follow promptly in his impressionable condition, then ostentaciously pressed a silver coin into the leader's hand.

It was a real silver piece and Halme congratulated himself. The others would definitely look for a cut of the bribe. <i>See, I can be fair when the alternative doesn't see me dead.</i>

The other men in the little troop were not surprised at all when the leader ordered them to move on.

"That was amazing. I didn't even see it happen, and I was watching.  You used a Voltis villend to make him suggestable, yes?"

"Sorry, I can't say," Halme replied. "Hunch over, you're walking too proud. The lower town is filled with eyes and they're clever enough to make someone who doesn't look right."

"What difference does it make if I walk straight or not?"

"You can lose the tone as well," replied Halme, not answering him, as they moved off.

They passed through the wall that separated the inner town from the outer town, and the cobblestones quickly gave way to crushed rock, and as often as not, mud.

Halme staggered into Amoth and put his hand on his shoulder to steady himself. He walked on using Amoth as a crutch, dragging his feet and making the occasional misstep.

"Is that necessary?" whispered Amoth.

"Probably not, but two drunks attract less attention. I'd rather not give anybody a reason to start asking the right questions."

They came to a building much like the others around it and climbed some stairs to the first landing. Halme allowed himself to sober up markedly. Amoth ducked into a long but very narrow corridor and went straight to a particular door and Halme followed. There was a murmur of voices on the other side, but they quieted as soon as Amoth rapped his knuckles on the thin wall.

"Who is it?" queried a deep, masculine voice.

Halme had to restrain himself from responding with any number of witty rejoiners. He may as well have been drunk.

"Brother Abel," Amoth said distinctly.

There was some scraping from within and the panel that closed off the room within—it could not be called a door—was unlocked from inside and pulled aside. A very pimply face appeared in the front of them, attached to the brawny body of a quickly developing teenager who worked like a man.

"Blessings of the One True Emissary on you," Amoth intoned piously, "How are you kids settling in?"

"Good," answered Stine monosyllablically.

"Did you get the food Brother Mika sent?"

"Yes."

"Mind if we come in..." Amoth suddenly gripped his knee as though in pain, and Halme supported him dutifully. "I need to sit down, this knee is killing me."

Halme marvelled, he had not known that such deception came so naturally to Master Amoth. Stine cleared the panel opening, and Amoth and he entered. Although Stine hesitated, to his credit, he eventually replaced the panel in its frame, making the small space at once much more cosy. Especially he imagined, with two extra grown men than it usually accomodated.

Halme got a good look at the others in the room by the single flickering flame of candlelight. He had been the one to track them down at the behest of Nuth, but this was the first time he was seeing them up close. They were here now only because he had sent a message to Amoth before he reported to Nuth. It would not have been good for his work at the Red Library for him to fail at such a simple task; on the odd chance that Nuth checked up on him. As it was, he was fairly sure that Nuth already had his suspicions.

They were even more poorly dressed than young Jack, if it were possible. It finally dawned on Halme where the multitude of ragged patches on Jack's coat and pants came from. The girl must use discarded linens as patching material. He imagined that all those patches on his clothes had started out the beige of well worn cotton sheets, disguised now under layer upon layer of grime.

Halme grinned at the youngest, whose pants were made completely of worn bedsheets, with no pretense of ever being anything else. The little fellow grinned back to Halme's surprise.  He noticed some scabbed over sores under the boy's nose, but otherwise he seemed healthy. The slightly older boy huddled by his side had what looked like a blacksmith's leather cap on his head.  He did not grin back.  The two young boys did not look alike in any way.

Mardy, the head of the family, was a very plain girl with a square face and brown hair tucked away under a hat. She had wary, untrusting eyes.

"Good evening, Miss Mardy. I've had our brothers and sisters of the church on the lookout for your boy. Ah, what was his name?" asked Amoth.

"Jack," supplied Mardy softly.

"Jack, yes, that's it. We've been looking, but I'm afraid we haven't turned anything up yet. We were hoping you could give us some more information that we could pass on. If we knew more, we might be able to find him faster."

Mardy seemed skeptical, but she asked anyway, "What would you like to know?"

"Well, how old is he if you know?"

"I know. I was there the day he was born."

"You saw him born then?" asked Amoth.

"No. Not exactly. But I know the day. He'll be eleven this spring."

"So you knew the mother?"

Mardy shook her head.

"The father?"

Another shake.

"But you said you were there?" pressed Amoth.

Mardy looked at the biggest boy and flicked her eyes at the two smaller boys.

"Cover your ears numbnuts" the muscle bound near-man ordered the boys. The older one scowled and the other poked his tongue out, but they both put their fingers in their ears. The blacksmith cuffed them both for good measure, and then pinned each to the floor with a single thick finger on either belly. They giggled and squirmed, but he cuffed them again if they forgot themselves and pulled a finger out of an ear.

Mardy leaned in and whispered almost too softly to be heard. "I took him from the Crystal Shade."

Halme nodded in understanding, but he noticed that Amoth was not catching on. He leaned in and whispered the appropriate erudition into the master's ear.

"Ah," Amoth breathed, his fake visage brightening from its confusion. "They passed him to you."

"Not exactly sirness. It's more like they dropped him."

Confusion returned to the Master Amoth's disguised face. "Dropped?"

Mardy looked at the two small boys, and made sure they were occupied before she continued. "They throw the babies down into the sewer. Nobody knows. I heard it one day from a lady I collected laundry from. Her face was puffy. She'd been crying. Those women usually look so pretty, but not this one. Not then. I asked her what was wrong and she said they'd thrown her baby. I didn't really understand. She told me, but then she got scared. She made me swear that I wouldn't tell anyone.

"I couldn't stop thinking about it. Eventually I went down into the sewer to find out if her story was true or not."

Mardy's eyes were dry, but her face was bleak.

"It was easy to find. I could feel their bones under the water as I walked. Some of them had been there so long that they broke under my feet. I was only a little girl, but I followed the bones until they stopped. Right under the Crystal Shade."

Mardy stopped talking for a moment. She just stared between the two men. The moment stretched on. It would have been silent if not for the restrained frolicking of the boys.

"Did you find her baby? Was it Jack?" asked Amoth.

Mardy shook herself and looked at Amoth, her expression confused for a moment. "No. There was a new baby, but it was dead," she said flatly.

Halme listened attentively as she continued.

"From that day, every time my mum sent someone to pick up laundry at the Crystal Shade, I would go. But it was a month before I saw her again, and she wasn't happy to see me when she did. I threatened to tell people what she had said unless she told me when the next baby would be dropped. She was angry. She wanted to beat me. I was only small, but I was angry too. I scared her more than she scared me.

"About a week later she told me that a Kashar woman was giving birth. I couldn't get away from work and I was scared that the baby would be dropped and I wouldn't be there to save it. But I got there in time. Just in time. I got to the place just as they tossed him in, and I caught him before he hit the sewer. He was bawling and wet and naked. I carried him out.

"I told my mum that a woman had given him to me. She asked if she'd given me any money. She thought that I didn't know, but I did. She thought that someone had tricked me, but I knew that women sometimes paid the washer ladies to take a baby and drown it in the river. I told her that the woman hadn't given me any money. She said that she would take him somewhere and he would be taken care of. I knew what she was going to do, so I didn't let him go and eventually mum gave up.

"It made the washer ladies talk, but I was too young to have had a baby for myself, so it wasn't so bad. I carried him with me everywhere strapped to my back and Stine fetched ewe's milk for him every day. Mum eventually got used to it and stopped grumbling."

"His mother was from Kashar?" Amoth asked.

"That's what Amorie said. I never asked anything about her."

"Any idea who the father..." Amoth began.

"Sirness? Really?"

"Oh, I guess not." Amoth conceded. "The other two?"

Mardy nodded once.

Amoth seemed satisfied and excused himself with polite assurances that he, and his brothers and sisters, would leave no stone unturned in the search for Jack. He fiddled with the panel for a moment before pulling it free.

"You have everything you need Brother Abel?" Halme asked.

"Yes," Amoth answered as he stepped out.

Halme looked at Mardy for a serious moment, wondering if he should give her a hard slap before leaving. It would be no kindness if after this day they somehow thought that the Church of the Cayophant was filled with charitable souls. Fortunately, she looked back at him with bare suspicion, and he allowed himself to be convinced that it was not necessary.

Outside in the brisk night air Amoth turned to him.

"I thought you had a sad story my friend," Amoth said, meeting Halme's eyes.

Halme shrugged. "There's always a sadder story out there."

***

Jack thought that Master Greon winced with his final swig of wine, but it was hard to tell. He put his glass down on the dining table and pulled a vill from within his clothing.

"Can you identify this vill for me Corpa Demic?" Master Greon asked the cripple, throwing it to him.

Demic fumbled the catch and had to retrieve the vill from the seat cushion, a slight flush on his cheeks. "I don't have that skill. I can only feel what my own vills contain," replied Demic in an edgy tone.

"Give it a go nonetheless. I would expect someone of your vaunted potential could grow even more through practice than the rest of us," Master Greon rebutted with a hint of mockery.

Demic closed his eyes and seemed to concentrate, but within a few moments he opened his eyes again. "I feel nothing."

"Interesting. Jack, take the vill from Corpa Demic please," instructed Master Greon, pointing towards the other boy with his palm up.

Jack took a deep breath and approached Demic. He could feel deep currents around him, but did not understand what anything meant.  Demic dropped the vill into Jack's hand, but did not acknowledge him in any other way.

"Try to feel the vill Jack."

Jack closed his eyes and concentrated on the feel of the vill in his hand. It was cool to the touch. He waited. He did not know what very many of these did. He knew of the substance that the malkemists used to protect themselves, but he did not know what it was called. He knew what a rapid expander was, he had even used one. He was suddenly filled with a strange certainty.

"Rapid expander," said Jack.

Master Greon's good eye blinked once. His face was not good at expressing emotion, and Jack found him very difficult to read. He cocked his head to the side and gestured for Jack to hand the vill back to him.

The man stood still for several moments with the vill in his hand before giving one short bark of some indeterminate emotion.

"Well blow me over. My mind doesn't want to accept it, but I can't deny it."

Jack had no idea what he was talking about, and a look at Demic's face said that he was equally puzzled.

"To a man with a hammer, every problem looks like a nail," Master Greon croaked cryptically. "Would you care to try again Corpa Demic?"

Demic cast a suspicious glance at Jack before nodding and accepting the vill again. He closed his eyes, but opened them almost immediately. "It is," he admitted with puzzlement.

He eyed Master Greon askance as he handed the vill back to the master. If he desired answers, Master Greon was quick to put the hope out of his mind.

"You may go Corpa Demic. By all accounts you have been studying under your father to levels that others might consider unseemly in the uninitiated. Though I'm not personally one to judge," grated Master Greon.

Corpa Demic rose from his seat by the fire, inclined his head to Master Greon briefly, and then left the room. He did not look at Jack.

Master Greon sucked in a deep wheeze and took up the recently vacated seat.

"It's so cold here in the south," he whistled. "My bones don't appreciate this weather at all.

"Take a seat Jack. I can't be staring up at you like this."

Jack took the seat opposite Master Greon by the fire.

"Do you know who that was?" asked Master Greon.

"Corpa Demic."

Master Greon snorted. It was an disconcertingly wet sound. "Yes, that's his name, and yes, he's an uninitiated malkemist. What else do you know?"

Jack almost shook his head, but then said instead, "He's crippled."

"Yes, he was born like that. He is also the son of a Grand Imaginer. A lofty position among malkemists, and the son of one enjoys every advantage. His disability might almost be viewed as a balance to the otherwise fortuitous circumstances of his birth.  Some might say things like the sins of the father were visited upon his son, but I'm not romantic enough to believe it.

"Apparently, he is the great crippled hope of malkemists everywhere for reasons that you'll have to wait for an imaginer to explain to you.

"Fetch me another glass would you Jack?" A friendly request made by Master Greon bore the hallmarks of a poorly veiled threat of death from another man and Jack leaped to obey. The wine sloshed terribly in its carafe as Jack poured the wine, but he managed to fill the cup without a spill.

Master Greon took a mouthful before he began to talk again.

"I used to be a handsome man. Not as handsome as say Soldier Halme, but certainly not unpleasant to look at," he seemed to be addressing his cup of wine.

Jack turned his imagination to the task of reconstructing Master Greon's face. A sweep of clean smooth skin erupted and spread from Master Greon's good eye. It covered and smoothed his ravaged face.  Hair grew in places that Jack had never seen hair on the man's head. Before long his face matched his two clear blue eyes. He was whole again. No longer repulsive.

Jack let the illusion go and blinked as the reality came rushing back.

"You're a malkemist, can't you just fix your face?" Jack asked, his heart lurching slightly to hear his own temerity.

"Fix my face?" Master Greon asked. His rasping voice made it impossible for Jack to tell if he was angry or not.

"Isn't there a vill that could heal you?"

"Probably, but none that I have access to. Our healing vills work by stimulating the body to heal itself, but these are not just burns, they are a corruption too. It was rather clever if you look at it in a clinical way." Master Greon's tone said that he saw it in anything but that way.

"There are other ways, but they are forbidden by custom and law within the malclave."

Jack could hear the simmering resentment in the malkemists voice.  The anger. He wondered if he was getting better at judging Master Greon's rasping speech.

"I could always smear my face with a carefully crafted illusion, but I see no reason to spare anybody the sight of my face. If I have to live with it from dawn to dusk, others can handle it a few moments each day.

"What do you really know about malkemists Jack?" Master Greon queried suddenly. "You should have some knowledge, since it seems you'll be propelled into this world sooner rather than later.

"What? I shouldn't have said that?" he continued before Jack could answer, his head turned to the side as though listening to a disembodied voice. "Blah! What do I care? Well Jack, what do you know? What do you really know?"

Jack did not really know much at all and it made him nervous to be placing his ignorance on display. He braced himself.

"Malkemists use the air, water, and earth to work their magic. They can kill a man at a distance, track people halfway around the world, heal any wound, read people's minds, fly," Jack said it all in a rush and then fell silent.

Master Greon offered up his sad, croaking laugh. It seemed to pain him, but he did it anyway.

"If only that were true," he said once his laughter subsided, "being a malkemist would be a lot more fun than it is. I'd like to be able to fly, that's for sure. And being able to heal any wound might have proven useful, for obvious reasons. Unfortunately, I can't fly. I can't read your mind. I can only track you over a limited range, and then only if you have left some physical trace that I could use."

He laughed again, "And if I could kill men at a distance, there would be a lot less dead men walking."

"Dead men can't walk," Jack blurted impulsively.

"No?" Master Greon queried as though it were a serious contention, "They can when they don't realise they're dead yet.

"It seems the only thing you got right was that we use water. We do. Water has been a magical substance since before the tenolists lost control of their civilisation and plunged the koyim into their current state. We take advantage of its transformative capacity to create almost anything we can conceive. Unfortunately, the human capacity for creation is rather limited and we find ourselves to be mere copiers of the real creator or creators.  Monkeys with a shiny tool. We are also limited in how long our creations endure. Unless the fickle spirit of life inhabits something that we create, it soon degenerates back to the energised water it comes from. I can spin gold from a puddle in theory, but in practice it would not last long enough for me to spend it. And in an irony that you must appreciate, lest it drive you to impotent rage, every malclave I know of forbids its malkemists from creating life. Especially human life.

"Yes, yes, I know it's necessary," growled Master Greon, talking to himself again. He drank wine and stared moodily into the fire.

The minutes dragged by with Jack in attendance and Master Greon lost in contemplation of either wine or flame.

At length he muttered throatily, "... and healthy body."

He was asleep.

Jack took some time to make sure that Master Greon was truly asleep before he eased himself out of the deep armchair and tiptoed to the door. He let himself out with barely a whisper.

---

Jack woke the next morning with a sense of excitement. Life was starting to look much more positive than it had ever looked before and he was in a rush to see what the new day would bring.

He looked down at his brown pyjamas and for the first time since he had arrived in the house, he did not miss his own coat. His dusty, frayed, and patched grand coat. He barely gave it a thought.

He greeted Minnie cheerfully and set about fetching water for the reservoir. On the way to the well he poked his head into the stable to say good morning to Alfred, only to find him absent. The horses from Hunter's Vale were also gone, but that was fine by Jack. The boy, Demic, did not like him, and the soldiers were dangerous.

He strained his muscles with relish pulling water from the well and hauling the heavy pail inside.

"Jack!" squealed Emily on one of his turns in the kitchen. "We have something for you."

He had not completely filled the reservoir and he was caught between wanting to finish the job and finding out what surprise Miss Emily had in store for him.

Minnie settled it by ordering him to put the pail down and get his butt to the table. He did as instructed.

Emily stepped aside to reveal a large, neatly wrapped, brown paper package tied with string. She had a cheeky grin on her face that said she knew something that Jack did not.

"Go ahead, open it," she invited, her eyes twinkling.

"And be quick about it," said Minnie, her face stern. "Some of us have work to do after this foolishness."

Jack untied the knot slowly and pulled the strings free. He had to flip the bundle over to find the paper seam to open it up on.  Despite the irregularity and softness of the package, the brown paper had been smartly creased.

The inside was filled with clean, crisp cloth.

Emily could not contain herself a moment longer. "Quick Jack," she encouraged, "slip out of those pyjamas. I want to see how they look!"

Jack did as he was told and Emily soon had him in a pair of underpants—as she described them—with a drawstring. They felt terribly uncomfortable and he itched to take them off, but he dared not offend Miss Emily.

"...looks ready to crawl out of his skin. I warned you that you can't just slip a street rat into finery and expect anything but a rat in a suit," Minnie commented.

Emily spurned her cynicism, and continued by slipping a pair of trousers over the top of the underpants and cooed at the fit. Jack could not care less about the fit, and was completely engrossed by how clean and new they were. There were no grey patches or dark stains. No gaping rents in the fabric. No frayed seams. It was smooth and perfect. He was scared to touch them.

He completely forgot about how uncomfortable his underwear felt.

Next came a white linen shirt, plain and clean, but with tiny fox heads embroidered on the cuffs. Jack could barely contain the thoroughness of his pleasure. He ignored how the collar chafed his neck.

"...handsome foxes, I wonder whose idea that was?"

Emily tucked his shirt into his pants and buttoned them up.

"Sit Jack," she instructed, pulling a pair of stockings from the still substantial pile of clothing. "Woolen stockings," she explained with a grin at him. She rolled them up in her hand and then rolled them out onto his bare feet. They felt warm and soft.

Emily smiled mischievously and took a second brown paper package from Minnie, who was also smiling. She handed it to Jack. He knew his eyes were wide with wonder, but for once he did not care what was showing on his face.

"Go on, open it."

Jack pulled the knot free as before and unbundled the package. He smelled leather immediately and his heart skipped a beat. Inside were a pair of black leather boots. Emily did not wait for him to get a good look at them. Instead, she plucked one from his lap and began pulling the laces loose. She pushed it onto his right foot and then began on the second. It was quite a production, but eventually she had both laced up, and invited him to try them out.

They were heavy on his feet and he stumbled slightly as he climbed down from the stool. They were so heavy. <i>Terrible for climbing on rooves</i>, he thought. He took a few steps and stumbled again. Emily giggled.

"You'll get used to them Jack, don't worry," Emily assured.

"He cuts a fine figure now, to be sure, but it'll be finer still with this," said Minnie, holding up a new coat.

Jack stared at it for a moment, feeling a sudden sharp melancholy for his old coat. This was a far finer coat than his, even on its best day, and it had known its best day long years before it had come into Jack's possession. Still, it was his, and it was familiar. It had felt like a part of him, and now that it was gone, a part of him was missing.

"Come on boy, don't leave us waiting, put your arm in," said Minnie, holding the coat open at shoulder level for Jack to slip into.

Jack did as he was told and was rewarded by a gasp of delight from Emily. She clasped her hands in front of her and practically jumped up and down on the spot.

"We've transformed him into a young lord Minerva!" Emily cried with delight.

"Not us, lovely girl. It wasn't us who commissioned all this finery."

"You can be a terrible wet rag sometimes Minnie," complained Emily with a feigned pout. "Let me enjoy this as though it's mine for a bit."

She fussed at the fall of Jack coat for a few moments, straightening imaginary wrinkles, and for a wonder Minnie held her tongue.

"You're very handsome Jack. Very handsome. It's a good thing we don't have any girls your age around here or we'd have to beat them off with a stick," Emily said, winking at him affectionately.

"Oh my," said Alfred from the door. "Master Amoth has given me the task of teaching Jack to ride this morning. We'll be mugged if he goes out like that. I don't fancy taking a polearm to the back just so some idiot can discover he has empty pockets."

"True enough," said Minnie. "Unless you're in the company of malkemists, those clothes are an invitation to ruin."

"Never fear, it isn't all frills and flare. We have some practical clothes in here as well," rejoined Emily. She set to work laying out a new outfit for Jack in plain brown woolens and leather.

"How's the weather today?" she asked Alfred.

"Fair, if chill."

"I don't think the cold will bother Jack, but if it looks like rain he'll need an oiled cloak."

"No rain on the horizon Miss Emily. He'll be fine in that."

She changed him quickly into some woolen slacks, an unbleached linen shirt, and a leather jerkin.

"Still handsome," she winked.

"Come Jack, we don't have much time. Let's skedaddle," cajoled Alfred.

In the stable, Alfred led a deep brown coated mule out of a stall.  It was the first time that Jack had seen the animal.

"She's all yours Jack, so you had best get acquainted. You'll have to saddle her up yourself, since you'll be doing it without me soon enough. Her tack is hanging on the high bar there."

Alfred fetched the horse he usually rode on errands and began saddling him.

"Her name is Risle, it rhymes with gristle, and she's twice as tough. I bought her yesterday from a man I trust. She's been well taught and ridden in. A perfect first mount. You'll be as safe as a dog in church."

The first thing Jack did was to check her feet and then her teeth, much to Alfred's amusement.

"Don't you know it's rude to look a gift mule in the mouth Jack?" asked Alfred with a laugh, and Jack sent him a look of embarrassed consternation. "It's good. I'm happy," Alfred placated him with a pat on the back. "It's a solid instinct to cling to. A good horse—or mule in your case—can be the difference between life and death sometimes. Carry on."

Jack finished his inspection, though with far less rigour.

Taking her riding blanket from the rail, he petted her, though she was already standing calmly, and then slipped it on her back. It was her blanket, Jack could tell because it already smelled like her. He struggled to pull the saddle off the rail and then managed to slap himself in the ribs with a wayward stirrup. He winced at the impact, but got on with it by pulling the stirrup over the seat towards himself and then transferred the saddle to Risle's back.  She did not so much as stir a hoof.

"Good girl," Jack murmured, rubbing her chest.

He tightened the cinch strap, replaced her halter with a bridle, and adjusted the stirrups with the same ease.

"She has some saddle bags there as well, but you won't need those today," explained Alfred, leading his horse to the stable door.

In the alley, Alfred invited Jack to mount. Jack rubbed Risle's shoulder and transferred the reins to the back of her neck and tied them together there. Risle's ears were much longer than a horses, just like Demic's mule, and Alfred had warned him that their ears were sensitive. He went to put his left foot in her stirrup, but misjudged the new height of his sole. He failed twice before he compensated properly for his new boot. He put his left hand on the pommel and prepared to pull himself up. Risle promptly took a short step away and stopped, leaving Jack stretched awkwardly. It forced him to put his foot down again.

Alfred chuckled, but said nothing.

Jack, not wanting to be made a fool of twice in a row, did not try that again. Instead, he came around to her large head and stroked her nose gently. He looked into her large brown eyes and breathed his warm breathe into her nostrils, the way he had seen Alfred do once or twice. She regarded him intently, but gave no indication of acceptance or rejection.

Jack returned to her flank and put his foot in the stirrup, waiting for her next move. She stayed still, and Jack swung up onto her back.

"That was good Jack. You're a quick study. That was the exact right thing to do with a mule. You don't want to be on her bad side, not ever. It is easy to make a life long enemy of a mule, but once you have her loyalty, she'll never leave you. I'm not saying you're there, but you're on the right track."

Alfred looked at Jack's stirrups. "You're set your stirrups too low. I'll pull them up for you."

He led his horse alongside and made some quick adjustments before going to the other side. Jack felt a lot more secure in the saddle once he was done.

"Let's go. Don't try to steer her, listen first. She's smart enough that she'll guess what you want better and quicker than you can tell her with the reins," advised Alfred. "I've seen riders forego a bridle and steer a mule with their knees and a few clicks of the tongue. They're a smart animal, try not to forget it."

Alfred mounted and led off, and Risle followed. A corner of Jack's mind was worrying about the Red Library or even someone eyeing Jack and reporting it back to Marten. He wondered if Alfred had really thought this little jaunt all the way through, but before the fear had taken root, Alfred turned towards the centre of town and away from the shanty. He began to relax into his seat a little and enjoy the ride.

His anxiety returned somewhat with the many faces on the morning streets. He was a nocturnal creature, and had only very rarely visited the town proper in daylight, and then only very carefully.  The whole place felt a lot safer to him in the dark. It was also quite strange to look down on people from the back of a horse. They seemed smaller, less threatening.

Some part of him was expecting a guard to jump out from among constantly changing mix of faces and pull him from Risle. They would know that he was a boy from the shanty and they would react the same way they always did. Badly.

However, once he had passed two individual guards in uniform, he began to lose his fear. They really could not tell that he was Jack the thief. All they saw was the mule and the clothes. There was still far too many faces popping up at him, but he could handle that.

With the occasional word of advice from Alfred, Jack slowly learned to give control over to Risle.

"It's good that I've caught you now, and not after you've been riding for a couple of years," Alfred commented. "Bad habits can be terribly difficult to break once you have them. But you don't have any habits at all."

"Where are we going Alfred?" Jack asked.

"To the royal park. Where else?"

Jack felt a shiver of fear. He had never been to the royal park, and for good reason. The royal park was stocked with deer and boar and rabbit for the sport of the Duke and his guests. To be caught in the royal park was as good as a death sentence and the parkers were not as lax as the town guard when it came to enforcement. At least he would not have to worry about any of Marten's rats up there, they would not dare. Nor malkemists he presumed. That still did not make him particularly happy to be going in that direction. <i>How does Alfred expect to just wander into the royal park?</i> he wondered.

"You're not bothered by the height?" Alfred asked.

"No."

"Most first time riders feel fear, you're further from the ground than you usually are. You don't feel it?"

"No."

All too soon they arrived outside the black wrought iron gate of the park. It was closed fast against casual entry, but Alfred ignored the closed gate and pitched his voice for someone within the park. Beyond the gate, Jack could see trees as far as the eye could see. Jack was struck by how beautiful it looked. Healthy and lush.

"Ho! Criman? You there?" called Alfred.

"Yes, yes. Coming sirness!" came the slightly panicked reply. Moments later a portly middle-aged man in the brown uniform of a parker came into view.

"Argh! You gave me a bad turn Alfred, you rascal. I thought you were someone important," said the parker, a knuckle moving to rub one bleary eye. He rubbed his palms on his thighs as though ridding himself of an itch and began fiddling with the gate.

"Not important?" Alfred asked rhetorically. "That hurts." He did not sound hurt.

Criman laughed, making no apology.

"You'd best be done by midday, the word is the Duke will be down to hunt with his nephew this afternoon. Not a problem unless he's in a bad mood, but why tempt fate," warned Criman. He opened one side of the gate to let Alfred and then Jack through. Jack felt irrationally tense, wondering if Risle would embarrass him by refusing to pass through the gate, but she followed Alfred's mount without prompting.

"Enjoy your ride. I'm going to catch some shut-eye," said Criman. He promptly disappeared into a camoflaged hut.

"Follow my lead Jack," said Alfred. His horse broke into a trot.

While Jack was wondering how he could push Risle to do the same, she took the initiative and gave chase. Jack was forced to grab the pommel to avoid sawing at the reins.

He bounced around terribly, his bum coming down and striking the saddle just as it was coming up. Every time. No matter what he tried, he was thrown back into the air on the very next stride. He wondered if he was annoying the mule, but it seemed she was enjoying herself. He was very grateful that Alfred's back was to him, his eyes fixed ahead, so he could not see Jack make a complete fool of himself.

Alfred rode with grace. Horse and man seemed to take each stride together. Neither seemed to be straining, though Jack had precious little attention to spare as he struggled just to stay in his seat.

Suddenly, and for no reason that Jack could see, Alfred's horse slowed to a walk and then stopped. And so did Risle, though Jack was wholely unprepared for a stop. He ended up leaning wildly to the left and almost slid from his seat completely as she came to rest. He clung on for dear life, the reins completely forgotten. Along with his dignity.

"What have you got there Alfred?" asked a deep male voice. "Times lean? Making a income on the side teaching lordlings to ride?"

"Hardly Descart," laughed Alfred. "This is a one off. Need him ready to ride by tomorrow."

"You've got your work cut out for you then. That bag of potatoes was all over the place. I think you'll have to tie him to his saddle if you want to get him anywhere safely," the big voice chuckled.

"That bad?" Alfred entertained.

"Oh yeah."

Jack had gathered himself back into his seat enough to identify the voice. In front of Risle was one of the biggest men Jack had ever seen. In fact, he looked less like a man than something carved from an oaken bough. His face was sepulchral. A skull with just enough flesh stretched over it to remind men that he was human. His frame looked lean and sparse, but only because it was so tall. Otherwise, his arms were thick and sturdy. He had a parker's uniform on and his green cap, complete with feather, sat at an odd jaunt. If Jack had felt any need of confirmation of the giant's strength, the strung bow in his hand was almost as tall as the man, and set in his quiver were the thickest and longest arrows that Jack had ever seen. It reminded him of the first time he had caught sight of Minnie. The same sense of awe gripped him.

Descart stepped before Risle and rubbed his enormous mitt against her forehead. Risle, to her credit, held her ground and did not shy. Jack was staring into the man's deepset eye sockets between Risle's long pointed ears.

"A bold mule for a bold boy. They make a perfect match Alfred. Was that your idea?"

"I chose her for him. I got the same vibe from the both of them."

"It was a good choice. Criman told you the Duke will be here in the afternoon?"

"Yep. We'll be long gone by then," replied Alfred.

"Good. Good. I'll leave you to it then. Good luck lad."

It was only when Descart began to walk away into the trees that Jack noticed that another, much more reasonably proportioned man, had been standing there with him all along. They both disappeared quickly into the folliage.

"Varley Jack. That was fun, but this time I'll give you some instruction before sacrificing you to the saddle god," joked Alfred. "You'll need to relax into your seat and balance yourself. Quick, practice this."

Alfred stood up in his stirrups and then lowered himself back down.  He did it several times and then asked Jack to do the same.

"See, you can't stand up if you're not balanced. Find your balance first and then everything else will follow. No. No. Don't just plonk yourself down! Use your knees to slide back into the saddle, just a little each time. You don't want to be jarring your butt on every landing. Varley, that's a little better. Let's try another trot. Oh, and be ready to push your feet forward when she comes to a stop. Same if she takes off, you'll need to push your feet back.  Any other time, you'll want to be somewhere in the middle.

"You need to balance over the stirrups. You don't want to be bobbing up and down like a cork in a bottle, not click after click, you'll wear yourself out and your horse. The idea is to move with your horse just enough to not be working against her. You'll need a good connection with your stirrups for that. Relax, but not so much that you're a dead weight in the saddle. Got all that? Good, off you go.

"Whoa, wait. I almost forgot. Keep the balls of your feet on the stirrups, and the outside of the stirrup to the front."

Alfred pulled alongside, seemingly without prompting his horse to do so, and shifted Jack's foot in its stirrup for him.

"Do the other one yourself and then off you go."

Jack adjusted his other foot and then sat there for several moments feeling silly before asking the obvious question.

"How do I do that?"

"Oh, sorry Jack, did I forget that?" Alfred asked, a twinkle in his eye. "You can direct her with your legs."

Alfred touched Jack's knee and explained.

"You shouldn't touch her with your leg from here on down unless you're giving her a command."

Alfred spent some time explaining the leg and seat commands that Risle was trained to respond to, dazzling Jack with their number and the subtleties between them.

With some trepidation, Jack gently pressed Risle's sides with both calves, and was amazed when she began walking forward. Once he felt her respond, it was only a matter of moments before he put her into a trot. Unfortunately, Alfred's patient instruction went out the window immediately as Jack struggled to keep his seat. Jack imagined he could feel amusement radiating from Risle.

"Keep your weight in the stirrups! Follow her rhythym!" shouted Alfred from afar.

After several hundred meters, Jack managed to slow her to a walk and lead her around with a leg as Alfred has shown him. He felt fortunate to have stayed in the saddle. He looked around at the green grass and the many trees and regretted that he had no time to enjoy it.

He braced himself with a forceful exhalation.

On the way back he lifted her to a trot, and this time took a few strides in harmony with Risle's gait. But just as he thought he had it, he fell out of step and started bouncing around again. He reached Alfred with a red face.

"What have you stopped for?" asked Alfred. "Get back to it. Keep your back straight and stomach tight."

Up they trotted again. This time Jack felt the rhythym a couple of strides in and kept it going. He made it to where he had come before, and instead of stopping, decided to swing her around in a wide arc to ride back.

Halfway through the turn he lost a stirrup—he cursed the deadening boot on his foot—and then his balance, and without warning he was flying free through the air. He hit the ground, tumbled, and was back on his feet before Risle pulled herself up.

He expected her to move away as he approached her again, but she stood still and ready. He gave her a pat, mounted up, and trotted back to Alfred. Alfred was shaking his head as Jack approached.

"I've never seen anyone fall from a horse with such grace. You're much better at falling than you are at riding. This time give a gallop a go."

"Go faster?" asked Jack dubiously.

"Don't worry, riding a gallop is much easier than riding a trot, even a slow trot. Just stand and balance on the balls of your feet. She can wear you out in the trot, but she'll wear herself out at a gallop."

Jack did as he was told and the scare she gave him as she took off made him regret it almost immediately. Risle could move like the wind. He was wondering if he should be scared or not when he realised that riding her like this really was much easier. Suddenly, the speed was a thrill, not a threat.

He made it to the other end of their run and slowed her to a walk. He gave her a hearty couple of pats on the shoulder, and set her off towards Alfred at a trot. He was grinning like a fool.

"You liked that, eh?" teased Alfred.

Jack's grin turned sheepish, but did not subside.

Alfred did not let him gallop again, so as not to wear Risle out, but they continued to practice the trot. Each time with some more specific instruction from Alfred. Side stepping from left to right, or turning at a trot, or stopping and turning on the spot. Jack was feeling the strain, but it was exhilarating nonetheless.

"Off your mule Jack," Alfred demanded suddenly at the end of a run, his face creased with concern.

Jack hopped down immediately, worried that there might be something wrong with Risle. But as his feet hit the ground he heard the tattoo of hoof beats behind him and turned to see five riders bearing down on them. Alfred dismounted too and led his horse out to meet the riders. Jack stayed where he was. He recognised the Duke's personal guard, if not the Duke himself. He felt a thrill of fear. <i>This isn't good.</i> By himself, this would mean death. With Alfred, he was not yet sure.

Alfred went down on one knee, his reins over a shoulder. Jack followed suit, letting go of Risle because he couldn't quickly untie her reins. He copied Alfred's bowed head. The air filled with the sound of hooves, squeaking tack, and the soft jangle of metal.

"State your business in his Lordship's park," demanded a gravelly voice as soon as the horses had pulled to a halt.

"I've been tasked with teaching Corpa Jack here horsemanship by the master of Sparrow Library," replied Alfred calmly without lifting his head.

"This lad?" asked the voice.

"Yes."

"At least he seems to know his place, not like the rest of that wretched lot," piped in another, younger voice. Jack did not dare raise his head to see the face.

"Now, now, nephew. The malkemists are a valued segment of our society, if they overstep their bounds on occassion, they do so with the best of intentions. I'm sure," said an older, fuller voice. "The crown has no quarrel with Sparrow Library. If only they could all be as unobstrusive.

"Descart!"

Within moments the large parker presented himself at a lope from the tree line.

"Descart, are these visitors members of Sparrow Library as they claim?"

"They are, your lordship."

"That's good enough for me then. Come nephew, you'll enjoy the sport I've prepared for you."

Several calls of "hurraw" filled the air and the horses exploded into motion, galloping past Alfred and Jack with their tails high.  Descart gave a slight shrug Alfred's way and then took up an easy flowing run in pursuit of the horses.

Jack was shaken, and not yet certain why he was still alive. His legs were trembling as though he had just pushed Snot up onto a roof. Alfred strode over and gave Jack a hearty slap on the back, releasing some of Jack's nervous energy.

"Well handled! Though I guess it comes naturally to you, considering. It would be easier to break a six-year-old stallion than convince a corpa to take the knee most times. But it smoothed things over nicely."

Jack just nodded and gave Risle a few idle pats.

"Let's be getting back. You've taken on a lot today. Better to sleep on it and have a fresh mind tomorrow," said Alfred.

"Why don't they give him a horse?" asked Jack.

"Who?" asked Alfred, his foot in the stirrup.

"Descart. They make him run after them like that."

Alfred snorted as he swung himself up. "That man could run those horses into the ground any day of the week. Probably two or three times over. A man has far more endurance than a horse Jack, and can travel further in a day. We're a hardy animal. Perhaps the hardiest. Don't you worry about Descart one bit."

Jack swung up into the saddle and they turned towards the park gate.

As they approached the gate, Criman came rushing out to greet them.

"Alfred, you beautiful man!" he cried. "You saved me. If you hadn't woken me up I'd have been fast asleep. It makes my knees tremble to imagine it. Thank you. Thank you."

"You could always try sleeping during the night," smirked Alfred.

"Eh!? The night is for other things Alfred," he said, laughing at his own lewdness.

"It's your hide," replied Alfred as he and Jack rode through the gate. "Look after yourself."

A short time later, they were home safe in the Sparrow Library stable.

"Where did the riders from Hunter's Vale go?" Jack asked as he rubbed Risle down after her ride.

"They took up at an inn nearby," replied Alfred.

Jack understood perfectly why that was the case and did not need to ask any more questions. Master Greon was not a comfortable man to be around, even at his rosiest, and he seemed to have some history with at least one of the malkemists from Hunter's Vale.

He pitched fresh straw into Risle's stall before locking her in.

---

Jack felt distinctly uneasy as Minnie placed a tray full of food in front of him. The dining room took on a completely different aspect from the vantage of a guest, and he had no idea where to look when she took the white napkin from his tray, flapped it open, and laid it on his lap. He gave her a sheepish and apologetic look, but she ignored him completely.

Master Amoth sat at the head of the table, chatting amicably with an elderly malkemist Jack did not know. Across the table, at Master Amoth's right hand, sat another malkemist that Jack had never seen before. He wore a pair of white gloves, as though he did not like to touch food with his bare hands, or at least that's the reason Jack imagined for him. 

Archivist Melanie sat on Jack's right, writing out another twenty words on his small scrap of paper. Sitting next to the master with the white gloves, and opposite Jack, were another two malkemists that Jack had not been introduced to, though he noticed them eyeing him as he fidgetted.

With the evening meal served, Minnie and Emily retreated from the room, though not before Emily sent a surreptitious wink in Jack's direction.

Archivist Melanie passed back his piece of paper and Jack slipped it into the pocket of his shirt. It now held one hundred and twenty words.

Master Amoth invited everyone to eat and Jack followed suit, taking care to apply the lessons that Minnie had drilled into him. He discovered, to his delight, a cup on his tray that contained Minnie's special brew. No one else on the table had the same cup and Jack smiled slightly as he sipped the potent concoction.

The meal was delicious, as always, but Jack was soon missing the kitchen. The malkemists around the table were discussing the world outside Corsisan, with the exception of white-gloves, who was quiet. Jack was quickly lost in the folds of the conversation. He knew some of the cities mentioned, at least by name, but most were a buzz of unfamiliar syllables. They seemed to be discussing trade and money, though some of the things said made no sense in that context at all.

"Whatever happened to our guests from Hunter's Vale?" asked the elderly malkemist beside Melanie innocently. "I expected them here tonight.  They're leaving for Pamsley tomorrow, yes?"

"I'm afraid they elected to remain in the comfort of the Tranquil Inn over on High Street. They do have an early start tomorrow and several days ride in front of them. I guess they wanted to be as prepared as possible," replied Master Amoth.

Jack noticed Archivist Melanie flick her eyes up at the white-gloved master. His features were immobile, but he did seem to carve away at his roast with renewed relish, and the two malkemists opposite Jack shared a meaningful glance.

Silence reigned amid the soft scrape of utensils for several moments before the malkemist directly opposite Jack, a man with a soft, kind face broke it with a question.

"Corpa Jack, I heard that you had the pleasure of meeting the Duke this afternoon. How was your brush with royalty? Your first I presume?"

Jack looked up the table at Master Amoth and then swallowed his food.

"I didn't see his lordship, master. I kept my head down."

"Lordship?" scoffed the malkemist. "He should call you his lordship, though you're no malkemist yet. And I'm a humble imaginer Jack, not a master."

"Master or imaginer, there's little difference," broke in Master Amoth. "You did well Jack, handling the royals is always a delicate game. Pressing one's hand with nothing to play can end badly."

Jack was not quite sure if there was a mild rebuke in his words for the imaginer.

"How is your work with the Church going Lorast?" asked Master Amoth after a short silence.

The malkemist next to soft-face cleared his throat roughly.

"It is probably a terrible overstatement to call it work, we guide only. The Church is stable. No developments for us to get excited about. Though I'll be happy to hand responsibility back to your wife when she returns."

"Where is Belinda?" asked white-gloves in a croaking drawl, and Jack's hair stood on end. He stared at the white-gloved malkemist with wide-eyed intensity. "I can't believe I'm only asking now. How rude of me."

It was Master Greon. The disguise, though it hid his scars, did little to make him more expressive. 

Master Amoth turned and looked at Master Greon with a soft snort of amusement.

"Belinda is down at the coast, at Eelong, strengthening their church."

"Dangerous city. Who did you send with her?"

"She is more than capable of taking care of herself, as you know, but she did take Davran and Estar. They'll have no trouble at all."

"We've all seen her in action. She's a handy woman, but everyone needs someone at their back. The days of wandering the countryside with robe and staff are long gone. There seem to be real enemies growing in every quarter."

"If you meant to turn me off my food Greon, you're on the verge of managing it," said Master Amoth, laying his knife and fork by the side of his plate. He perched his elbows on the table and dry washed his hands in front of himself.

Jack practically goggled at the clear violation of Minnie's very clear rules on ettiquette, but no one else seemed to mind.

"There is a lot of talk of unrest and danger, but looking through it, I can't find an instance of any trouble that hasn't been the result of our own mischief," stated Master Amoth. Addressing himself to the rest of the table, he continued.

"Please anyone, correct me if I'm wrong. We've had recent skirmishes with other Libraries, but that's obviously an internal matter. The koyim are no more active than usual." Master Amoth's hands separated for emphasis. "The ever present threat of encroachment by the western malclave seems not to be the problem we once thought it might become. I don't see what all this talk of danger is about."

"The world is changing. It doesn't look like much is happening, you're right there, but I feel a change in my bones," rebutted Master Greon.

Master Amoth pursed his lips and looked as though he wanted to say something more, but took up his utensils and began eating instead.

"Master Amoth, I am deeply curious to know what you have discovered about the abilities of our newest library member. What little I have heard has been quite fascinating," said Lorast.

"It's a complete mystery to us Lorast, we have, thanks to the somewhat zealous efforts of Master Greon, verified the phenomena, but not why or how it occurs," Master Amoth replied.

Master Greon ignored the mention of his name.

"You're convinced he can do it? He can change the function of a villend?"

Amoth nodded.

"It should be impossible. I couldn't do the same with a plith crystal, and you want me to believe he can do it without aid. He'd have to be the most powerful malkemist ever to live! Ridiculous." Lorast searched Jack's face as though he might find the trick of it there, much to Jack's discomfort.

"You can believe it, or choose not to. Two men I trust have experienced it first-hand."

"Do we know anything of his blood-line? Any hint of how?" asked Lorast.

"Jack?" redirected Master Amoth. "Do you know your mother and father?"

"No."

"There you go, a dead end I'm afraid Lorast. Ultimately though, it has very little to do with us. I've contacted Grand Master Waisel and he has given us our marching orders. Jack goes with the malkemists from Hunter's Vale tomorrow to Pamsley."

Jack's heart skipped a beat hearing that. Of course he had known something was coming, but not exactly what. He looked at Master Amoth, but the master was busy skewering green peas with his fork.  Master Greon's face was distorted in a strange way that Jack could not interpret as an expression. <i>Is he trying to smile?</i> Jack thought uneasily.

"I wonder if Grand Imaginer Peele would've been so ready to part with his only son if he thought there was another possibility," ventured Lorast.

Master Greon made some guttural muttering that was clearly not meant to be understood by anyone.

"As promising as this strange ability seems, I hardly think that it has any bearing on that. Jack is far too old to be taught the art of malkemy. His ability or abilities, if there are others, will be limited. As far as we know, he is only able to make one very specific, and not terribly useful villend," said Master Amoth, finishing the last of his peas.

"Indeed," said Lorast, his eyebrows raised in a considering steeple.

"Corpa Demic, by all accounts, is extraordinarily powerful," continued Master Amoth to the backdrop of one of Master Greon's disturbing snorts. "More importantly, he has been trained since young and has the potential to learn even more into the future. The imaginers as a group seem to think that he fulfils the potential of some theoretical malkemist their philosopher Treyvik imagined up, and I personally know little enough of the matter to gainsay them."

"Imaginings on Balance," said Lorast, "That was the book."

"See. I didn't even know that much."

The conversation moved onto questions and answers that Jack did not understand. He finished his food and then enjoyed the dessert that Minnie and Emily delivered after clearing the empty trays.  Archivist Melanie entered a challenge tinged discussion with Lorast about the book he had mentioned earlier. Jack wanted badly to leave for the kitchen, but there was no gap in the conversation in which he could ask permission.

Lorast did seem to know quite a lot about the topic of the book and Archivist Melanie, who had also read the book, was peppering the man with question after question. Jack barely stiffled a jaw cracking yawn.

Melanie turned to Jack in surprise. "I'm sorry Jack, you're tired.  Why didn't you excuse yourself?" she asked.

Jack blinked sleepily at her.

"Go, go," she said with a kind smile. "You need your sleep.

"Don't forget to bow," she whispered into his ear.

Jack rose from the table, stepped back, and gave the entire table a bow as Archivist Melanie had shown him.

"Good night Jack," Master Amoth said into a slight pause in his own conversation.

Nobody else seemed to pay much attention as he left the room.

In the kitchen, Minnie, Emily, and Alfred were seated at the bench playing cards.

Minnie looked up as he came in. "Speak of the fox and you'll soon see his tail," said Minnie with one of her rare smiles.

Jack smiled at the three friendly faces turned in his direction.

"You have a big day ahead of you tomorrow Jack, I'd best put you to bed," said Emily, and she led him out of the kitchen amid goodnight wishes from Alfred and Minnie.

Emily saw him into his blue pyjamas and then tucked him in.

"Master Amoth says you'll be going for a trip to the country, but that it shouldn't be for too long. We'll see you when you get back Jack," she said, ruffling his hair.

She left the room with the lantern and Jack was plunged into darkness.

---

Jack was gently shaken awake in darkness by Master Amoth.

"Time to go Jack," said Master Amoth.

Jack swung out of bed groggily and followed Master Amoth to the kitchen. Minnie was at her bench folding dough when he came in. She and Master Amoth exchanged a quick greeting.

"Good morning Jack. You're clothes are there," she said, pointing with her nose.

"Wait Jack, I need to apply this," Master Amoth said, holding up a vill. He sprayed Jack in a pattern he had grown very much used to in the last couple of days.

With that done, Jack changed into his riding clothes and pulled on his boots.

"Master Amoth, would you be kind enough to tuck those pyjamas into Jack's saddlebags by the door?" instructed Minnie. "Wash your face Jack."

Jack washed his face, and then, to Jack's surprise, Master Amoth bent and quickly tied Jack's boot for him.

"Take your saddlebags Jack," said Master Amoth, as he headed for the stable.

"Good luck Jack, and be safe," called Minnie.

Jack nodded and waved farewell as he shouldered his saddlebags and rushed to catch up to Master Amoth.

In the stable, Alfred gave Master Amoth a slight bow, and Jack noticed that Risle and Taiser—Master Amoth's mount—had already been saddled. Alfred took Jack's saddlebags, transferred them to Risle's back, and tied them to her saddle.

Jack took a bleary-eyed moment to pet Risle, but Master Amoth seemed determined to leave immediately.

"Open her up Alfred, thank you," said Master Amoth, donning his malkemist hat and mounting up.

Before Jack had really thought about it, he was on Risle's back and leaving the stable.

"Goodbye Jack, we'll see you soon," called Alfred.

"Goodbye Alfred."

The morning air misted in front of Jack's face as horse and mule broke the relative silence of the pre-dawn with each shod footstep. Though the city was quiet, what sound there was, travelled far. Dogs barked and snarled wherever they passed, but for once Jack was not bothered by them. He felt safe on Risle's back. Not to mention that he had a malkemist master riding in front of him.

He practised sidestepping and turning Risle for a little while until she got sick of it and stopped responding. He petted her in apology and stopped trying.

They had exited the town proper at the river gate. The shanty did not extend to this side of the city, and the city guard worked hard—in what was probably the high point of an otherwise dull job—making sure it never would. Even the mudbrick palaces here were warehouses, not places people slept in. The city's trade flowed through this district and the Duke was smart enough to see that it was not disturbed. Jack found himself with at least one thing to be thankful of the Duke. The side of his mouth twitched slightly at the thought.

With Master Amoth in the lead, no one challenged them as they exited the town by bridge over the River Paspe. Though it was very early, there were already farmers and merchants making their way into the city in the opposite direction. Everyone kept a respectful distance from Master Amoth, even when it caused them an almost comical—to Jack—difficultly to do so. 

The roadway gave way to packed earth and Master Amoth lifted his pace to a trot. Jack was happy to follow suit. His first few paces were unsteady, but he soon found his groove. The sun was still below the horizon, but the sky was brightening with its approach. The twilight It allowed Jack see where they were heading from a long way out. Two malkemists hats were difficult to miss, even at a distance. Their trot brought them to the three riders quickly.

The two malkemists offered nods and the boy Demic bowed respectfully in his saddle as Master Amoth pulled up and greeted them.

"Good morning Soldier Mond, Soldier Korst. This is the boy that Grand Master Waisel has requested at Pamsley. We would send him ourselves, but we can not spare anyone with the appropriate temperament. I'm sure you understand."

Both soldiers nodded their understanding, though Soldier Korst did so somewhat more darkly. He looked like he wanted to spit.

"I have prepared some coin to pay the boy's way," said Master Amoth, pulling a coin pouch from within his coat.

"That won't be necessary, master," said Soldier Mond. "We agreed to take him on the strength of Grandmaster Waisel's request. Two boys are not much harder to feed and keep alive than one."

"You're sure?" asked Master Amoth.

"Absolutely. We would be embarrassed to accept it."

"Varley," he said and then turned to Jack. "Corpa Jack, these soldiers will take you to Pamsley. It's three days ride from here to the south-east. Follow their instructions and you will arrive safely.

"Thank you, soldiers. I leave him in your hands."

Master Amoth turned Taiser around and pulled up next to Jack.

"I don't expect any trouble on the way to Pamsley, but on the off chance that there is, stay close to Corpa Demic. Those soldiers will protect him with their lives. Good travelling Jack. We'll see you again soon."

Jack nodded, but Master Amoth was already moving at a trot towards Corsisan. Suddenly, he turned back and shouted, "Oh, and don't steal anything."

Jack had no opportunity to reply, and when he turned back, everyone was trotting away from Corsisan. Jack urged Risle after them and quickly made up the distance. No one seemed to care that he was following.

Jack was very quickly farther from Corsisan than he had ever been. Soldier Korst set the pace, and he would alternatively trot and then dismount to walk the horses. A couple of clicks at a trot, one at a brisk walk.

Jack's legs were soon burning with fatigue from the unfamiliar motion of the ride, and walking was little relief because he was constantly tripping over his own boots.

Risle began butting him with her large head and it took him some time to realise she was urging him back into the saddle. He concentrated on lifting his boots clear of the ground instead, and gave her a suspicious look. He felt patronised, but she kept her head up and ears forward, ignoring him. He trudged on until Soldier Korst mounted again.
 
The walking rest had limbered his riding muscles and Jack began to pay attention to the country either side of the road, though the pace was demanding of his concentration. The land around Corsisan was mostly bare of trees, with fields of mottled green stretching into the distance. He saw many herds of goats and sometimes cows.  At first he thought it strange that he was not seeing crops of vegetables or grains, but a trickle of memory reminded him that Corsisan was supplied with grain from crops close to the river.

The road was dry and hard for the most part, with the rare muddy spot. It was furrowed with the tracks of countless animals and wheels from the past wet season. Fortunately, the roadway had been mostly worn flat in the intervening month of dry weather, making it relatively easy to navigate, even at a fast trot.

They passed the occasional walker or horse drawn cart, but everyone stayed well clear and kept their heads down as soon as they grew aware of the two malkemists in the lead. There were no friendly waves.

The grass soon gave way to trees, though Jack hardly noticed at first. His saddle had grown uncomfortable enough to demand most of his attention. He was not inclined to complain, but even if he were, he doubted the two terse soldiers would have much patience for it.

They all rode in silence, with only handful of exchanges between the malkemists; one of which was to pass a midday meal, and another to water the horses.

Jack did not attempt to talk to Demic, and Demic showed no interest at all in talking to Jack. He felt alone, but worse, he did not feel safe. Master Amoth had told him to stay close to Demic, but Jack doubted that that would be a good strategy if there was real trouble. In fact, it might see him sacrificed to save Demic. A possibility that Jack was less than enthused by.

The trees opened up again onto grassy fields and they approached a boy tending a small herd of goats. A large buck placed himself between the herd and the much larger horses, posturing aggressively, but the horses and the two mules ignored it completely. Strangely to Jack, the boy did the exact opposite of the brave goat. He shank down behind his herd and did not so much as peek as they passed.

Jack had done similarly himself on the very rare occassions that he had caught sight of a malkemist on the streets of Corsisan. He was quite sure that he had not reacted quite so fearfully though, but then he had not been alone on a deserted road either. <i>Coward.<i>

He turned in his saddle to watch the boy shepherd recede behind them. When he turned back, Demic was watching him.

"They're always like that. Especially the ones from the farms. Primities," said Corpa Demic. They were the first words that he had ever spoken to Jack, and with them said he seemed perfectly content to return to silence.

Jack had been thinking along similar lines, yet it was still a shock to hear Demic say the words out loud.

<i>Why?</i> he pondered.

It did not take him long to find an answer. Jack knew his own thoughts well. They were complex, convoluted. Every thought had a context. He knew for instance that not every farm hand that came to the city was a mess of superstition and paranoia. Some were.

Jack could not see any of that nuance in Demic. There was only us and them. Black and white. Whether that was all he could express, or if he really thought in such a way, Jack did not know.

"We'll water the horses at Split Oak and refill our waterbags," said Mond. The half day of riding had not changed his demeanour in the least. 

By the time they walked into the town of Split Oak, Jack had grown used to the way people treated the malkemists in their pointy black hats. It was therefore no surprise when their party stopped at the watering trough in what might be loosely called the centre of town, and not a soul stood by to welcome them. The squat wooden buildings that sparsely lined the way remained silent and thoroughly shuttered, and the only living attendants were a couple of thin dun coloured dogs. Even they seemed to have more sense than to challenge the new arrivals.

"Draw water for the horses," instructed Soldier Korst.

When no one else leaped to the job, Jack realised that the instruction had been for him. He emptied the first bucket from the well into the trough before realising that there was a bung hole that needed stoppering. Feeling a familiar heat on his cheeks for the wasted effort, he set the bung and tried again.

Soldier Mond took some food from his saddlebags and passed Corpa Demic his share. To Jack he merely tossed a portion, and seemingly without the slightest care for whether it arrived safely or not. Jack gave a mental shrug. Food was food, and he did not care even if he had to run and jump for it.

The horses and mules gathered around the trough to drink, and Jack put aside his food to keep the water up to them. They drank a lot, but their thirst did not last forever. When they were well watered, Soldier Mond set a feed bag on the nose of each animal and then seemed to fill each from a vill. Jack was astonished, but had no time while he was feeding his own face to go see what was in Risle's nose bag. He could smell grain though.

He pulled one last pail from the well to wash down his meal and then went to Risle's head to see what she was eating. She eyeballed him suspiciously as he slipped his hand into her nose bag, and he only narrowly avoided a painful nip before pulling his hand free of the tight confines in triumph.

He had a thick and meaty groat between his thumb and forefinger.

He was no farmer, but he had never seen a seed like it. Slipping it between his back teeth, he bit down on it tentatively and was rewarded with a satisfyingly nutty flavour.

Jack looked towards the malkemists, his curiosity burning, but the only person watching him was Demic. In fact, not just watching, he was weighing Jack with his eyes.

"It's an extinct grain we call Quorth. We create it sterile and use it as feed during travel."

"Sterile?" asked Jack.

Demic's eyes narrowed as though he had been tricked, and he was silent for several moments. Jack matched his silence. He may not be a match for Demic in a lot of things, but when it came to keeping his mouth shut, Jack was an expert. Still, it came as a surprise when Demic relented.

"Sterile means the grain won't sprout."

"All of them?" Jack asked.

"They are all the same seed. The same pattern. We do not create anything that can perpetuate itself. It is strictly forbidden."

"Why?" asked Jack.

Demic's eyes narrowed again, but this time he just looked away.

Jack felt a sting of frustration. He had hoped that Demic would be less tight-lipped than a malkemist, but it did not seem to be the case. He had the sense that he was a curiosity to the malkemists, and that once they understood him, they would answer only as many of his questions as they thought necessary. That is, as few as possible.

It suddenly occurred to him that what people feared most about the malkemists was not the fearful things they were supposed to be able to do—Jack's imagination chose that exact moment to recall a gruesome story about melted human bodies—but rather the impenetrable mystery surrounding the malkemists. Not knowing exactly what a malkemist could and could not do made them much more scary.

Jack wandered over to the large oak tree in the middle of theway. He was almost close enought to touch the bark before he noticed the large ragged gouge in the tree. The name of the town suddenly made sense, though the tree seemed to have mostly recovered. He ran his fingers over the wound, imagining the power that had caused it.

"Lightning," said Soldier Mond from behind Jack, causing him to jump and turn sharply. "You'll learn about it from the loreaders at Pamsley, that's what they're good for." His tone said that he did not think they were good for much else. "Back in your saddle."

The rest of the afternoon was soon lost in a haze of discomfort and the steady clomp of hooves. Though Jack did have enough of his wits about him to notice that Risle was handling the day's travel better than the horses, and even Demic's mule.

The time the four of them spent on their feet, instead of in the saddle, got longer and longer as the sun approached the horizon, and it was not Risle holding them back. Jack felt a swell of pride in her.

Jack's imagination wondered. He saw himself returning to Corsisan, not as a Malkemist, but with enough Malkemist tricks up his sleave to be dangerous. The first thing he did was oust Marten and Sadel from the den and take over the thieves guild. From that base he began to direct the operations of the guild. Cutting up the districts and distributing them to loyal hands, while enemies languished without prospects. Eventually, he rooted out every disloyal thief and either kicked them out of the guild, or gave them a shanty town funeral—their faces slowly sinking below a stream of piss and shit. He was excitedly planning the annexation of the beggars guild when he noticed how far the sun had sunk.

They had passed through two more towns, and now the deepening red dusk set Jack to wondering if they should have stopped in the last one to find a place to sleep.

Jack crossed a stream on Risle's back, letting her pick her was across carefully. On the other side he prepared himself for another trot, but Soldier Korst called a stop.

"We'll camp here."

Jack looked around in confusion at the empty woods. Sparse trees peppered the landscape in every direction, with bushes and shrubs hugging the river. There was no sign of a house or a building, not even a lean-to. Jack looked suspiciously at Soldier Korst, expecting some kind of twisted and unfunny joke. There was nowhere to sleep here.

Yet the malkemists unsaddled their mounts and Jack followed suit.  He found a currying brush in his saddlebags and began brushing Risle's coat clean of sweat and dust.

"I've never nag treated so well," scoffed Soldier Korst. "You can do my girl once you're finished there."

"And mine," piped in Soldier Mond as he dumped a bundle of kindling on the ground.

"Tent tonight?" asked Soldier Korst.

Soldier Mond looked at the sky. "No. We should be fine in the bags."

Moments later a fire roared to life among the kindling. Jack was surprised, but he was the only one to pay it any mind. Soldier Mond set about dropping regularly sawn logs onto the energetic conflaguration.

<i>Where did they come from?</i> thought Jack, figuratively and literally scratching his head.

In the time it took Jack to rub down one horse the smell of roasting meat had filled the air. He had no idea how either malkemist had found time to hunt.

Jack shed his boots as he continied his work and gloried in the relief of feeling the earth beneath his bare feet again.

In contrast, Corpa Demic did very little. He tended his own horse and then set himself down to read from a thick tome. Within a short time he seemed completely absorbed in his study.

Jack moved as quietly as he could among the sticks and leaves until he was able to peer over Demic's shoulder. He was pleased when he was able to read a few sentences that spoke of ancient history and something called "energy."

Jack's curiousity got the best of him as he squinted down at the book in the quickly fading daylight, and he blurted, "Is the whole book about history?"

"No," Demic answered, his voice cold. "It's rude to read over someone's shoulder." He shifted on the log he was perched upon, his crippled hand straining to keep the book from falling. When he had settled again, Jack was no longer able to see its pages.

Jack sat some distance away on the log instead, pulled out his word list, and began reciting. He wanted to tweak Demic's nose, but he held his recital under his breathe. He took pride in how well he remembered the words that he had been given.

"Baby," muttered Corpa Demic.

Jack felt a surge of shame and then anger, and before he could think about what he was doing, he hawked and spat in front of himself in a way so clearly of the shanty, that it made his ears burn. Demic cast a single look of disgust at him and returned to his book.

Jack went to the fire to finish his words, his mind searching for a way to blame Demic for how badly that had gone.

The two soldiers were already cutting meat for themselves and Soldier Mond pulled a leg free and tossed the piping hot meat to Jack.

Jack dropped his words to juggle the meat, only just saving it from falling to the ground. As he took his first bite, Soldier Korst retrieved the word list with greasy fingers.

He took one look at it and remarked, "You're a bit old to be learning to read. Are you a retard?"

"No," said Jack, schooling his face to reveal no reaction. "Can you give me more words?"

"Do I look like your wet nurse? I've got far better things to do." He crumpled the paper and tossed it at Jack.

Soldier Mond watched Jack from the other side of the fire, but said nothing.

Corpa Demic chose that moment to walk up to the fire and poach one of the roasting carcasses for himself. Jack caught a brief flash of anger on Soldier Korst's face, but it was gone in a moment, and Demic walked back to his log oblivious.

"I'd help you if I could," said Soldier Mond. "But there's a good reason I'm a soldier and not an archivist. You could ask your friend Corpa Demic," Jack wondered if he was imagining the faint stress on the title. "But I don't fancy your chances over much."

Jack glanced in Demic's direction, but if the cripple had heard the comment, he gave no indication.

After he had eaten, Jack did not have much to do. He went to the creek to wash up and then rubbed Risle down again. The moon was not full, but there was enough moonlight to move around by outside the circle of firelight. 

He was returning to the warmth of the fire and enjoying the feel of the rough ground under his bare feet when a suspicious shadow by the fire made the hair on the back of his neck stand on end.

The shadow raised its head in Jack's direction, as though sensing his fear, then rose on massive paws and padded over to investigate.

Jack froze for a moment, but quickly recollected himself as the enormous dog drew closer. He folded his arms tightly over his chest and stood stock still as Stine had taught him.  Jack's fear of dogs had always annoyed Stine to violence; he hated any form of weakness. For a while he had deliberately dragged Jack among packs of dogs to toughen him up, but it had never worked, and he eventually gave up.

The animal trotted up with its head high and body taut. The beast's eyes were level with Jack's chest and Jack felt like he was being smothered in the animal's presence. He twitched in terror as the large muzzle nuzzled against Jack's stomach. It was the least pleasurable of tickles. Each sniff sounded loud to Jack's ears, as though this dog was trying to breathe him in until there was nothing left.

At last, and to Jack's great relief, its interest seemed to subside. Yet, it did not leave. Instead it stood in front of Jack as though waiting for him to do something. The tension between them was beginning to build again when a second dog suddenly scurried out of the darkness. This one smaller than the first, but far more energetic. It barked loudly and growled, but cut off quickly when Soldier Korst raised his voice.

"Shut up ya mutt! Heel!"

The new dog reacted with obedient alacrity and returned to Soldier Korst by the fire. Unfortunately, the larger animal was under no such compunction and stood fast.

Jack tried to step around it to get to the fire, but to his horror, the beast blocked his way and slobbered on his vest. He tried not to panic, but his crossed arms and the brute's massive jaw made him feel too vulnerable. To control himself he looked away, stood as still as possible, and tried not to excite those hard bright eyes any further.

He waited.

The dog waited.

Soldier Mond turned to watch the two of them.

The waiting game continued.

"I think she likes you. I've never seen her take that much interest in anyone," said Soldier Mond. He did not sound pleased.

"Maybe she's hungry?" suggested Soldier Korst, and they both snorted in amusement.

"It seems that way, but I don't know if she even knows what hunger is. She's never been out that long."

Jack puzzled at that cryptic comment, but could make no sense of it. Though it did serve to distract him from his predicament for a moment.

Corpa Demic, who was sitting cross-legged on his log and reading by the light of twin villends glowing at his lapels, looked up briefly with slitted eyes. He immediately went back to reading his book, the unfolding drama evidently held little interest for him.

Jack waited, but eventually even he could see that it was not getting him anywhere, so he slowly, and with great trepidation, unfolded his arms and placed his hand on her great heavy head. The fur was surprisingly soft, and when she did not react, he petted her once, softly.

Gaining courage, he edged his leg in front of her and took a step toward the fire, his hand still on her head. He took another step.

She raised her head, and for a terrible moment Jack thought that she was going to bite his hand clean off. Instead, she butted his side and caused him to stumble. He moved again. She dogged his steps, the two of them engaged in an strange and awkward dance, all the way to the fire. He stood there by the crackling logs and wondering what he should do now, feeling idiotic.

Before he could think of anything, she sat down at his feet. Jack seized the moment and moved several steps away. He would have preferred to move further, but he thought it would be pressing his luck. He sat down with a groan, his tired and tight muscles stretching painfully.

Within moments she did exactly what he dreaded she would, she rose ponderously to her feet and came to him again. Her head towered over his eyes and her large powerful body, many times heavier than his, filled his vision. He was getting ready to spring to his feet again when she sat down with a thud.

Soldier Mond gave a short bark of laughter, but when Jack looked up, he was shaking his head.

Jack rested his hand on her head timidly and began to stroke. He was deeply wary of her, but while she was sitting still, he saw no harm in her.

"I've seen her worry a man's head clean off," said Soldier Korst.  "She had him by the back of the neck and flung him around until it just kind of, popped off." He had a patronising sneer on his face, so Jack figured he was lying. Now that she was sitting next to him, she did not seem so fearsome.

On the tail of that thought, she transferred her heavy head onto his thigh, obviously enjoying the work of his fingers. He wondered if she would like the currying brush, but he was not willing to go get up and walk all the way to the saddlebags to find out.

<i>She's not so bad</i>, he thought.

"Oh yeah! That lad at the windmill. The one that threw a pitchfork at me! Little bastard!" exclaimed Soldier Mond.

"And called you a demon."

Soldier Mond shrugged that one off with a lilted eyebrow. "I'm not sure which one got him killed."

Now, Jack believed them. Strangely though, his fear was subsiding.

---

Jack woke to a loud scream. A cry of terror and pain.

The shock of it sent spikes of pain through his own body as it capapulted him to wakefulness. Men were roaring and cursing and calling out all around, just beyond the dim glow of the burnt out campfire.

The scream cut off with a gurgle, just as Jack made out a confusing flurry of movement in that direction. A man leapt the fire and landed close by Jack with a mighty cry, the axe in his hand sweeping at something above Jack's head.

Jack was immediately engulfed in a pile of heavy fur, and from the confusion of his sleep and fear addled brain, he realised that the she-dog had been standing astride him defensively. He felt muscles bunch an instant before she sprung from him like a blanket pulled quickly away. The man's posturing cry turned to a despair filled wail. Jack knew that sound, he had heard it many times in the shanty, and once in a while among the mud palaces. It was the sound a man made when he feels the end.  Death, whether in the next moment, or next week, approaches inexorably.

The sound was accompanied by a tremendous spray of warm blood as the she-dog tore a chunk of flesh from the man's inner thigh and groin. The axe he had been drawing back, ready to deliver a second swing, flew unattended from his grasp.

A blinding light erupted a dozen paces from the fire, causing Jack to squeeze his eyes shut in pain. A general outcry of dismay rose around the campfire.

"Kill the malkemists! Kill them first!" screamed one brave soul into the relative hush.

Those words were met by a scream of rage, and Jack forced his eyes open a crack to see the source. Through pain-teared eyes he thought he could see one of the malkemist soldiers. He blinked against the tears and the blinding light to bring the figure into focus.

Something was wrong. It was too big to be either of the malkemists.

Suddenly, a heavy spear was thrust into the chest of the figure, but it brushed the weapon aside with a single swung of a heavy arm, as effective as a cudgel, and then pounced upon the wielder. It took a broad swipe at the attacker and the man's arm was excised. <i>Are those claws?</i> Jack wondered in terrified awe.

The roar of rage continued and other men fell, but Jack could see no end to the human tide from his vantage on the ground.

Someone screamed in agony nearby Jack, and he turned to see a man stumbling backwards, both hands scratching and clawing at his face. Corpa Demic stood there, encased in the clear gel of the malkemists, his face immobile and cold. There was no pity or mercy there.

"Kill him!"

Jack followed the sound of that screamed command and met the eyes of another malkemist. His body was also enveloped in a protective gel similar to Corpa Demic's, and he looked mad with either anger or fear.

"Kill him now!"

Jack was not the only one to take notice of this new malkemist. The clawed figure leapt forward towards the intruder, unmanning the meager men who stood in its way. Some actually dived away to avoid the terrible claws and impenetrable skin.

"Cowards! Whoresons! Get him! He..."

He got no further as a clawed mitt threatened to decapitate him. A heavy arrow thudded into the back of the figure, but it seemed to have no effect, and the assault was ignored.

The new malkemist raised a sword to defend himself, but the effort seemed futile in the face of an enemy that seemed impervious to assault and dealing out savage slashes in a tattoo of relentless power.

The gel skin of the malkemist was protecting him, but Jack noticed that small wedges of the stuff were being hacked away at each stroke.

Suddenly, a man flew bodily over Jack's head and landed in the glowing coals of the fire, sending sparks and flames shooting up into the night air. The unfortunate man began to scream, his cries mixing with the terrified sobbing of Corpa Demic's victim, who was now on his knees on the ground clawing up dirt in a frantic effort to salve his ravaged face.

Jack spun around to see Risle gambolling around with her large ears laid flat. She reared before a man with a spear and her striking fore hooves forced him to dive aside.

The she-dog pounced with surprising speed on the tumbling man, taking his forearm in her powerful jaws and threatening to tear the arm from its socket. He tried to stab her with his spear, but she was too close. He frantically shortened his grip on his spear to draw back and run her through, but Risle ended the effort by slamming her metal shod hooves down on the man's legs. Jack heard a distinct crack above the general cacaphony. He expected a scream, but none came. The man was unconscious.

Jack got to his knees and looked towards the dueling malkemists. The clawed figure had circled around to one side of the other malkemist, either unaware of the armed men it left at its back, or dismissive of them. The relentless slashing of the claws had worked to thin the other malkemist's protective gel, and as the half dozen men drew cautiously nearer to the conflict, the creature finally drove a clawed mitt home.

The malkemist went still and groaned loudly, causing the men to stop dead in their tracks. The moment of stillness should have been a moment of silence, but the burning man, the man with the acid-burned face, and several others clutching at various wounds and amputated limbs made that an impossibility.

The figure knocked the sword from the malkemist's grip, gathered itself, then lifted the malkemist into the air by his impaled belly with a roar.

Still the surrounding men did not move.

The dying malkemist was slammed into the ground with a thud and dispatched by a decisive stab to the chest.

The half dozen men standing between Jack and the figure began dropping their weapons. Some fell to their knees or bowed their heads in submission.

Jack got to his feet and the large she-dog immediately pressed herself against his side. Jack rested his hand on her shoulders without a second thought, even when he noticed the blood around her muzzle and the spatters on her head.

"Why? Why are you here?" yelled the figure. Jack recognised Soldier Korst's angry voice, but the bright light behind the man cast his face and body in shadow.

"Answer me!" he roared, striding to the nearest kneeling man.  "Answer!"

The kneeling man sobbed something, but it either made no sense to Soldier Korst, or he was not satisfied by it. He dug his claws into the man's shoulder, eliciting a cry of pain.

"The boy!" cried the man. "The boy!"

"Who the fuck gives a fuck about a pampered rich shit?"

The kneeling man tried to say something more, but Soldier Korst struck him, the contact making a wet sound, and he crumpled to the ground.

The other men immediately scrambled to flee, each moving away from Soldier Korst as quickly as they could. Two particular men made the mistake of running together and Soldier Korst pursued them first, cutting them down within heartbeats. Without pause he sprinted after the next nearest man.

One man stumbled as he passed Jack, doing his best to avoid the massive she-dog, and ran directly into the path of Corpa Demic. A puff of fire engulfed him and he fell with a cry of surprise. The surprise soon turned to pain as he writhed on the ground.

Jack was paralysed. The danger was quickly fleeing, yet he could not think what to do. Men were crying all around him. Some sobbing, others whining, and another screaming and rolling around like a madman. The lucky ones seemed to be dead or unconscious. Jack looked at Corpa Demic for a hint of what he should be doing, but he had not moved, nor had his expression changed. He stared out at the scene of human devastation as though it was a completely normal thing. Perhaps even a desirable thing.

A flicker of irritation marred Corpa Demic's smooth, cold features and his eyes fixed on the screaming man. As he stared, his frown deepened. Then, as quickly as it had appeared, the frown was gone and he was moving.

Jack watched on with confusion as the crippled boy picked up an axe. The same axe that one of the men had tried to kill the she-dog with. The recollection made Jack look for that man and Jack's eyes found him quickly.

He was not one of the crying men. He was very clearly dead.

Corpa Demic dragged the axe back in his good hand. All the way back to the screaming man. Flames were still wicking unabatedly on his clothes and skin. Jack could not see Demic's face as the boy used his crippled hand to help lift the heavy double-bladed axe awkwardly above his head. He brought the weapon down convulsively and hit the screaming man in the head.

With the flat of the blade.

The screaming changed tone and Corpa Demic cursed.

"Here," he growled. "You do it!" He held out the axe handle for Jack to take.

"What?"

"Kill him."

"I can't do that."

"You have to. His screams annoy me."

On those words, the screaming stopped, and they turned to look at the burning man together. Though the screaming had stopped, the flames had not, and the smell of burning flesh was intensifying.

"He'll wake up again, and he'll scream," Corpa Demic said after a long pause. They stared at each other. A hoarse scream sounded in the distance.

"He will die anyway," continued Corpa Demic. "They will all die.  They are koyim who attacked malkemists. They are koyim who killed a malkemist." He gestured vaguely to the other side of the fire and Jack's eyes followed.

He saw Soldier Mond's body for the first time, a spear still lodged in his chest.

"Korst will kill them all eventually. He can't let them live." There was a note of pleading in his voice now.

Jack took the axe from Demic grimly. Unlike Demic's soft hands, his had held an axe before. He knew how to use it. A wood splitter was an axe afterall. He set his feet purposefully, visualising where he would strike.

He swung the axe up in a smooth arc, his left hand sliding up and along the haft, and then brought it down in a rush.

The axe burried itself in the loamy soil. It surprised him when the man's head rolled free of his body. Demic's eyes were wide when they met Jack's.

The sobbing man with the acid burned face did not look up as Jack took his head. Jack could not help but think of Master Greon. They continued to move from man to man. Mercifully, many were already dead or unconscious. One man was dragging himself slowly toward safety over the leaves and broken twigs, his legs a dead weight behind him. Demic barred his path, spear in hand.

"Let me go young master," he begged.

He was promising to never tell a soul when his head rolled free.

They found Soldier Korst's dog lying on its side and breathing raggardly. A wound through its chest was surrounded by a foam of bloody bubbles. Jack set himself to put it out of its misery.

"No! Don't do that," said Demic with an anxious note in his voice.

"Huh? I thought malkemists didn't follow the Cayophant."

"Not that idiot. We created the Cayophant. Korst will handle his mimeo when he returns. He won't be happy if you destroy it."

Jack was relieved enough to be free of the task.

There was a sound behind them and they both spun to face it.  Soldier Korst came stumbling out of the forest, his face ashen and haggard. He had shrunk to his normal proportions and his white linen shirt was soaked in blood.

"Water," he ordered in a coarse voice.

Jack dropped the axe and ran to collect a waterskin. He brought it to where Soldier Korst was staring down at Soldier Mond's body. The soldier took the waterskin without a word and drank deeply.

"He was stronger than me," he said aloud but to himself. He frowned and looked at the she-dog. "Where were you bitch?" he demanded, kicking loose dirt and twigs in her direction.

She lifted her head, but otherwise ignored the gesture. He stared at her malevolently.

"You were always troublesome. I warned him to destroy you many times. That was his mistake." Gritting his teeth, he stalked unsteadily to the discarded axe and picked it up.

Jack could see what he was about by the glint in his eye. So too, evidently, could the she-dog. She rose to her full height, hackles raised and teeth bared in a feral display.

The sight of her gave Soldier Korst pause, but his anger overrode his caution and his wounds as he advanced on her.

"No!" Jack yelled, placing himself between the two, his back to the snarling canine.

"Fuck off out of the way."

Jack wanted to get out of the way, but his legs stupidly refused to yield. All he knew was that he needed to protect her, even though he doubted he could. Soldier Korst drew back the flat of the axe, ready to batter Jack's skull.

"We need her," broke in Demic unexpectedly.

"She shouldn't even be alive. She needs to be put down now."

"If we're attacked again, we'll need her."

Soldier Korst stared hard at Corpa Demic for several moments.

"I decide what we need," replied Soldier Korst truculently, but he had already turned his back and buried the head of the axe in the ground.

Jack watched him walk away warily, but it was no trick. The man's mercurial temper was disconcerting.

He went to his own dog and knelt beside it. Jack was surprised to see him stroke the animal's head tenderly. For a moment, Jack could not believe what he was seeing, the dog grew translucent before his eyes, then transparent.  That which remained quickly gathered and coagulated in the air, then rushed into the waiting villend in Soldier Korst's hand. The dog had completely disappeared.


Soldier Korst got up and seemed to take in the extent of the decapitated bodies.

"Who did this?"

"He did," said Demic quickly, pointing at Jack.

"Impressive retard. Remind me to sleep with one eye open from now on." He walked to his saddlebags, his body bent over in pain and his steps unsteady. "I've got some patching to do, you two backtrack down the road and bring back their horses. They're staked out at three hundred paces or so. Go." His voice was pained and even shorter on patience than usual.

Jack was more than happy to leave the camp and headed immediately for the creek. The she-dog followed closely on his heels. Demic hesitated, but he soon followed too.

Jack trudged barefoot through the creek without missing a beat, the icy cold water a pleasant and revitalising shock to his frayed nerves. His legs were stiffer than they had been, even immediately after the ride, but the last thing he wanted to do right now was climb back into a saddle. In contrast, Demic cursed as he walked through the creek. Jack imagined that his stockings were becoming thoroughly waterlogged.

"I shouldn't be taking orders from a soldier," Demic grumbled. He had fashioned a torch from one of his lighting villends and a tube of leather. Jack found it annoying. Demic never seemed to be pointing it in the right direction, and if Jack tried to look anywhere else, his night eyes were so badly ruined that he may as well have been blind. He felt a strong urge to rip it from the other boy's grasp and either throw it away or use it himself.

They found the horses quickly. Jack was surprised to find that there were only four of them, since there had been far more men than that. He said so out loud.

"You thought they could all afford a horse?" asked Demic in an uncharitable tone. "Be careful with that fancy one," he said, pointing.

"Why?"

"That's the malkemist's horse obviously. Sometimes they're trained to hurt people."

"You're a malkemist, you handle it then."

"Good one. Malkemists are people too."

Jack snorted and turned his back on Demic. He approached the large black horse carefully. Demic unhelpfully shone the torch in his direction, which was the last thing he wanted or needed. He edged closer. The light glinting off the beast's eye gave it a wild cast, and Jack was not sure that touching it would be a good idea at all.

Suddenly, Demic gave a cry and the light flashed away, leaving Jack in darkness. Demic's carelessness made Jack angry. He turned to curse him out, but Demic was lying facedown on the ground, an arrow sticking from his back.

Jack dropped down into a crouch. This time, he heard the thrum of a bowstring, and a rattle as the arrow skittered across the ground behind him. The archer cursed in the darkness, but Jack could not see well enough to make him out. She she-dog growled and shot from his side. Jack ran after her as quickly as he could, his stiff legs forgotten and ignored. The archer could see him in the dark, but Jack could not see the archer.

He grabbed up the torch that Demic had dropped and turned it on the archer, catching the man mid-draw. The archer cursed again, caught between shooting the dog or the light in Jack's hand.

He never got to choose before the she-dog bowled into him. Jack ran up with the torch, intending to blind the man, but it was not necessary. The she-dog had bitten down on the man's face and was shaking him about vigourously. Jack heard his neck snap with a crack.

Wasting no time, he ran back to Demic. To his relief, the boy was still breathing. He rolled him onto his side, careful not to touch the arrow that had passed from back to front.

Demic's eyes fluttered open with a groan.

"What?"

"You were shot. There's an arrow in you."

"Shit!"

"Can't you heal it?"

"I'm not a malkemist Jack," he said, pausing for a pained breath. "I'm not even supposed to make villends, let alone use them." He closed his eyes for a moment, his breath coming in small gasps.

"I. Need. Korst."

Jack slowly released him, making sure that he did not roll back over onto the arrow. Then he ran.

He sprinted into the camp short of breath, noticing two things at once. The decapitated heads were now neatly lined up on the log, their eyes turned away from the camp, and Soldier Korst lay by the fire and amid several dead bodies. He was evidently trying to sleep, but he cracked an eye as Jack rushed up.

"What?" he challenged.

"Demic's been shot!" Jack blurted.

Both of the soldier's eyes flew open, shocked and alert. Alarm was building on his face, perhaps even panic. Jack did not wait to see. He was already running back the way he had come. Soldier Korst overtook him only a dozen paces from the torch that picked Demic out in the dark.

He stopped short of the wounded boy in dismay, both hands clenched in his hair.

"Fuck. Shit. Shit. Shit. Shit."

Demic lay as still as death, the shaft of the arrow gruesomely large in comparison to his frail chest.

"Is he dead?" Soldier Korst asked softly.

Jack did not think the question was for him, so he kept his mouth shut. Demic's eyes fluttered open and stared at Soldier Korst. The expression on the man's face was not encouraging by any palliative measure.

"Give it to me straight doc," said Demic in a pained whisper. It was the first time Jack had heard him say anything even remotely funny. His sense of humour was as twisted as his hand.

"I think you should be dead," said Soldier Korst in a flat, numb voice. "That arrow looks like it goes straight through your heart."

Demic did not answer, and Soldier Korst shook himself into action.  He pulled two small, pretty rods from his vest, each transparent and no wider than his palm. He then took out a villend and seemed to pretend to wind a thread from it around one rod and then the other. Seeing nothing, Jack thought he was playing until he gripped each rod in either hand and pulled them apart to a sudden stop. The rods were connected by a very thin and very strong string of some kind. Whatever held them together was invisible.

The soldier knelt by Demic's chest and passed the rod's either side of the arrow, close to Demic's shirt. To Jack's surprise, the length of arrow sticking out of Demic's chest fell off cleanly.

Demic groaned in pain.

Soldier Korst put the villend to one of the rods, waited a moment, and then packed all three away in his vest. He then tore great rents in Demic's shirt, front and back.

"I don't have enough of my healing villend left to heal you, but it might be enough to keep you alive."

Demic said nothing, just stared into the soldier's face. Each breath was obviously causing him pain.

"I need you to pull the arrow out Jack. Get behind him and put your feet either side of it. Pull it out quickly. Don't try to be gentle. Then get the fuck out of the way. You clear?"

Jack nodded and took up his position as instructed. Demic groaned again as Jack gripped the shaft. He looked Soldier Korst in the eye.

"When you're ready," mocked Soldier Korst, saluting him with a silver vill in his hand as though offering a toast, his bravado a thin veneer over his fear.

Jack imagined Demic's pain, and the pain that was about to be visited upon him. He wondered if it would not be kinder to let him die. Yet, Soldier Korst, who had faced down a dozen armed men and another malkemist without a hint of fear, was terrified of Demic's death. He would not be letting Demic go to any kind of rest if he could help it.

Jack pulled the arrow.

For a terrible moment he thought the shaft was struck fast beyond the ability of his muscles to pull out, but at the last moment it sprung free. He was not sure if he heard or he felt the shaft grind against bone, but of course it was both. The vibration of it in his hands made them tickle unpleasantly, and the sound in his ears set his teeth on edge.

Demic gave a short cry and then fell silent.

Jack rolled away and onto his feet with the bloody arrow in his hand to watch Soldier Korst work.

Demic's unsupported body rolled over onto its back, his head lolling lifelessly.

Soldier Korst lined up the welling wound with the silver vill and released three clear drops.

"That's it?" Jack asked.

"Shut yer face."

It was everything he had left.

Soldier Korst's face was strained, and Jack found himself watching the wound just as intently as the soldier. Nothing seemed to be happening. They waited for what seemed a very long time to Jack, but was perhaps only a hundred heart beats.

The grim soldier took a flap of Demic's rent shirt and dabbed the blood over the wound. Jack's eyebrows rose when he saw whole flesh beneath. Red and enflamed flesh, but whole.

"You healed him," Jack breathed in awe, but the soldier shook his head.

"No. I don't think so. There wasn't enough."

He rolled Demic away and onto his side to inspect the wound. Jack had to get up and step over Demic to see for himself.

The rear wound was unchanged. Under the leaf litter the soldier brushed aside, it still bled. He sat there staring pensively at the wound for some time, before suddenly standing and going to the dead malkemist's horse. Jack noticed wryly that the animal was as quiet as a mouse as the soldier rifled through its saddlebags to withdraw a beautifully clean white linen shirt.

He tore strips from the shirt as he returned.

"We need to clean the wound so it doesn't get infected. Hold this." He passed Jack the now tattered shirt.

From the seemingly inexhaustable supply of vills tucked away in his vest he withdrew another and poured an incongruous amount of liquid from it over the wound, and then soaked the strip of linen in his hand.

Jack could smell alcohol, and he winced on Demic's behalf as the soldier roughly wiped the wound clean. He took another strip from Jack, folded and then soaked it, before pressing it against the bloody hole.

"Hold that."

Jack held the cold wet fabric in place gingerly, watching in fascination as individual spots of red bloomed on the surface.

Meanwhile, Soldier Korst fashioned a sticky patch from a square patch of linen and a different vill entirely. Waving Jack away, he set it over the wound, and then rocked back on his heels and took a deep breath, his expression worried.

"I'm far better at putting holes in people than patching them up, even when I have plenty of my healing villend. I just hope it was enough to heal the lung. If not, we'll be dragging a corpse around before too long." He pressed his thumbs tightly against his brow ridge. "If that happens, you're on your own, cause I'll be riding west."

"It wasn't your fault," said Jack.

The soldier snorted without amusement.

"Have you ever heard the expression, there's no honour among theives?"

Jack nodded, though truthfully he had never heard it before.

"Well, among malkemists, forgiveness is an even rarer trait. I'd sooner rely on the kindness of a pack of wild dogs."

Soldier Korst created a crude litter and fastened it to the dead malkemist's horse—an exceptionally docile animal—and it dragged Demic back to camp. Jack expected the soldier to go back to sleep, but instead he began saddling his horse. Without a word, Jack followed suit, first saddling saddling Risle and then Demic's mule.

The soldier saddled Soldier Mond's horse as well, and Jack expected him to throw the corpse over the saddle, but instead he began stripping the body. It was the first time that Jack had seen the inner vest that the malkemists used to carry vills. He was fascinated to see row after row of small pouches, each with a small vill poking out.

"Maybe Soldier Mond had a healing villend," suggested Jack. Soldier Korst turned eyes on him that spoke volumes of his serious reservations about Jack's intelligence.

"He had many. Of different types to boot. Yet, completely useless to me, or almost any other malkemist for that matter. If we make it as far as Pamsley, I'll hand them over to a master. They might have someone who can sense some of them well enough to make use of. Same with his," he pointed towards the other dead malkemist.

He stripped both malkemist corpses naked and then applied a villend to each which encased the flesh in the clear protective gel that Jack had been seeing regularly. Instead of covering the tops of the corpses though, they opened up like shallow tubs. They looked like transparent coffins, Jack had seen quite a few of those, at least the wooden variety. The soldier stood over Soldier Mond's body as though he wanted to say something, but ultimately, he did not. Instead, he opened a new villend and upended a torrent of liquid into the tub. Jack was as amazed as ever to see so much come from such a small bottle. He noticed that the soldier was very, very careful not to splash the liquid out of the tub. Soldier Mond's body began to bubble and fizz. Soldier Korst did the same to the other malkemist, then turned his back on the both of them and walked away.

Jack stood there watching the bodies bubble. He could not see well by the light of the malkemist lamp, but it seemed that the bodies had began to darken. A few moments later he rushed back to help Soldier Korst, who had began tying the four extra horses and Demic's mule into a train.

As they mounted up, Jack could not contain himself any longer.  "Aren't we going to take Soldier Mond?"

The soldier did not even look around to answer. "There is no Soldier Mond. By sunrise, he'll be a greasy black stain on the ground."

Soldier Korst passed the reins of the train lead, Demic's mule, to Jack. He felt a moment of panic. <i>I can't handle five of them by myself!</i> He opened his mouth to protest, but Soldier Korst was already moving off, leading the dead malkemist's horse and Demic's shallowly rasping body down the road. Jack was forced to take a deep breath and signal Risle forward. He was pleasantly surprised when the train settled into a neat and orderly file. He looked back at the mess they were leaving behind, but the only thing that met his eyes were the seven severed heads perched on the log. He imagined their vacant stares following him as he rode away, but of course he could not see their eyes, open or closed, by the dim moonlight.

***

Demic woke after sunrise and demanded water. Soldier Korst obviously expected Jack to attend to the corpa, but since Jack had four horses and a mule on lead, he was forced to do it himself.  Jack was diplomatic enough to avoid eye contact while the soldier served the young corpa water.

Demic drank a lot, despite each swallow causing him pain.

"I can put you to sleep. You want that?" asked Soldier Korst.

Demic shook his head and subsided back into his litter. Soldier Korst had been clever enough to construct the litter in such a way that as few of the knocks and bumps from the road jolted Demic as possible. However, within only a short time, Demic was croaking for the soldier's attention.

He scarfed down the proferred sleeping draught with little of his usual reserve.

After the boy fell asleep, Soldier Korst reached beneath the litter. He withdrew his hand and Jack saw wet blood on his fingertips. The soldier shook his head as he adjusted the boy's blanket, surreptitiously wiping the blood on the dark wool.

Jack frowned in disapproval, wondering what Minnie would do to someone she caught doing that.

They kept the horses moving at a walk, since the litter allowed nothing else. Jack would have preferred to walk on his own two feet, since he was still barefooted, yet he followed Soldier Korst's lead instead. Meanwhile, his boots sat over Risle's rump, jostling about uselessly. Soldier Korst did not seem to care if he wore them or not.

Demic's breathing became more and more strained as the morning wore on, and the soldier would look back anxiously at Demic on the more pronounced rattles and wheezes. Jack wanted to ask why they were continuing onward towards Pamsley, when Corsisan was much closer, but he did not dare, given the faces the soldier was pulling. The man checked in on Demic every click or so, and in between he stood in his stirrups, straining forward, as though he could eat up the road faster that way.

Still they progressed at a walk.

At midday, they entered a small town and approached the central well.

"Draw water."

Jack jumped down immediately and began pulling water for the horses. He watched from the corner of his eye as the irritable Soldier Korst woke Demic.

Demic made soft mewling noises as he was roused. The soldier fed the boy water slowly and patiently, like a sinner performing a penitence. He seemed changed for the better as he tended Demic. Jack was not fooled.

He continued to haul water for the animals. He was almost finished when Soldier Korst's boot caught him squarely and painfully in the butt, threatening to pitch him headlong into the well.

"Put your boots on," he growled.

Jack scuttled back to Risle to fetch his boots, and began the slow and laborious process of putting them on. While he was lacing up the second boot, a man approached the well. Jack tensed, his heart flip-flopping painfully in his chest.

"Korst," the man greeted, his voice neither friendly nor hostile.

"Holt," Soldier Korst replied with the exact same tone.

"You going to see the old man?"

"Yes I am," replied the soldier a little pointedly. The question seemed to bear more weight than was apparent.

"I see." He seemed surprised.

"Can I borrow your cart?" Soldier Korst asked.

The man named Holt craned his neck to get a good look at Demic before replying.

"You gonna bring it back?"

"No."

Holt stared a long moment at the malkemist, and eventually the soldier elaborated.

"I'll leave it with the old man. I don't have time to be returning anything."

Holt shrugged and walked away.

"Throw in some straw!" Soldier Korst called out to Holt's retreating back. There was no response.

Holt returned some time later with an elderly looking horse harnessed to a cart.

"She's still alive?" asked the soldier with a note of surprise.

"Yes. And she'd better not die in your care. The kids love her."

Soldier Korst rocked his head from side-to-side ambivalently, as though to say, whatever will be, will be.

"You can take these three. The others might get you in trouble." Soldier Korst pointed out the three horses from the clearing that had not belonged to a malkemist. "And give me a hand with the boy."

The soldier unhitched the makeshift litter and the two men carried it and the boy up onto the bed of thresh. Demic did not make a sound beyond his ragged breathing and Jack wondered if he had been put to sleep again, or was merely unconscious.

"I don't know much about much at all, but that one looks almost done," commented Holt.

"For my sake, I hope you're wrong."

"He's pale as death," mused Holt. He pulled back the blanket and whistled when he saw the blood soaked shirt. "There's why, not enough blood in him to pink his lips."

The malkemist flicked the blanket back into place pointedly.

"Grab yer horse, retard, we're leaving. You get those boots on yet?"

Jack had just finished and was already tripping over them to untie the three horses the malkemist had offered to Holt. It did not help that the she-dog had chosen that moment to be close to Jack and was stopping him from walking a straight line.

"That's a big dog," said Holt. "Can it keep up with the horses?"

"I don't know. It's never had to try before," replied the malkemist as he tied the reins of his horse to the cart and then jumped into the hotseat.

He was some way down the road before Jack had gathered the other mounts and mounted up himself.

***

It was mid-afternoon when Jack realised that he could not hear Demic breathing anymore. He strained his ear for a moment, thinking that it might be a trick of falling hooves that had masked the sound. It was not.

"Soldier Korst! Korst!"

"What?" the malkemist queried in a grumpy voice, his attention on the road.

"He's stopped breathing!"

Soldier Korst looked him in the eye for a bare moment, as though he were deciphering what Jack had just said. Suddenly, comprehenion dawned, and he launched himself into the back of the cart. He pressed his hand against Demic's throat, his body dead still except for the movement of the cart.

A moment later he subsided back against the side of the cart in relief.

"Fuck! You scared me. He's still alive, but probably not for long. We're close though."

He jumped back to the front of the cart and pushed the nag for a little more speed. The cart looked ready to rattle apart with the added strain, but the soldier seemed beyond caring.

When the cart turned off the road, Jack almost missed it. He had not seen the small track leading away from the road until the cart was turning onto it. Strangely, the track proved smoother than the road, and the cart was given some relief. Soldier Korst kept glancing back at the unconscious boy, but even Jack could see that there was nothing he could tell about Demic's condition from where he sat.

The trees around the track gave way to a field, and nearby, a wooden house with a veranda. The veranda seemed to extend all the way around. Two dogs suddenly shot from beneath the wooden floor of the veranda, barking ferociously.

The she-dog rushed to meet the two, the difference between their sizes becoming more and more apparent as the gap was closed. She loomed gigantically over the two smaller dogs. They stopped clear of her, hackles raised and teeth bared.

Their ferocity scared Jack, but the she-dog was not impressed in the least. She did not stop. She did not pause. She crashed into the first dog and scuttled the smaller creature, her massive jaws closing on fur and flesh. The small dog tumbled in a mess, and its ferocious growl transformed into piercing yips of pain and alarm.  When it got its feet under it, it did not challenge the she-dog again. Instead, tail firmly tucked between its legs, it sprinted back towards the house just as fast as it had come out. It did not stop yipping all the while.

A clear, high pitched whistle issued from the house as the she-dog turned on the second dog. However, either the second dog had learned fear, or it responded to the whistle, because it headed back to the house on the tail of the first dog.

The she-dog turned a circle, checking her back, but only took her sharp eyes from the retreating pair for a bare moment.

A broad chested man leaned against a veranda post as the cart pulled up.

"Korst." It was almost exactly the same tone that Holt had used back in the town, neither friendly nor hostile.

"Quick Old Man, please! The boy needs help!" The malkemis gestured urgently to Demic's prone form in the cart.

"You can heal. Do it yourself."

"I've used mine up. Please help, he's dying."

"I don't see how that's any of my business," he groused.  Nevertheless, he climbed into the cart and took Demic's wrist.  After only a moment, he declared, "This boy is dead. Even I can't bring them back from there. You'll recall it's forbidden."

"No! He's not dead! I just checked him!"

"Don't shout at me boy! I think I can tell the difference."

Soldier Korst jumped into the back of the cart and put his hand to the boy's still neck.

Jack waited with baited breath. The malkemist's face became more and more bleak with each passing moment, until he finally let go with a sigh. His shoulders slumped.

"Fuck!"

The other man looked on with bemused goodwill and commiseration.  His face said that he would like to help, but that there was just no way.

Jack felt a pang for Demic. He had not been very pleasant company, but Jack thought that he might have been warming up to him. He watched Soldier Korst closely, expecting an explosion.

The Old Man's face suddenly brightened. "Wait! Did you put him to sleep?"

"Huh?"

"The boy. Did you put him to sleep?"

"Yeah, what of it."

"Try waking him."

"He's dead. You can't wake a corpse!" Soldier Korst's voice was tinged with annoyance and anger.

"While that is true, he may not be a corpse just yet. Try it!"

Soldier Korst took a deep breath before taking out a vill and holding it against Demic's pale flesh. He held it there for a few moments before pulling it away.

Nothing happened. The soldier shrugged, as though that was exactly what he had expected to happen. The other man was a little more optimistic. He took Demic's hand and shook it.

Nothing.

"Oh well, it was worth a try. Sometimes particular sleeping villends can cause the heart to slow almost to a stop."

Soldier Korst drew back his fist, teeth clenched, as though to beat the corpse.

"His eyes moved," Jack blurted as he saw it. The soldier looked and then gave Jack a doubtful look.

Demic's eyes fluttered open.

"Quick! Quick! Heal him!" screamed Soldier Korst, suddenly energised again. He was practically bouncing with excitement.

"I warned you boy. Don't yell at me."

Jack was very confused by the soldier calling this person "Old Man," and the "Old Man" responding with "boy." He looked no older than Soldier Korst.

The blanket was pulled aside and they rolled Demic over onto his stomach. His linen shirt was stuck to the litter, but they yanked the two apart unceremoniously. Soldier Korst tore the patch from the wound.

"Arrow?" asked the Old Man.

Soldier Korst nodded tersely.

"Did it come out?"

"It went straight through."

"Little wonder, there isn't much to him."

"Should I clean it?" the soldier asked.

"No, it'll only interfere with my villend."

The wound was angular and an angry red. The flesh immediately around it was also reddened, in contrast to Demic's otherwise clean and pale flesh.

The Old Man applied a villend without ceremony. One, two drops.  Three, four. A fifth.

"Is it enough?" Soldier Korst asked anxiously.

"It's enough," bit off the Old Man, his tone clearly offended.

Demic took a deep breath and groaned in pain. The groan became a sob and then a cry. He was obviously in agony, but neither of the malkemists seemed particularly concerned now. Soldier Korst's face was awash with relief and pleasure, while the other man looked on with the reserved pleasure of an artisan pleased with the results of his work.

"Clean him up at the trough Korst. And get some water into him," the Old Man ordered. He was already heading back into the house.

Demic continued to sob and groan.

"You heard him boy," said Soldier Korst to Jack, before promptly following the other man into the house.

Jack watched him disappear into the house. He supposed the Old Man was a malkemist, though he did not dress like a malkemist. It made him wonder how many people he had walked past without knowing that they were a malkemist.

The she-dog was pacing the front of the veranda and occassionally sniffing her surroundings, as Jack had often observed dogs to do.  Demic was still on his side in the cart, breathing more deeply, but raggardly. There were tears of pain in his eyes when Jack offered him water.

He was thirsty, but refused to sit up. Instead, Jack poured a little water into Demic's mouth, waited for him to swallow, then repeated until Demic waved him off.

"I have to clean you," Jack explained, wondering how he was going to carry Demic to the trough.

Demic shook his head in near panic, his eyes pleading with Jack not to touch him.

"It hurts," he managed to croak.

"But they healed you. You should be better."

"Not yet. One. More. Thing."

"Varley," Jack reassured, hoping that Demic would not exert himself any further. Now he had a problem. He could not take Demic to the trough in pain like this, but he still needed to wash him.

He decided to bring pail over and wash him on the cart. He fetched the dead malkemist's tattered shirt from his saddlebags and ripped some more rags from it. With the pail of water and rags perched on the cart, he went and got a large knife from Soldier Korst's saddle sheath.

Jack cut what remained of Demic's shirt from him with the knife, which turned out to be scarily sharp, and began soaking a rag in the pail of water. Fortunately, he had not had to move Demic to get his shirt off.

He heard raised voices in the house, but could not make out what was being said. Demic did not seem impressed that Jack was persisting with the task that Soldier Korst had set him, but there was very little that the pained corpa could do to stop him.

"I'm sorry, this is going to be cold," Jack apologised as he wrung out the linen rag.

Demic glared angrily, his jaw clenched, as Jack wiped his face clean. From there, he worked downwards the same way Minnie would have washed him, though he imagined that he was much gentler. The thought made him smile.

Demic hissed as the cloth scraped over the left side of his chest, but he either chose not to complain, or could not.

Jack finished washing Demic's upper body before either malkemist returned. Demic's pants had blood stains on them, but Jack figured that could wait and fetched him a clean shirt instead.

"No," said Demic. "Not yet. Blanket."

Jack left him there to tend to the horses. He could not see a well, but fortunately the trough was full. None of the horses had been ridden hard, but they had all had a saddle on since before dawn.

Jack took off all the saddles and hung them on the veranda rail. He then unhitched the nag, but immediately regretted it. She had been holding the cart still, and as soon as it was unhitched it began to roll backwards. He was forced to let go of her to catch the cart before it took off. The nag moved off to graze and he was left holding the cart in place like an idiot. He tried to call her back, but she did not so much as lift her head from the grass, as he clicked, clucked, and crooned for her attention.

Risle came over, but she was more hinderance than help. He almost lost his hold on the cart altogether as she nudged him affectionately. The situation was feeling desperate, with the cart pulling strongly against his hold, despite the gentleness slope. He imagined Corpa Demic careening back down the track, off into the field, to finally crash among the trees. The mental image was so vivid it gave him a cold chill from his crown down.

Eventually, it occurred to him that he could use the veranda as a stop. He angled the cart back towards the house and let it roll backwards until it gently bumped up against the veranda. Demic gave a growl on the contact, but made no remark.

He jumped up onto the veranda to grab a piece of firewood and chocked the wheel opposite the corner of the cart that was now resting against the veranda.

Jack took a deep breath in relief and went to rub down the animals, starting with Risle.

Not knowing the animals, he haltered them to the veranda, all except Risle and the nag. He thought he could trust those two, and Risle did stay close, but when he looked about to rub down the nag, she was threatening to disappear into the treeline.

He ran a few paces towards the trees, but he so encumbered in his boots that he stopped. Reaching down, he was about to loosen his laces when Risle nudged his side, almost sending him sprawling.

<i>Was it possible?</i> he wondered. Without considering any further he moved to her side and tried to jump up onto her bare back.

Not even close. He put his hand on the ridge of her shoulders the next time and managed to get his ribs onto her back, and from there he squirmed the rest of the way.

He set her off at a gallop, and it felt good. It felt natural. This was the way he was meant to ride. Jack grinned the entire way.

He made it to the nag only to realise that he had not grabbed a halter, and he swung around to go get one.

When he fixed his sights on the house, he realised that the two malkemists were standing on the veranda watching him. Jack urged Risle up to the veranda rail self-consciously to take a halter.

"Leave her be, she's fine. She won't go anywhere," said the Old Man. Jack let the halter fall back onto the rail, a little disappointed.

The Old Man went to the cart and addressed Demic.

"Are you ready to get that air out of your chest boy?"

Demic nodded.

"Do you want to sleep for it?"

Demic shook his head with a frown, perhaps offended by the question.

"Brave boy. I'm not going to lie, this is going to sting a little.  In fact, that's probably an understatement. There's no avoiding the first needle. I've made a few tools to make this go easier, but I've just created them, so they won't last long. Let's hope we don't have to do this twice."

Jack dismounted and climbed into the cart opposite the Old Man. In contrast, Soldier Korst took a seat on the veranda, content to let the other man handle everything.

Jack watched intently as the Old Man laid out a bundle of cloth on Demic's stomach, untied a string, and unfurled it with his dry leathery hands. Inside was a row of glass and metal tools nestled inside individual cloth pouches.  The Old Man withdrew a glass cylinder and something that looked like a glass rod with a wide head at the end. He pushed the head of the rod into the cylinder and pushed the snug fit to the end.  Finally, he took a metal pin from its pouch and attached it to the end of the cylinder before putting the whole assembly aside.

The Old Man saw Jack's intense interest and laughed. "You act like you've never seen a syringe before."

Jack had never seen a syringe before and the Old Man knew it.

He pulled a small dish from one of the pouches and then a vill from his pocket. Jack noticed that he did not wear a vest like most malkemists. He poured a modest amount from the vill into the dish, though still far more than the small vill should have contained. He put the metal tip of the syringe into the liquid, and pulling back on the glass rod, drew it into the cylinder. He gave the cylinder a few flicks with his pointer finger, a pointless gesture as far as Jack could see, then began a strange finger dance over Demic's ribs. He seemed to be counting, but he stopped a little below the line that connected the armpit with the nipple.

"Here comes the tickle," warned the Old Man.

Jack watched in horror as the Old Man pushed the syringe in over one rib and under another, driving upwards into the chest. He could almost hear the metal scrape on bone as it went in. Yet, Demic's face was immobile. He did not even clench his jaw. Perhaps Jack was doing enough of that for the both of them.

Then, as though his control had reached its limit, Demic's face screwed up in pain and he gasped.

Finally, the long, slow push stopped. The Old Man began withdrawing the tip, all the while pushing the liquid out of the syringe. By the time the metal tip came clear of Demic's skin, the syringe was empty.

"That'll work quickly. Don't move, I'll want to push the next monster in through the exact same hole."

The Old Man set aside the syringe and took out another two vills.  From the first he began pouring a liquid into his palm, but it did not react like any liquid that Jack had ever seen before. It clung to itself and, with a life of its own, formed into a long thin metal rod. It was much, much thicker than the metal tip of the syringe, but otherwise looked very similar. Jack leaned so far forward, his eyes wide, that he had to catch himself with a hand on Demic's leg. Excitement was coursing up and down his body. He had never seen something, a real thing, created out of nothing before.  The liquids did not count, that could almost make sense. This was different. This was magic.

"Back up boy. Don't breath on me."

The Old Man placed the large needle among his other equipment and Jack reached out and touched its base tentatively, afraid that it might fall apart like a dry mud ball. The man gave him a disapproving look, but was too busy with his second vill to complain.

From the second vill came a long clear tube, perhaps slightly longer than Jack's arm. It looked a little like the gel that the malkemists used to protect themselves, but more solid while lacking the telltale shimmer.

"Boy! Grab me a bucket of water."

Jack started and almost got up before he realised that the Old Man was talking over his shoulder at Soldier Korst.

The Old Man tapped Demic's chest where the needle had gone in. "Can you feel that?"

Demic shook his head.

"Varley, here goes." He looked at Jack. "If you're squeemish, I suggest you go for a walk."

Without waiting for a response from Jack, he picked up the large needle he had just created, and placed it against the small red dot where the first needle had gone in. Jack suddenly realised what he was going to do with the large needle, and he did begin to feel a little sick.

The Old Man pressed the head of the needle, along with one of his thick fingers, against the lower rib, pushing it down slightly, and then began sliding it into Demic's flesh. Jack held his breath.

The Old Man had closed one eye and was squinting intently at Demic's chest with the other. The needle seemed to catch on flesh, rocking the boy's whole chest, but Demic himself did not seem to feel any more pain than he was already enduring. In the needle went, on and on, until Jack wondered why it needed to be so deep.  He felt the beginnings of numbness creeping up his tongue, and quickly took a deep breath to forestall it. He dared not swallow.

The Old Man took the tube and slowly inserted it into the end of the large needle. Jack was not surprised to see that it slipped snuggly inside. The Old Man pushed the tube in until his thumb and forefinger, clamped almost a hand from the end of the tube, was stopped by the base of the big needle.

Soldier Korst returned with a bucket of water, and the Old Man dropped the other end of the tube into it before hanging the bucket from the side of the cart. The tube began to issue slow bubbles into the water and the Old Man nodded his head with satisfaction.

"That went well," exhaled the Old Man with some relief.

Demic's body was slowly relaxing, though his face continued to show strain.

"The lung should expand soon enough and then you'll be right as rain." The Old Man reach up to his right eye, pulled down his bottom eye lid, pushed it back into place with his finger, and then blinked down once. Something fell from his eye into his left palm and he blinked a couple of times rapidly. For a moment, Jack thought that some part of his eye had fallen out, and he drew back, appalled.  But when the Old Man refocused his gaze, Jack saw that his eye was fine.

"Silly boy," the Old Man chuckled at Jack. He packed up his tools before going to the trough. He splashed some water over his hands, then fiddled with the metal contraption at the end of the trough that Jack had mistaken for an ornament. A heavy, very rusty, ornament. He lifted a lever, then pushed it down, and suddenly water was gushing from a spout, filling the trough anew.

Jack was foolish enough to leave the cart for a closer look, his upset stomach almost forgotten. The she-dog nudged him with her mighty head as he went to investigate, and the Old Man soon roped him into working the lever when he got near. Jack did not mind too much. It allowed him to try to puzzle out how it worked. <i>How could water come gushing out of a spout just from pushing a lever?</i>

"Now boy, what are you going to do about that dog?" the old man asked, his eyes on the she-dog as he straightened from the trough, and his tone demanding that something be done. This time Jack knew well enough that it was not him who was being asked the question.

"Your dogs will grow their nuts back when we leave. Problem solved," Soldier Korst answered with his usual tact.

"Don't play with me boy. That's a simulcra or I'm a ten-year-old myself. And I can see clear as day who it's attached to. How are you going to keep it from transitioning! I want to know why before I kick your ass!"

"You could try."

The Old Man gave him a long hard look. "Your pretty wolf suit won't stop me bruising your ego. Not by a long shot."

Soldier Korst changed tack suddenly, as though no confrontation had been building. "The dog belongs to Mond."

"And where is Mond?" asked the Old Man with a sharp and suspicious look.

"Dead." Soldier Korst puckered his lips, and his eyes scrunched as though expecting a blow. Perhaps he was.

The Old Man took a moment to consider that.

"Then why does it cling to the boy like he created it?"

Soldier Korst had no answer for him, so the Old Man continued. "Not that I'm not relieved to hear that you're not stupid enough to sponsor a non-Aware in the use of malkemy. The last thing we need is some master or other deciding to knock that saw-dust out from between your ears. Goodness knows what they'd replace it with.

"Did Mond place a compulsion on the creature?"

"No. It happened before Mond died. Went to the boy all by itself. Strange really, but we didn't think much of it at the time."

"Strange is right. Very strange," the Old Man mused. "So, why haven't you killed it?"

Soldier Korst opened his mouth to defend himself, stuttered, then gave up the effort and closed his mouth. He took a deep breath before trying again.

"I needed it. An Aware attacked us," one of the Old Man's eyebrows rose, "and a dozen men. I thought we might be attacked again."

The Old Man nodded his head as though that seemed quite reasonable, then reiterated coldly, "Why haven't you killed it?"

Soldier Korst stared at the other man a moment before sighing.  After only a moment's delay he started moving toward the she-dog.

A jolt of alarm ran through Jack and he stopped pressing the lever to step in front of the she-dog. She was having none of that however, and as though she knew exactly what Soldier Korst was about, she pushed ahead and gave a bass growl of warning. Her hackles rose to make her appear even more massive than she already was. The soldier reached into his coat and pulled out a vill. Jack struggled to put himself between the two, but the she-dog easily edged him out with her heavy body.

"Wait," called the Old Man, before falling quiet for a pensive moment. "You know what? I've never seen anything like it, and I'm quite sure that no one at Pamsley has either. I'll write a letter for you to take to Waisel. It'll keep you out of trouble, and then he can decide the creature's fate. How long has it been out?"

"Since sundown yesterday," replied the soldier. He was trying to appear uncaring now, but Jack could tell he was relieved.

"It'll start to get hungry sometime tomorrow then, you'll want to have enough meat on hand to feed it."

"It can't wait the two days to Pamsley?"

"Possibly, but remember that the feeling of hunger will be new to it. It's your call. Do you like the idea of having a hungry and confused animal that size wandering around?"

"Hmm," the soldier acknowledged.

Jack noticed Demic peering over the seat of the cart, his face haggard, but free of pain. Soldier Korst went to his own horse and gave it a pat.

"How do you know so much about simulcra?" he asked in a suspicious tone. "Those two?" He gestured towards the veranda.

"I've read accounts dealing with human simulcra. Obviously you can't ask a dog how it's feeling. Or you can, but it doesn't get you far. As for my dogs, you're welcome to inspect them for yourself." The Old Man smiled. It was definitely a challenge.

Soldier Korst grunted and changed the topic.

"What's for dinner?"

"I don't know, but you'd better start now if it's going to be cooked in time." On his way back to the house, he called out to Demic. "Don't you accidently pull that tube out! I won't be using any pain killer if I have to put it back in."

When both malkemists had disappeared into the house, Jack went and helped Demic sit up in the cart.

"You're good at this. I might make you my personal manservant when the masters at Pamsley are through poking at you," commented Demic, obviously feeling much better.

"How's the pay?" Jack shot back.

"More than you'll see otherwise I expect, but probably not enough to keep your dog in food," he smirked through a touch of pain.

Jack considered that for a moment, then changed the topic.

"Do you know the Old Man?" he asked.

"I don't know him, but I know of him. He's very famous. A famous healer named Rainier. He's also very old, though he doesn't look it. It's a taboo subject. Old malkemists, I'm talking about the ancient malkemists, disapproved of extending life through malkemy.  But since it wasn't written into the Semicron, it isn't prohibited either, just frowned upon."

Jack nodded slowly as though he understood.

"And how does Soldier Korst know him?"

Demic barked a laugh and then immediately winced.

"Korst is his son," Demic said a little breathlessly and Jack felt his eyebrows rise in surprise. "Korst is a good soldier, but no where near as powerful as his father. I've heard that Rainier is very disappointed with his son, but the same talk says that it was no surprise, since he only fathered children on Koyim."

"Is that bad?"

Demic's mouth quirked sideways. "It depends who you talk to. It isn't forbidden, but the child of a koyim is only rarely a malkemist. On top of that, the training is essential. Without it, even the most powerful of malkemists would be unable to do the simplest thing. Such a child is never powerful though."

Jack pondered that for a few moments.

"And what about me?"

"I don't know. Master Amoth apparently had no idea either, from what I overheard about you, they seemed to think you're a curiosity. You obviously cannot be taught malkemy, but perhaps there are other things you can do spontaneously that will be more useful. Mond was quite a powerful soldier," Demic pointed towards the she-dog. "Very few soldiers would be able to create and maintain a beast as large as Dolce, but it seems that you stole her away somehow, and unless she has quickened, you are maintaining her now."

"Dolce," Jack repeated. "That's a very gentle name."

"Yes, Mond could have a biting sense of humour at times. You saw.  She's anything but gentle."

"Yeah. It almost makes me believe the other stories they told about her," Jack watched Demic carefully for his reaction.

"I'd be careful about believing too much of what a malkemist soldier says.  They're great storytellers. Though I happen to know most of what they told you about Dolce was true."

Demic took a tentative deep breath and seemed relieved by the result.

"We need to be careful of those two Jack. It isn't in Soldier Korst's best interests to allow the story of what happened this morning to go beyond us."

"Huh? Why would he kill you after going to so much trouble to keep you alive?"

"Not kill, stupid," he corrected in mild consternation. "Wipe our memories."

"He can do that?!" Jack asked, wide-eyed.

"No, not Korst. But his father certainly can. It's a villend for a chemical that attacks the brain. Specifically, new connections in the brain. Any recently grown connections die off, and new connections don't grow for a few hours after the dose. We would forget the last twenty hours or so like they never happened."

"How do we stop them?" Jack asked, horrified at the idea that he could lose his memories. "Protect ourselves?"

"We cannot. Anything we try will be detected, or they will deliver the villend in a way that I never anticipated. I'm a baby compared to Master Rainier."

"Then how?" asked Jack, feeling dependant and stupid, and not liking the sensation.

"We need to write ourselves an account of what happened, and we have to do it quickly. I'll need your help to fill in the things that I missed."

"Varley," Jack quickly agreed. He was fascinated by the idea.

"Good. Fetch my saddlebags to me."

Jack jumped to the veranda from the back of the cart, ran to Demic's saddlebags and pulled them from the rail.

Demic quickly found a pen and ledger among his things, and began writing. Jack noticed that he placed a second piece of loose paper beneath the page, along with a blue sheet, before he began writing.  His handwriting was fast, neat, and fluid. Jack watched in awe as sentence after perfect sentence flowed onto the paper. The corpa began by describing their party and the purpose of their trip, even going so far as to describe Jack as an annoying tag-along. Demic gave Jack an apologetic smile when he realised that Jack was reading along.

All too quickly the narrative arrived at the pre-dawn attack and Jack learned how Soldier Mond had died. Two black clad men had snuck into the camp, somehow scented to confuse the dogs. They had both simultaneously attacked a malkemist each. One had succeeded.

Demic seemed to dwell uncomfortably long on Dolce's defection to Jack, and even the way Risle had fought to keep him safe during the attack.

"Keep an eye on the house Jack, if they know that we are writing something, they will search for and destroy it while we cannot form memories." He flipped to the next page and Jack saw that the loose page underneath contained an exact copy of what the corpa had written.

He wrote the aftermath of the attack as though it had been Jack's idea to put the wounded to a merciful death. Jack insisted that he amend it to show that Demic begged him to do it.

They settled on "asked."

Demic's recollection faltered when he was shot, and Jack described his run back to camp and what Soldier Korst had done to keep Demic alive. He tried to copy the clean way that Demic made meaning appear on the page, but he mostly failed, and Demic ended up changed most of what he said before it appeared in ink.

The front door to the house opened suddenly, and Jack quickly covered the book in the straw while pretending to help Demic sit more confortably. He noticed that Demic seemed much stronger.

"Are we ready to tear that tube out yet?" asked Master Rainier.

Demic nodded.

"Good then, lie back and I'll have it out in a red minute."

Jack helped ease Demic back down, though he no longer felt the other boy needed assistance. Master Rainier rubbed his dry palms together with some relish. He reach out and touched the large needle in Demic's side, it became transparent and then drew back towards his hand, similar to the way Soldier Korst's dog had disappeared. It was only then that Jack saw the vill in the tricky Old Man's palm. Demic winced.

Master Rainier had a very small, very slim knife in his hand, and he used it to slice the tube off almost at Demic's flesh. He cast Jack a conspiratorial wink, though Demic could see the wink just as clearly as Jack. He put the vill he had just used away in one pocket and then withdrew a new one from a different pocket.

From this new vill he released a single drop of liquid into the end of the tube sticking out of Demic's chest. He swapped vills yet again, and with this new one he sucked the tube in Demic's chest out of existence.

Demic gave a short cry, but it was the cry of anticipated pain that never arrives.

"Done," declared Master Rainier, and he jumped off the card and headed back towards the front door of the house.

However, things were clearly not done from Jack's perspective. The relatively small wound left by the needle was knitting itself together in front of Jack eyes. It was clear because this time there was no wash of blood to hide what was going on. When the whole event seemed to have exhausted itself, Jack reached a hand into the bucket and wiped away the blood on Demic's chest.

The flesh underneath was unmarred.

"Looks good," said Jack.

"Yes," said Demic in relief. "I was scared he was going to wipe us both there and then." Jack felt a jolt. He had not even considered the possibility. "Perhaps he's waiting for the villend to charge," he mused. "Quick, let's get back to it."

Jack withdrew the ledger and pen, and Demic set to writing again.  He prompted Jack for different details, and Jack mechanically recalled everything that had happened right up to the point where Demic could fill in the rest for himself.

Penultimately, Demic recounted his suspicion that Soldier Korst, with the help of Master Rainier, might wipe the last day from their minds.

Finally, he wrote, "Corpa Jack rendered invaluable and unasked for service in preserving my life. I am in his debt and intend to draw him into my service as my manservant upon the approval of my father, at twenty percent more than the nominal rate."

Jack, who did not know what twenty percent of anything was, immediatiely interjected "thirty percent."

Demic gave him a very cool, yet amused look, and wrote on, "Nay, thirty percent." He signed his name underneath and then passed the pen to Jack.

Jack printed his name with painful slowness, and embarrassing crudeness.

Once done, Demic took the book back and separated each written page from the copy that had transferred to the paper beneath each. He gathered the loose papers up and then folded them three times before handing them to Jack.

"Store those deep in your saddlebags, but make sure you're not seen. I'll tear mine out and do the same.

This was Jack's element, and had no difficultly making the pages disappear, both immediately, and then deep into his saddlebags.  Somebody watching over his shoulder would not have seen what he was about. When he returned, Demic was standing on unsteady legs by the cart.

"I'm thirsty."

Jack used his eyebrows to indicate the bucket beside Demic on the cart.

"Very funny. Clean water please."

Jack took the bucket and carried it towards the raised beds of vegetables by the side of the house.

"What did your last manservant die of?" Jack asked as he swung the bucket side-to-side with his gait.

"Complications arising from too much sass?" shot back Demic.

Jack laughed, though he did not completely understand. He emptied the water among some leafy greens and took the bucket back to refill at the spout.

As Demic was drinking, Dolce came to nuzzle Jack's hand, and he absently rubbed her head. He felt some tension leave him. Even the nag looked like she was wandering back.

"Ah!" Jack exclaimed suddently. "I should've made you write that you'd teach me more words."

"You want more words?" asked Demic, as though ready to grant them, there and then. "Oh, wait. Not much use if you're about to forget everything your brain grew to remember today. Don't worry too much, my manservant needs to be able to read."

Jack pulled out his list of words anyway, frowning at the tattered state of the paper. As he opened up the folds he noticed a hole worn through on a point that had been a corner. Demic took the abused paper gingerly, his face openly appalled.

"My tutor would have beaten me for treating her instruction so disrespectfully. You're lucky I don't have her arm." He took his ledger and pen from his saddlebags again, and added another twenty words to the list. His flowing script contrasted with the simple print that both Master Amoth and Archivist Melanie had used.

Jack found the word sounds that Demic recited, and their written pairings, simple to match. He memorised them all very quickly.

"Probably a wasted effort. We're both likely to be drooling idiots by the time those two put us to bed tonight."

***

When Soldier Korst called them in for dinner, they had both bathed and changed clothes. Jack had some trouble at the front door with Dolce, who wanted to follow him into the house. Master Rainier was quite adamant that she not enter.

"No dogs in the house!"

He tried pushing her back over the threshold, but she ignored his pitiful efforts.  He tried to order her back, but that was just as effective. Eventually, he had to walk back outside and coax her to stay with soft words in her ear.

When he did manage to get inside without her, the first thing he noticed was the open space. There were no rooms, only a couple of pillars spaced evenly in the centre of the room, holding the roof up. The next thing he noticed was the sheer number of books. He was surprised, though perhaps he should not have been. There were easily double the number of books here than at Sparrow Library.  Staring up at it all, he was impressed, though he felt a twinge of disloyalty towards Master Amoth for the feeling.

"No need to gawke boy. You can read whatever you understand after dinner," called Master Rainier from the dining table.

The tables, the chairs, and the many bookcases were beautifully crafted, as Jack had come to expect from malkemists on the whole.  Yet, when he looked at the floor, he saw that it was unswept. Nor was it the neglect of a week. This looked to be the serious uninterest of years, perhaps even decades. Dust was piled up high in visible mounds on the floor.

Jack was shocked. As poor as he had been his entire life, even the meanest hovel he had called home had had a neatly swept floor. He put the tip of his boot to a nearby dune, just to check that it yielded as he expected. It really was a small mound of dry dust.

Soldier Korst came through the back door carrying plates of roasted meat and vegetables, answering a question that Jack had not even had time to form for himself. He realised that the kitchen must be on the back veranda.

"Wash your hands out the back and then come sit down corpas," growled Soldier Korst, as though they should have known to do so without him having to say a word.

In the middle of dinner, Master Rainier addressed himself to Demic.

"Korst tells me that your father has allowed you to create villends. He must be extremely confident that you will pass your examination."

"The Imaginers have tested me themselves. The examination with the Gatekeepers is a formality," Demic replied stiffly.

"A formality?" Master Rainier scoffed. "I've never heard it referred to as a mere formality before. You must show extraordinary promise for the Imaginers to be so assertive."

"I am stronger by far than the most powerful malkemist in living memory," Demic was going to say something more, but Master Rainier interjected.

"Oh, stop it," he smiled. "You're giving me goosebumps. In living memory you say? Mine stretches back a ways, you're sure you want to stand by that?"

Demic looked a tad uncertain, but he did not back down.

Master Rainier continued. "Unlike you, I was alive the last time the Imaginers decided that they had found the Vern, the one that would clean up our rotting libraries, once and for all. Chap named Busan if I recollect correctly. What a terrible disappointment he turned out to be."

"I am stronger than Busan was."

"I'm sure. Sure. Yet strength will only get you so far. In fact, if strength is as important as you seem to think, we may all find ourselves bowing and scraping to the young corpa by your elbow.  Wouldn't that be the height of cutting irony?"

"He was never trained, and who knows what's really going on there.  It may be nothing when the masters finally examine him."

"True, I concede. But wouldn't it be exciting if he really did turn out to be as powerful as changing a villend without a plith crystal implies. That's some awful heavy lifting, and from the sound of it, he does it as naturally as breathing." Master Rainier lifted his cup to Jack, and Jack could think of nothing else to do but return the gesture, which tickled a laugh from the master.

"The thought of it appalls me be honest," he continued. "I'd see it for myself. I'd like to disprove the ridiculous notion. I cannot believe it! Yet, a wiser part of me calls such rashness a waste of a good villend. Maybe, I tell myself, I don't know my own mind on this. And then I'm forced to conclude that I do give it credit.  Unfortunately, he'll never gain control of it, but there's a part of my old reprobate heart that wishes it were possible. It'd be worth it just to be able to sit back and enjoy the futile knashing of teeth it would engender!"

"I was there when Master Greon tested him. He has no control over the ability," Demic said sternly, as though he were the elder.

"Master Greon?" asked Master Rainier, changing tact with disconcerting swiftness. "There's a man who used to enjoy a far sunnier disposition. I hear he harbours a well-founded hatred of your father. I'm quite surprised he didn't jump at the opportunity to strike through you."

"The master of Sparrow Library forbade it."

"Yes. Master Amoth. A kind heart one he is. Most atypical of a malkemist. He's lucky to have hard-headed friends to pick up the slack for him. His wife! Now there's a woman I'd cross the road to avoid a duel with." He chuckled into his wine before continuing.  "But you'd be wise to fear Greon. It would not surprise me in the least if he has set some slow ticking trap for you. Snap! No more Corpa Demic, the presumptive Vern."

Soldier Korst, who had been eating single-mindedly without special regard to the conversation chuckled at that.

"I hope the prick waits until these two are safely in Grandmaster Waisel's hands before springing anything."

"I hardly think that Demic's father will recall you just because his son has arrived at Pamsley," warned Master Rainier. "Corpa Demic's safety will be your long term responsibility. Which, by extension, will make Master Greon your long term problem."

"There are enough masters at Pamsley to keep these corpa safe, and a host more besides."

"I doubt Grand Imaginer Peele has any of your unwavering faith in them."

Soldier Korst returned to his food without a rejoiner.

"Corpa Jack?" said the master, politely asking for Jack's attention.

Jack looked up from his food, abandoning his ruse of ignorance.

"How much have they told you about the history, the purpose, of the malkemists?"

Soldier Korst gave his father a hard look, and Corpa Demic spoke in a sudden quick rush.

"That's forbidden knowledge for the uninitiated!"

"True. I'm sorry. I did forget that you're uninitiated yourself Corpa Demic," said Master Rainier, stressing the title. "Your air of worldly knowledge disarmed my caution." He laughed heartily at that. "As the son of an important imaginer, let's not kid, you would know the malkemist articles of purpose backwards and forwards. Your examination? A formality indeed!"

"Jack is different," broke in Demic. "He's not meant to be a malkemist. He will never be a malkemist!"

"I don't know," responded Master Rainier in a whimsical tone. "I think we can trust the discretion of our young guests, Soldier Korst. What do you think? They look like thoroughly trustworthy characters to me."

Soldier Korst's face lightened as he listened to his father, until Jack could almost see them thinking on the same track.

"I trust them," said Soldier Korst through a new mouthful of meat.

"Trust is a beautiful thing," the master smiled. "Of course, Corpa Demic could tell you everything I'm about to tell you. He shouldn't be able to by rights, given that every corpa should arrive before the Gatekeepers completely ignorant of malkemy. The only instruction a corpa once received was how to listen to himself. His true self or higher self. I'd like to pretend with you that it was completely different in my day," he put on a gruff voice, "when men were men and nonsense wasn't tolerated. But the truth is, the last true malkemist probably died many, many centuries before I was born." Jack saw Demic frown fiercely at that, but kept quiet. "We live amid fragile lies now. We pretend that the corpas go to their examinations without preparation, while each is in fact carefully schooled since infancy. Even the Gatekeepers themselves must study to perform their roles. As a group we have always adored books, but the prohibition against writing about the particulars of malkemy, of its experience and the sense of purpose that each malkemist gained when connected to his higher self was so strong that when the malkemists began to decline, the art of malkemy was recorded in shameful secret by men and women who no longer understood their purpose truthfully. The articles of purpose were recorded, I imagine, from the poorest vessels of knowledge, malkemists who only recalled scraps. Bottom feeders desperate to retain a connection to the world of malkemy. Meanwhile, the titans, the shining exemplars, refused with terrible forbidding to share their deeper understanding. If you read the articles of purpose, they are tinged with awe for those towering giants of real purpose, and hints of jealousy. We are all bottom feeders now. We may as well be koyim for all the pretty tricks we managed to preserve."

Soldier Korst shook his head in denial, a moue of distaste on his mouth, but he did not interupt his father. Demic held no such compunction.

"The prohibition was only for the koyim!" he erupted.

"Apologetics!" cried Master Rainier, glaring at Demic. "What utility could a true malkemist have for those sickly and pale reflections of knowledge?!"

Demic balked, his eyes wide at the forceful rebuke. Meanwhile, Soldier Korst looked completely unsurprised with his eyebrows high and his eye hooded. His face said, <i>I do not discuss such things with my father.</i>

"Why didn't the real malkemists want to share? If they were so good, why didn't they want to help?" asked Jack.

"Excellent question, Corpa Jack," he said, as though taking him seriously for the first time. "The answer is quite obvious if you are willing to criticise the malclave." His eyes flashed at Demic.  "They refused to pass on that specific knowledge because it was destructive. The purpose, when divorced from a deeper, more nuanced understanding, becomes terrible. The skill of malkemy gives advantage to those without the wisdom necessary to wield that advantage. Just as tenology gave undue advantage to the koyim, their minds and intellects unable to appreciate the impact of their actions."

He took a sip of his wine before continuing.

"Can you guess at the guiding purpose of the malclaves Corpa Jack?"

Jack had no idea, though he was beginning to see a pattern in the master's explanation. He shook his head.

"You're sure you wouldn't like to guess? No? Varlay." His eyes yet again flicked towards Demic as he spoke on. "The purpose of the malkemists is to keep knowledge out of the hands of anyone without the wisdom to apply it."

"No!" Demic rejoined angrily. "That's not the definition at all! We are dedicated to keeping tenology out of the hands of the koyim."

"Yes, that's what I said," said Master Rainier in a far milder tone, his tongue literally in his cheek.

Soldier Korst, who had just finished the food on his plate, forked some more meat from the platter in the centre of the table, almost fiercely ignoring his father's words.

"The point, Corpa Jack, is that corruption set in as soon as the purpose was stated and the lesser men who followed began treating it as gospel. We know almost nothing of the real malkemists..."

"We are real malkemists," grumbled Demic. He did not lift his eyes up this time to challenge Master Rainier.

"You're not even a counterfeit one yet corpa!" Master Rainier glared at the top of Demic's head. The boy's face drew close enough to his food that he probably did not need the fork in his hand.

"We know nothing about <i>real</i> malkemists, because they understood the danger of knowledge without wisdom. Perhaps the largest gaping hole in our knowledge is what their connection to their higher selves meant to them. It's strange, because it seemed to be one of the only things they spoke of openly to everyone and anyone, and yet, for some reason, the bottom feeders never recorded it. Perhaps it was so mundane for them, so lacking in glamour, that they didn't value it.

"As less and less malkemists were able to achieve this connection to their higher self, the more ridiculed the general idea became.  To even mention it now is to invite rude scoffing and rolled eyes.  At best!"

The table was quite. Neither Demic nor Soldier Korst looked particularly comfortable, but they both remained silent as the master's words faded from aural memory. Jack let himself relax back into eating his meal.

"How's your food Corpa Jack?" asked Master Rainier after the clatter of dinnerware had dominated for a while. Jack nodded by way of appreciation. "Korst is no culinary genius, by any stretch of the imagination, but he does have a certain flair for barbequing the flesh of dead animals. Though if you spend much more time in his company, you might learn to detest meat, since it's all he eats."

Soldier Korst did seem to count defending himself against this charge worthy of his energy.

Jack finished his food and immediately asked, "Can I read now?" Master Rainier looked a little startled for a instant, but after swallowing a mouthful of food, he nodded once.

"I did say you could, didn't I. No harm I guess."

Jack rose.

"No, no. Ask first," said Master Rainier.

Jack subsided back into his seat, feeling a little connfused and anxious. Demic came to his rescue.

"You say: may I be excused from the table."

Jack repeated the phrase dutifully.

"Yes, you may, Corpa Jack."

Jack got up and push his chair in. Then, taking a step back, he bowed to the table.

"Oh, my!" exclaimed Master Rainier. "That almost makes me nostalgic for civilisation. Go wash up, and if I like the look of your hands, I'll show you how to respect my books."

"Don't forget your plate. No one here is washing that for you," scolded Soldier Korst.

When Jack returned, and his hands passed inspection, Master Rainier invited him to select a book. Jack walked to the nearest bookcase and began peering at the titles on the spines. He clasped his hands behind his back in the way he had seen Master Amoth wander around his study. Occasionally, a title would not be on the spine, and he would have to ease the book out to look at the front cover. He found several books that seemed promising, but he always moved on, unwilling to commit. At one point he was deciphering a particularly troublesome title when Soldier Korst commented over his shoulder.

"Now that's some lovely light reading before bed."

The title turned out to be, "Plagues: Causes and Consequences." Jack moved on.

Eventually he read a single word that interested him very much, and he carried the book back to the table. Master read the title out loud.

"The Ethics of Creating Simulcra. That's a very interesting choice, considering."

"You have more dishes to wash before you have time for that," broke in Soldier Korst. He did not say it, but Jack heard "retard" loud and clear.

To his surprise, Demic began clearing dishes right alongside him.  However, they got outside he was not much further help. He just stood by the entire time and watched as Jack diligently scrubbed and cleaned.

When they entered the house again, Master Rainier was offering Soldier Korst something from a small lidded box.

"Corpas, you're just in time. Do take one." Master Rainier held out the box.

As Jack approached, he saw two small brown eggs nestled in two small divuts within the box. The other dozen or so spaces were empty. Jack was curious, but confused. He had already eaten. <i>Why would I want to eat a strange brown egg?</i>

Demic took an egg first, turned to Jack, and said simply. "It's chocolate."

Jack felt a thrill of excitement. Chocolote. He had heard of chocolate, but never seen it before. <i>What would it taste like?</i>

He almost missed the look on Demic's face.

As he reached into the box and withdrew the last egg, it was suddenly a struggle to keep the look of disappointment off his own face.

Demic threw his egg into his mouth and then bit down on it aggressively. Jack imagined he was saying, <i>you may have won the battle, but you will not win the war</i>. He chewed and swallowed without so much as a grimace, though neither did he make it seem like much fun.

Jack tossed the chocolate egg into his mouth, opened his gullet, and let it slide down to nestle in his throat. He moved his jaw as though chewing, but with care to avoid working up any spit.

"Varlay corpas! Time to sleep," said Soldier Korst.

"How was your chocolate, Corpa Jack?" asked Master Rainier, suddenly slapping Jack's back out of nowhere.

"Sweet," Jack replied. He had only barely controlled the impulse to swallow.

"Yes, they are. Those aren't my favourites. Far too much sugar.  You'll find your pallet over there by the maps."

"I need to pee," said Jack, heading for the front door. Nobody tried to stop him.

Outside, Dolce was on him in an instant, and he staggered against her as he made a beeline for the nearest tree. Once behind it, he loosened his gullet and brought the chocolate egg up out of his throat and into his palm.

It tasted so good.

Instead of trying to dig a hole, he turned and threw the egg far into the field. Wiping his palm against the bark of the tree, he hawked up as much saliva and chocolate as he could and spat it out.  He made a show of fastening his trousers as he came out from behind the tree, but no one was outside on the veranda to see his fingers fumbling in the dark. He washed the taste of the chocolate from his mouth at the trough, delighting again in the operation of the lever and spout, while Dolce lapped up water greedily beside him.

At the threshold to the house Dolce gave him some trouble, but she was not as persistent as before. After a quick hug, she let him go.

He entered the house uncertainly, feeling foolish for not having asked Demic for more details about how this villend was supposed to affect him. Jack could see Demic lying in a pallet, either sleeping, or pretending to.

"Come Jack," called Master Rainier, beckoning him from the fire.  Jack felt immediately suspicious. <i>Wasn't that it? Sleep, wake in the morning, and pretend not to remember. What is this?</i> He had already decided a plan where he looked to Demic for guidance when he woke in the morning.

As Jack approached, his eyes played over the book he had selected.  It sat unattended on the table. He entertained the small hope that he would be able to read it afterall.

"You can read that in the morning corpa, don't worry. Here, drink this down."

Jack's stomach sank. <i>What if the chocolate was just chocolate?</i> The thought of it appalled him worse than the idea that he was about to drink the villend he had just struggled so mightily to avoid. He may have thrown away real chocolate for no good reason.

Master Rainier frowned at him, and Jack realised that he was taking too long. He reached for and took the cup in the man's hand.  Silver, he noticed.

"I'm tired," Jack said to cover his hesitation.

"All's well, this will help with that."

"What is it?"

"Just something to help you sleep."

Jack wanted to tell him that he slept very well, all on his own, but the master's firm tone left no room for evasions. Jack was going to drink, it was only a matter of how. He sniffed at the cup and recognised spices he had discovered in Minnie's kitchen, but had not learned the names of. <i>It can't be that bad</i>, he thought, and took a sip.

It tasted good. It had that much going for it, but each sip was accompanied by the impulse to spit it out. In the end, the final gulp did not taste very pleasant at all.

"Very good," beamed Master Rainier. "Off to bed with you."

Jack did exactly as he was told. He felt the same drowsiness he had experienced when Minnie had drugged him, and thought he knew what the two malkemists were about.

As he lay there, struggling to keep himself awake against the heavy drag of the drug, he overheard Soldier Korst's angry voice.

"You were reckless. Like your theories haven't gotten you into enough trouble over the years."

"Relax boy. They won't remember a thing in the morning, and I enjoyed the audience. Even a poor audience is better than none. I feel better for having gotten it off my chest. It doesn't do to let such things fester."

"Pfft, that's been festering since before I was born. You know well how to keep it to yourself."

"So I had some fun, let it..."

***

Jack woke to someone shaking him vigorously. Snot probably wanted to eat. Jack felt a flash of irritation. <i>He knew better!</i>

Without opening his eyes, Jack clenched his fist and corked the forearm that was shaking him. The cry of pain he had been expecting did not sound at all like Snot.

Jack opened his eyes like a shot on Demic's surprised face.  Surprise that was quickly turning to anger.

"You hit me! What was that for?!" he demanded in an angry whine that was frankly a little more annoying than the shaking.

Jack knew the answer to that question, but he would feel awkward and stupid trying to explain it to Demic. Instead, he did the most dignified thing he could think of. He ignored the question, and the questioner.

"That really hurt! What did you think you were doing? I'll tell Soldier Mond and he'll deal with you."

Jack turned away and looked about the room. He and Demic were alone.

"Wait. Are you ignoring me?!" His outrage had changed tone, as though Jack's temerity shocked him. "You don't ignore me! I'm Corpa Demic, son of Grand Imaginer Peele! I'll have..."

"Hi, I'm Corpa Jack," said Jack calmly, not looking at Demic.

"I know who you are! Don't interupt me when I'm..."

"What do you remember?" Jack asked.

Demic's eyes bulged slighly, but the question shut him up. Jack fought valiantly to keep the smug smirk he felt building inside him, off his face.

Demic's narrowing eyes told him that he had failed.

Demic rocked back on his heels, and from the look on his face, Jack could tell he was considering his situation from a different perspective. A perspective within which Jack knew more than he did.  Jack caught himself thinking, <i>He's not stupid, just arrogant</i>.

"I remember camping. You fell asleep with Soldier Mond's dog. I...  I must have slept."

Jack leaned in close to Demic and whispered, "Master Rainier took your memory, but you wrote what happened, and put a copy in your saddlebags."

"Master Rainier? Korst's father?"

Jack nodded.

"Why?"

"You almost died. I don't think they wanted anyone to know."

"I almost died?" Demic asked loudly, startling the both of them.  "How?" he continued much more quietly.

"You were shot during the attack."

"Attack? What attack?"

"Another malkemist and," Jack tripped on the word, "some koyim."

"We were attacked by another malkemist? It wasn't a duel?"

"Duel?" asked Jack, puzzled. "No. It was a surprise. They killed Soldier Mond and tried to kill Soldier Korst."

"What? Mond? Impossible! I've seen him duel, he couldn't have been..."

"He was killed in his sleep," Jack interupted, shocking Demic into silence. Jack liked having pulled the wind from his sails.

The back door opened suddenly, and Soldier Korst marched in.

"Where are we Soldier Korst?" Demic demanded with an angry face.

"Master Rainier's home, but we'll be leaving now."

"How did I get here?" Demic's tone was stern.

Soldier Korst looked like he resented being put to the question, but he answered anyway.

"We were attacked by another malkemist."

"He challenged you to a duel?" Demic asked.

"He attacked without warning and killed Mond."

"Impossible," said Demic. Jack noticed that Demic's refusal to believe was just as strong as the moment before when Jack had told him the same news.

"Why don't I remember it?" asked Jack.

Soldier Korst seemed relieved to be able to tell the final part of his lie.

"He put everyone to sleep, except me. And I killed him."

That much was true, Jack remembered, though he noticed that Soldier Korst made no mention of the dozen or so men that had attacked with the malkemist. Jack suddenly saw a row of severed heads watching him from the back of a log.

"We have to go," Soldier Korst pressured. "We've lost enough time waiting for you two to wake up. Saddle your mules." Soldier Korst left by the front door.

Demic stared into jack's eyes for a long moment.

"I find it very irritating that I trust you more than I trust him."

Demic followed Soldier Korst out of the house.

Dolce greeted Jack with her usual exuberance when he came out the front door, almost dislogding the hastily wrapped package Jack had tucked into the front of his trousers. He responded by stepping sideways and giving her think neck a hug. He rubbed her meaty brisket before slipping around her to get to his saddlebags. He pushed the package inside before pulling his saddle off the rail.

Only the two mules and the two horses were outside, and Jack assumed the other horses must be behind the house. He felt a firm prickle of pleasure in his gut at knowing that.

Jack and Demic saddled their mounts and were ready to ride in short order. Jack noticed for the first time that, despite his crippled left hand, Demic could still saddle up without any help.

Master Rainier was in his garden tending to his sprawling plots. He was ignoring their preparations completely.

Jack knew why that was too.

Soldier Korst paid Dolce unusual attention as she drank from the trough, and Jack remembered with a twinge of worry that she would want to eat soon.

Jack washed his face at the trough, but he barely had enough time for a quick splash before Soldier Korst was urging them into the saddle. The soldier gave a wave to his father and urged his horse straight into a trot. They had only gone a hundred paces when Master Rainier's dogs came pelting out from under the veranda, the both of them posturing and barking.

"You mangy curs! Shut yer yaps ya useless cowards," cried Master Rainier.

Jack almost laughed out loud, but caught himself just in time. He did grin like an idiot most of the way down the track to the road though. Fortunately, no one looked at him as they rode out.

On the road, Soldier Korst set a pace that was swifter than the first day. Jack figured that it was because the soldier now had the freedom to move between his own mount and Soldier Mond's, giving both horses longer rests.

Sometime around midday Jack noticed Dolce struggling to keep up. He kept an eye on her, and each time he looked, she was lagging farther and farther behind. He was on the verge of calling out to Soldier Korst when the soldier slipped out of the saddle to walk of his own accord. Jack watched with relief as Dolce made up the distance quickly and drew up beside him to pad along with them again.

He worried that she might not be able to keep up the entire day.

They had already passed through three towns, but Soldier Korst had only watered the horses and replenished their waterbags at the wells they had found.

The soldier called a stop to eat far from the last town.

Jack tried to feed Dolce some of his hard cheese, but Soldier Korst put a stop to that.

"I'll have enough trouble as it is without you confusing her about what food is. Just wait."

Jack was a little startled by the soldier's tone, and immediately suspicious. He had sounded almost polite. Jack looked to Demic to see if he had noticed Soldier Korst's strange behaviour, but he was biting his lip in thought and far beyound noticing his surroundings. Jack caught him casting a furtive glance at his saddlebags before returning to his inner ponderings.

Jack felt a surge of assurance. He felt good for the first time since he had made the mistake of robbing Sparrow Library. He felt like he had a handle on his life again, and that everything was going the way he expected it should. He let out a deep sigh. If he knew what was going on around him, he could get out of its way before it clobbered him.

He looked at Soldier Korst again. <i>Was the soldier happy because he thought no one knew about Demic's near death?</i> If that was the case, Jack doubted his good mood would hold for much longer.  <i>What is the best course for me though?</i> Could Demic be trusted to handle this situation delicately? He might dump them both into hot soup, and then Jack would be reduced to scrambling for survival again. <i>Stuff that</i>.

Jack set himself to puzzling out the angles.

***

Dolce fell behind them again in the afternoon, and Jack lost his train of thought to worrying about her. It was only when Soldier Korst called a walk that Jack could watch with relief as she slowly closed the gap again.

If only she were fed, she would be able to hold her own, Jack was sure. He considered asking Soldier Korst to feed her. He would beg if that was what it took. Yet the moment the words formed on his tongue, he remembered that he should have no idea that Dolce needed feeding, or that she was even growing hungry. Soldier Korst would know that something was up as soon as he opened his mouth.

Jack subsided back into a tense silence with himself. He could not say anything. On top of that, it aggravated him that neither Soldier Korst, nor Demic, were paying the least attention to the failing dog. She could disappear completely and they might not notice until evening. If then.

When Dolce caught up, there were great gobs of saliva hanging from her jaw and she was panting heavily. Jack could not contain himself any longer.

"Soldier Korst!" he called. "Sirness, the dog is sick!"

Soldier Korst turned back halfway, then turned back.

"She's fine."

He had not even looked at Dolce.

The walked on, and the she-dog recovered herself enough not to be panting madly. Jack fell behind the others to let her lap some water from his palm. All too soon Soldier Korst was back in the saddle, and Jack was watching Dolce fall behind again. Her head hung low as she loped forward. She looked tired.

Jack turned back often, and each time she had retreated farther from him, until he turned back at last and she was gone from sight.

When the soldier called the next walk, Jack waited for her shaggy head to appear around the last bend behind them.

He was approaching the next bend and would soon pass around it.  Jack began to play a game of certainty with himself. He demanded that she come back into sight before he passed the corner. He gritted his teeth against the possibility of her remaining hidden and convinced himself that she would appear. He glanced back often.  As the road behind was lost among the trees Jack kept his eyes on the far bend. He willed her to appear.

She did not.

He should not have been surprised. He was no malkemist afterall.  They walked on and Dolce did not appear. When Jack finally climbed back into his saddle, he had given up the hope of seeing her again.

The soldier chose a camp site just before sunset, and Jack became busy with watering the mounts at a small creek that was little more than a trickle of clear water on a bed of sand. Dolce was pressed to the back of his mind as he began to consider how he could slip into Demic's saddlebags and remove the original of the journal they had made. Jack was not about to be swept into any danger on account of Demic's recklessness. Unfortunately, Demic was right there alongside him, watering his own mule.

When they arrived back at the camp Soldier Korst was preparing, Jack inched up close to Demic.

"Here, let me take that for you," Jack offered as Demic prepared to uncinch his saddle. Jack pressed in beside Demic to take the saddle.

Demic shouldered his way back in angrily.

"I can handle my own saddle, thank you!" he growled. "I can do it better than you, even with one hand."

Jack saw his mistake immediately and changed tack.

"It's not that. I've been doing it since you were shot," whispered Jack. "You made me your manservant. I figured that's what I was supposed to do."

"I can't have made you my manservant, I'd need my father's permission for that."

"Yeah, that's what you said. But it's what I've been doing."

Demic took a deep breath through flared nostrils, but looked mollified.

"Varley, but I can handle it," the crippled boy said much more politely.

Jack, defeated, went to curry the other animals. Risle was playful as he brushed her down, despite the long ride. She even bit his bum while he was sliding the brush down her flank, and he almost cried out before he realised that it had not hurt. He whacked her on the rump with the brush and she flapped her long ears down and back briefly before letting them spring upright again.

It was a warning.

Jack smiled. He imagined she was saying: <i>games are fun, but don't take them too far. That, was too far</i>. Jack moved on to the horses.

He was halfway through rubbing down Soldier Mond's horse when Demic appeared at his elbow.

"I can't find it!" he whispered fiercely.

"Can't find what?" asked Jack, his mind once again firmly on Dolce.  He figured it out before the last word was out of his mouth, but by then he had to wait out Demic's indignation.

"The journal of course! I've searched my bags thoroughly! Where is it?"

"Why are you looking for it now? Korst might see you!" whispered back Jack, aiming to stall the other boy. He felt a small surge of hope though. Perhaps fortune was smiling on him. He was snapped out of his worry for Dolce by the choice he was suddenly presented with. As soon as he passed his copy to Demic, the situation would be out of his hands. He wondered if he could hold Demic off until he had a better idea of what his plans were.

"I'll get it to you when it's safe," said Jack, casting a surreptitious glance at Soldier Korst to strengthen the evasion.  Demic's lips tightened, but he gave a slight nod. "They must have known you wrote something, and searched your bags when they put us to sleep."

"Probably. Keeping a journal is a common habit, and Korst has seen me write mine at night."

"What will you do if they found my copy as well?" Jack asked.

Demic frowned. "Nothing. I can't do anything without proof for my father."

"And with proof?"

"With proof? They will pay. My father will handle them."

"You'll let your father know first?" Jack asked rhetorically. "So, after we reach Pamsley." That sounded like a safe course to Jack.

Demic nodded impatiently and went back to his saddlebags.

With the animals happily munching away in their feed bags, Jack screwed up his courage and approached Soldier Korst. The man was kneeling with one knee up, gutting three small furry animals as the fire gained heat.

"Sirness. The dog is still missing."

"I can see that," replied Soldier Korst without looking up from his deft knife work.

"Maybe something happened to her."

"You'd know if something happened to your dog. You'd feel it." He still did not look up.

"What if she's hurt, but I didn't feel it?"

The soldier's knife stopped moving and he took a deep breath before looking Jack in the face.

He did not say a word. Instead, he lifted his knife until the blade was pointed at Jack's stomach. A long strand of sticky blood dripped from the wickedly sharp edge. He wrangled the blade for Jack to step aside, then looked past Jack, his face suddenly patient.

Jack followed the imaginary line the knife drew and caught sight of the plodding outline of Dolce in the fading light. A wave of relief washed over him and he started towards her.

"We couldn't lose that dog if we gave it a red hot go," commented Soldier Korst behind him.

Jack was already running. For once he hardly noticed his clumsy boots. He laughed when the two of them collided and she almost knocked him to the ground. For once she did not crowd him and smother him. Instead, it was Jack smothering her as she panted. He led her to the creek for a drink, hoping to perk her up.

Taking handfuls of water from the stream, Jack washed the saliva from her jowls. She shook her head in irritation, but he persisted until she was clean. She looked much improved by the time he walked her back to the camp.

Demic was seated cross-legged in the grass some distance from the fire, a book opened between his knees, and his lighting villend shining down on its pages. He gave Jack a significant look as he returned, and Jack realised that he could not delay any longer. He was about to go to his saddlebags when Soldier Korst cried out.

"Catch!"

Jack spun his head in time to see something sailing towards him.  Small, long, and thin. He snatched it out of the air with one hand.  It was one of the carcasses that the soldier had been cleaning. It was warm and disturbingly flaccid as it curved around his hand. He did not need to ask the soldier for the purpose of the raw meat.

"Thank you!" said Jack with real feeling.

Soldier Korst may have grunted, but Jack was not sure. He put the small skinned animal in front of Dolce's face. She sniffed at the carcass and then her large pink tongue gave it a solid lick. Almost immediately, she licked it again, this time with even more enthusiasm. Without further ceremony, her mouth closed over the carcass and she yanked it effortlessly from Jack's grip. She padded away a few paces and dropped to the ground with the meat between her paws. Her jaws tore chunks of flesh away from the quickly unrecognisable body and the bones crunched between her molars as she chewed.

"And I was worried she wouldn't have the instinct," said Soldier Korst with a wry lilt to his voice.

Jack could smell a faint waft of cooking meat from the direction of the fire, but that would not be ready for some time yet, and he had something to give Corpa Demic. He went to his saddlebags, which were lying on the ground as there were no suitably low branches nearby. Inside, Jack found the journal entry tucked away behind a flap of leather, exactly where he had left it. Even if Soldier Korst had searched his saddlebags, it was unlikely that he would have found it, because he would have needed to know about the flap and then pull it up against all of the clothing inside to get under it.

Jack slipped the journal entry up his sleeve. Next, he pulled out the package he had slipped into the bag that morning. He peeled back the paper that covered the book inside. Jack smiled softly as he read the title. "The Ethics of Creating Simulcra." He doubted that Master Rainier would miss it at all given his large collection. It might be years, if ever, before the man went looking for it again.

Jack had thrown the paper roughly around the book to disguise it when he had carried it out of the house this morning. Now he took some time to fold and crease the paper around the book more thoroughly. He did not want Soldier Korst, or even Demic to catch a glimpse of the stolen book. Once the paper cover was secure, he walked back to Demic with it.

He passed behind Demic and carefully dropped the journal copy in the grass behind the boy's back before sitting down a short distance away. He set himself facing slightly towards Demic so that he could see his face and Soldier Korst at the same time. Taking out his tattered list of words, he held them out to the other boy.

Demic looked at them suspiciously.

"That's your word list. Where's the journal?"

"You already have it," Jack answered, smiling on the inside.

"Don't play with me, I ..."

"It's behind you in the grass. My word list please, I want to study. You did say that your manservant needs to be able to read." Jack opened his paper and pointed out Demic's handwriting at the bottom of the list.

Demic scrutinised it in a cursory fashion. "If I'd done that to my workbooks, my tutor would have beaten me bloody, and my father probably would have helped."

"Yeah, that's what you said last time."

"At least I'm consistent."

Demic wrote and recited another set of twenty words for Jack. He handed the tattered paper back, and then reached behind himself. A few moments later he had the journal copy in front of himself. He pressed the creases out against his textbook, and then began hungrily devouring the text.

Jack opened his own book, but he was far too interested in watching the emotions chase each other over Demic's face to pay much attention to it. Demic's eyes would dart across the page quickly for several moments, and then return to a higher point to read more slowly. On the last page his features became cold and clenched.

Suddenly, he gave a short bark of a laugh and looked up at Jack.

"Thirty percent, huh? You worth all that?" he asked.

"I'm worth more," said Jack with a serious face, and Demic chuckled.

"Corpas! Eat!" called Soldier Korst.

They both got up to go to the fire, leaving their books behind.

"You're not going to do anything stupid are you?" asked Jack.

"I don't do stupid," replied Demic in a pointed tone, casting a sidelong glance at Jack. "If you're going to be my manservant. My expensive manservant. You need to learn how to address me properly."

"I thought I had it about right," said Jack.

"Not even close."

Soldier Korst had already eaten the lion's share of the meat, but there was still quite a lot there for the two of them to eat. The soldier stalked off into the gathering gloom among the trees without waiting for them to settle in.

"Where's he off to?" Jack asked in a whisper.

"If someone asked me to guess," Demic whispered back, then paused for several moments for emphasis. "I'd say he's setting traps or screamers around the camp. Maybe he doesn't like the idea of waking up with a spear in his chest."

Jack felt a slow creep of embarrassment climbing towards his ears.  He was grateful when Dolce interupted the sensation by padding over and plonking herself down beside him with a thump. He ran his fingers through the thick hair at the back of her neck, noting that she still looked exhausted. Nevertheless, she seemed to be taking to the process of licking her chops clean with great relish. She had energy enough for that.

***

Jack was walking through the forest. It was night, but the forest floor was well lit. He looked up at the sky and saw that it was a solid unrelieved black. No clouds. No moon. No stars.

Despite the light, he could only see a dozen or so paces ahead of himself. Beyond that, the trees disappeared quickly into a deceptively dense fog.

A terrified scream pierced the misty night air.

Jack walked on unperturbed, he had heard other screams like it before. Soldier Korst was out there somewhere. Killing.

He was following a different sound. It was breathy and desperate, and he had been walking towards it for some time now. A trick of the fog conveyed the sound to him as though it was right by his ear, though he knew it was still in front of him in the fog. He knew it was Dolce, though there was no reason why he should know that just from the sound itself.

An outline peeked through the unusual fog and it whispered to him of unease. The outline was not a clean line like Jack had come to expect from the forest. The forest had a regularity about it, but this was regular in a different way. It broke the balance of symmetry that Jack had been traversing, and the breakage was just as jaring as if something physical had been smashed before him.

He knew what it was too. He knew. He did not need it to resolve more clearly, yet it did anyway as he stepped relentlessly forward towards the sound of panting.

There were seven of them. Each a shock against the cleanliness of the fallen log they sat upon. Jack was close enough to see them now, and they were close enough to see him. They stared intently back at him. Not angrily. Not sadly. Just intently. A part of Jack's mind said that the original heads had not had all their eyes open, but that did not stop any of them from staring.

Jack's path was through them, an undeviated course would see him leap upon the log among them and then walk on.

Jack did not want that. He fought against the path, though it was like a rope pulling him through the fog. It pulled and Jack pushed.  Slowly, he crabbed to the side. The heads swivelled to watch him as he drew closer. He was going to have to leap upon the log afterall.  He fought harder. He slipped painfully to the side. For a terrible moment it was like he had hit a hard limit through which the rope pulling him would not allow him to pass. He was going to collide with the last head. He pushed.

And passed within an armspan of the last head, each pock mark, each oily hair distinct to Jack's view as it swivelled with the other heads to watch him pass.

For a moment, he lost the sound of Dolce's panting against the sound of his own. It disorientated him and he came to a stop.

He did not want to stop there. Not with his back to the staring heads. He calmed himself, an odd feeling, as even that effort had an edge of desperation to it. He felt the pull again though and he followed it eagerly.

He did not look back, but after a dozen or so steps he relaxed, certain that the heads had been swallowed by the fog.

The panting did not grow louder, but Jack felt it draw closer. A figure appeared out of the fog, roughly Jack's size. For a moment, Jack thought it might be himself, as though he were looking at his own back, but it was dressed too finely. The figure was looking down at Dolce lying flat out on the ground, her chest heaving. He looked around as Jack approached.

"Looks like you're not so strong afterall. She's dying," said Demic, his tone a mixture of satisfaction and sadness.

Jack ignored him and rushed to Dolce's side. Her panting was like the blowing of the bellows in the smithy shop that Stine worked. A huge rushing of air rather than a wheeze.

Jack put his hands on Dolce's heaving chest, somehow certain that there was something that he could do. Without pausing to think about it he gave something to her. A gift. He gave it freely and without condition.

Jack felt a warm glow in his hands and he imagined her strong again, her body energised and well.

As though a huge load had been removed, her breathing suddenly returned to normal, and Jack himself sighed with relief.

"Show off," said Demic in disgust.

A scream pierced the night, this time much closer and louder than before. It did not seem like a human sound. It grew louder and louder until it felt like it was beating at Jack's skull.

***

Jack jerked awake, his heart hammering. The scream was coming from somewhere out in the forest. Demic was up on one elbow a short distance away, his body encased in his bedding. Incredibly, Dolce, who was lying beside Jack, was still sleeping. Her ear flicked forward and then back, but other than that the loud scream did nothing to rouse her.

The scream cut off suddenly. Silence descended except for the quiet crackle of the fire.

The crunch of foodsteps sounded nearby and Jack swung around as Soldier Korst entered the circle of fire light, his dog on his heels.

"Just a roon, go back to sleep," he said, settling himself back into his bedding by the fire. Soldier Korst's dog came by Jack and sniffed at Dolce.

"Stay away from my dog," he growled at Jack. "Heel mut!"

His dog retreated back to him, head hanging sheepishly, and tail wagging energetically.

Demic, satisfied that all was well, rolled over and seemed to go directly back to sleep.

Jack did not bother to fight his own drowsiness. Imagining what a troop of roons bounding through the forest might look like, he laid down beside Dolce and fell straight asleep himself.

***

Soldier Korst rustled them into their saddles just after sunrise and set a quick pace. As usual, the mules had no trouble keeping up with the horses.

Dolce was rejuvenated. Either the food, the night's rest, or a combination of both had done her wonders. She loped along beside Risle so smoothly that Jack did not even think to worry about her for half the morning. By the time he did take special notice, she had proven that she was back in shape beyond any lingering fear he may have harboured.

The road had begun to climb into hilly country, and the horses slowed as they laboured up the inclines. For the most part they were skirting the hills, yet ever onward and upward.

They stopped mid-morning to water the horses at a gulley that cut close to the road. A small path led down through the trees to a small stream. Jack took advantage of the pause to thank Soldier Korst.

"For what?" asked the soldier.

"For saving Dolce. She was starving."

"She was hungry, not starving. She could have gone another week without eating and gotten stronger every day. It wasn't the food that fixed her. I don't know why she's better, but they'll work it out up at Pamsley." Jack noticed a hint of menace in his tone, and Jack wondered for the first time if Pamsley was going to be an improvement for him afterall. Jack looked to Demic, hoping to gauge his reaction, but the other boy was absorbed by his own thoughts and not paying any attention.

Jack nudged Demic and was rewarded with a frown of displeasure, which Jack ignored.

"What will your father do when he finds out what they did?" whispered Jack.

"I don't know. But knowing him, I expect he'll have them challenged to duels."

"Your father will come all this way to fight them himself?" Jack asked in a hushed disbelieving tone.

"No," said Demic, clearly irritated. "Try to listen. He will <i>have</i> them challenged. My father will ask one of his soldier's, or even an imaginer to do it for him. He'll choose the best. The duels are almost always fatal."

"Ah," exhaled Jack, comprehension dawning.

"Ah," Demic mimicked with condescending slowness.

Jack continued on as though he had not noticed.

"Do you have any men of your own?"

"Of course not. I have no rank. I'm not even a malkemist yet."

"You have me."

"No. I still need to ask my father. Though I don't know what possessed me.  If I'm lucky, he'll say no."

"You do have something. You have information. Information that at least two malkemists will do anything to keep from your father."

Jack left him with that and returned to the road.

A short time after that they rode into a great green valley. The road was surrounded by many different crops stretching far into the distance, and only ending when they butted against the wooded hills that surrounded them.

"Welcome to Pamsley," said Demic.

"You've been here before?" asked Jack.

"No, but I've read my father's journal. He came here for final testing, just like me." Demic pointed at a raised plateau in the distance. "That's Upper Pamsley. It's reserved for full malkemists.  Candidate corpas hardly ever go up there."

"You two will go up there. There are important people on the hill who rarely come down, but who will want to check you over for themselves," interjected the soldier without looking around. "Keep your heads down and your mouths shut, especially around the grandmaster. You don't get to the top of that pile of vipers without being twice as clever as everyone thinks you are. He looks tough and dumb, but he's only tough."

"We're not stupid," muttered Demic.

They passed a few large stone buildings and several men in the fields. Some wore the hat of a malkemist.

"Are those malkemists working as farm hands?" asked Jack, sidling up close to Demic so that he would not be overheard. He was very confused, and a little shocked.

Demic shrugged. "Everyone at Pamsley is from a malkemist family.  The title of malkemist goes to anyone who passes the tests. Some malkemists can barely create an acid wash on their best day.  They wear the hat, but they may as well be koyim for all they can do with a plith crystal."

They broke into a trot and stopped talking. Dolce ran alongside Jack on the road, showing none of her weakness from the day before, despite the morning climb.

Jack was feeling good in the saddle. The sun was bright and the wind was in his face. It smelt clean up here as well. Everything looked healthy.

The few people on the road seemed much more interested in Dolce than any of them, but Soldier Korst rode on seemingly oblivious.

They arrived at a large stone bridge over a modestly wide river.  It looked old, but extremely sturdy. On the far bank was a small town girded on one side by the river and on the other by the cliff face under the plateau. The bridge and the houses were made of the same stone, but different from the stone Corsisan had been built from. Even the rooves were a different colour. In Corsisan, the rooves were an orange hue, while here the rooves were much darker, almost brown.

If it had been Soldier Korst's intention to sneak into town without alerting anyone, the loud clack of sixteen metal-shod shoes on the bridge would have undone him. As it was, it would have been impossible anyway, since four malkemists—each astride a beautiful mount—sat waiting on the other side as Jack's party took the crest.

Jack's mind boggled at that for a moment. No one had seemed to take the slightest interest in them throughout the long ride along the valley. All of a sudden, they were worth a four malkemist reception committee.

Jack now knew how how much effort went into saddling a horse. These men had been forewarned of their arrival well in advance. The rats in the shanty town could send crude warnings to each other across and along streets, but none of those methods would have worked here.  Jack promised himself that he would find out how they had done it later.

"Soldier Korst," greeted one of the malkemists. The tone was bored, not hostile, and Jack relaxed a little. He, and the others, wore black robes that Jack recognised as more traditional malkemist garb.

He tensed up again almost immediately when he noticed that Demic had bowed in his saddle, and he rushed to emulate him quickly, anxious not to offend.

"Soldier Raigne."

"Delivering candidates I take it? Is this Corpa Demic?" Soldier Raigne's gesture took in the crippled boy.

"Yep, that's him," Soldier Korst nodded.

"Varley, put your dog away and we'll take you up."

Soldier Korst winced. "She isn't mine."

"What?" asked Soldier Raigne, a sudden edge in his voice.

"It's a long story. She belongs to this corpa. Corpa Jack," explained Soldier Korst. He looked slightly embarrassed. "None of this is my idea. One master wanted him bought here, and another thought it would be a good idea to let him keep the simulcra." Soldier Korst turned his free hand up. "Out of my hands."

"Assholes," commiserated one of the other soldiers. Jack was sure by the way he casually delivered the curse that he did so often.

"He can't wander through Pamsley with a weapon like that," insisted Soldier Raigne. "Even masters aren't allowed to flout that rule.  Who let him use a plith crystal anyway?"

"No one, that's the thing. That's why it's here and not destroyed.  He did something to take over the simulcra from its previous owner."

"Maybe he shouldn't be wandering around Pamsley at all," piped in another soldier. He had a narrow face and sharp eyes.

"Just so," agreed Soldier Korst with a nod.

"Is there anything else I should know about?" asked Soldier Raigne.

Soldier Korst pursed his lips with a considering frown. "Well, he cut the heads off half a dozen koyim. All nice clean cuts too. So I guess he's handy with an axe, though you wouldn't know it to look at the runt."

Demic, his mule close by Jack's, whispered out of the side of his mouth. "Sloppy idiot. I shouldn't know that."

Jack was too busy keeping his face perfectly expressionless and his eyes focused in the distance, to pay immediate attention to the comment.

"Sounds like a right little monster, you'll be looking forward to a good night's sleep I expect," said the final malkemist.

"I am, but not on account of him."

"Devid, send a query to Upper. Tell them the situation and ask for directions," requested Soldier Raigne.

The last malkemist to speak wheeled his horse around abruptly and took up a tube that had been tied behind his saddle. He sighted it towards the plateau above and started tapping and fiddling with it.  Jack could not tell what he was about. He finished and then sat still, as though waiting for something. The other malkemists seemed to think this was completely normal.

"Any news from Hunter's Vale or the road?" asked the foul-mouthed malkemist.

"I heard rumours of news, but no real news. Something about another war in the west. A couple of attacks on malkemists in coastal towns. That sort of thing."

"We've heard the same up here, and some other stuff. Was there a skirmish between Hunter and Roon Library? Some guy, an archivist, came to petition the grandmaster with a complaint against Hunter Library. Maybe you'll be able to clear things up."

"Probably not. I haven't had much to do with Roon Library. Outside my concern."

"Pity. It would've been good to have another perspective. Maybe the corpa knows something you don't?"

Soldier Korst laughed. "Since when does anyone tell a corpa shit?  Did something change up here while I was away?"

Foul-mouth scowled at that, but did not press on.

"Have you ever rotated in to defend Pamsley?" asked the narrow-faced soldier.

"Never had the pleasure," responded Soldier Korst. "I must not have made the cut."

"Never fear. They call up every soldier who was candidated here. I presume you were a candidate?"

"Oh, yes. I remember it fondly."

Both narrow-face and foul-mouth snorted with coarse amusement at that.

"They say to bring them up," said Soldier Devid suddenly. "Bind and drag the dog though."

Jack looked sharply at Soldier Devid, alarmed. Dolce reacted by baring her teeth and growling deep in her throat.

"Well blow me over, they really are connected," said Soldier Raigne, then continued with no special urgency in his voice. "Take her quick Erold."

Narrow-face cut across the other riders towards Dolce, his left hand pulling a vill from within his robes. Without considering his actions, Jack drove Risle forward and she collided with the malkemist's horse, pushing it away from Dolce.

"Careful, gentlesirs. You don't want to let him touch any of your vills," Soldier Korst called out helpfully, though in a tone that left no doubt in anyone's mind that this was none of his business.

"Jack! Stop!" yelled Demic.

Soldier Erold stared into Jack's face for a moment, confusion on his features. They were close enough to touch and Jack noticed that the man's hair was thick, wavy, and lovingly groomed.  His skin a soft tan with a hint of rosiness on the cheeks. The malkemist's horse danced away from Risle, and Jack had a moment for the enormity of what he had just done to sink in. He had the ridiculous impulse to apologise, but of course it was too late for that.  During the brief pause, Dolce had flanked the malkemist's horse and lunged. The horse shied away quickly enough to avoid her jaws, but almost lost its rider in the process.

Soldier Erold was angry now, and the other riders were stepping their horses back to give them room as his horse righted herself.  The harried soldier released a stream of liquid at the she-dog. She tried to sidestep the flow, but it struck her hindquarters. Jack expected it to splash off, but instead it stuck fast to her fur.  She tried to pull away, but a long thick cord of the stuff now connected the soldier's pommel to the she-dog. He tried to pull her from her feet, but the she-dog was far too heavy for that. He quickly changed his approach and whipped the cord along her flank instead. Everywhere it touched her, it stuck fast.

Dolce tried to bite down on the cord, but that proved to be a terrible mistake. The moment she bit into it, her jaws were gummed tightly shut by the gooey substance.

Trapped. Jack could feel her panic. She pulled and tugged, yanking the horse into misstep after misstep, but each time she changed direction, the soldier would strike another part of her with the cord and bind her up more tightly.

Eventually, after several turns of this, two of her feet were bound up off the ground and she could barely stand. Every time she tried to escape, she would stumble to the roadway. Every time it was harder for her to get up.

Jack jumped from Risle's back and rushed to her side. He hugged her huge neck to stop her from struggling further. She was only making things worse. He noticed that he could touch the cord without it sticking to him.

He could feel her calming down, but she was still anxious. Jack realised that she was probably feeding off his own excitement. He tried to reassure her by calming himself.

Just when he thought it might be working, Soldier Erold leaned in and swung his fist at Jack's head. Jack ducked under the blow, but his reaction set Dolce to growling and struggling viciously again.

"That's enough Erold," warned Soldier Raigne. "The job's done.

"You!" he belted out with some force, his finger aimed firmly between Jack's eyes. "Get back on your horse."

"Mule," Jack muttered under his breath.

"What?" the soldier challenged, but Jack kept his mouth shut, his heart hammering.

He petted Dolce one more time before returning to Risle and climbing back into the saddle.

"That was stupid," whispered Demic. Then, a few moments later. "But also quite brave."

Soldier Korst rolled his eyes.

The sticky cord had completely immobilised Dolce now and she was lying on her side panting on the road. The ruckus had drawn a small crowd of onlookers, mostly boys and girls older than Jack.

"Dukard!" called Soldier Raigne, looking at a large boy among the onlookers. "Hitch a horse and cart for this dog, its too heavy to throw over a saddle."

The boy in question did not run to obey, instead he turned to another boy at his side and seemed to give a terse order. He stood still while three of his companions sprinted off.

In almost no time at all they were back leading a horse hitched to a simple cart. They drew the cart alongside Dolce. All three of them gathered around her and tried to lift her from the ground, which drew some laughter from the malkemists. They may as well have been trying to lift a horse.

Dukard himself came forward with two girls, and after a short discussion, they arranged themselves around the she-dog more carefully.

With the six of them, they were able to lift Dolce off the ground, but not all the way to the cart.

"Varley, that's enough. Erold, Stint, Devid. Give them a hand."

The three of them were ready, as though they had suspected that it would fall to them afterall. Erold took the cord and stuck it to itself in a loop attached to Dolce's shoulders and haunches. He climbed up on the cart with Stint, and they both twined a section of the cord around their forearms for purchase. Stint over Dolce's rump and Erold over her shoulders.

Meanwhile, Devid set two of the boys up as human rails for Dolce to slide up onto the cart. When all was ready the two soldiers on the cart pulled mightily while the remaining two boys and two girls and Devid pushed and lifted from below. For a moment, it looked like they would fail again, but once they had her moving upward she shot up in a rush. Once on the cart, the two soldier simply rolled her legs up and over to move her a little farther down the cart, and then left her there.

"That's one big dog," grumbled Devid. "Are you sure he's sustaining it? It hardly seems possible."

"Pretty sure," responded Soldier Korst laconically.

"Thank you Corpa Dukard. Come along, you'll need to bring the cart back down," said Soldier Raigne.

With Dolce tied in, the small troop of malkemists wheeled around and led the way upward through the town. One of the corpas held the reins of the horse leading the cart, while Corpa Dukard and the others followed along behind. The rest of the crowd melted away in the sun.

The town was held in check by the river on one side, and the steep side of the hill on the other. The town was quite long and took time to traverse, despite the quality of the cobblestoned main road. The river flowed close to the hill in front of them, but before the path was cut off, the road narrowed and began to climb the hill. It was not particularly steep in any one place, but the climb was long and unrelenting.

They reached the plateau and Jack was impressed by the large space.  There were three very large stone buildings nearby, but neat gardens and lawns dominated the majority of the plateau. The space between the buildings was cobbled in the same stone as the road. He wondered briefly at the labour it had taken to construct.

The courtyard was filled with raised beds of flowers. White marble steps, flanked by smooth thick columns, led up to the main entrance of the largest building, with two fierce bear statues rearing at the foot of the stairs. The boy leading the cart stopped it in front of the marble stairs.

"What? You think the dog is going to use the grand entrance? I don't even use the grand entrance idiot," called out the foul-mouthed Soldier Stint as he rode by. "Get your ass to the stables."

The boy looked embarrassed, but it was Corpa Dukard that he looked warily at, not the malkemist, before he led the horse forward again.

At the stables, the boys unhitched the cart from the horse's harness and, holding on to the poles, lowered the back end to the ground. The tray of the cart grew steeper and steeper until Dolce rolled over and out onto the ground. Dolce was not hurt, but it still made Jack red hot with anger. He heard Dolce's growl rumbling in her chest.

"Control yourself," warned Demic. "She follows your emotions. If they think she's dangerous, they'll hurt her."

Jack took a deep breath to calm himself and tried to pretend that Dolce was fine. His jaw did not unclench.

Stablehands came out of the stable to take control of the animals.

"Take you saddlebags, corpas. The stablemaster will keep your mounts and your saddles straight for you," said Soldier Korst, he addressed the both of them, but only Jack needed to be told.

Jack swung his saddlebags over his shoulder and petted Risle before going to Dolce and giving her a reassuring rub as well.

"Hurry up," said Soldier Raigne, heading towards the side entrance to the main building. "Masters are not known for their patience."

Jack struggled a little under the weight of his saddlebags. He stumbled after Soldier Raigne singlemindedly, but not so singlemindedly that he did not duck when he felt a sudden shadow cover him. Something struck him a glancing, stinging blow to the side of his head. He dropped to the ground and tumbled free of his saddlebags to come to his feet. His hand reached for his knife, but of course it was not there.

"Next time I'll take your head off," growled Soldier Erold.

Jack bared his teeth and Dolce went crazy.

"You want more?!" threatened the soldier, lifting his fist. Jack noticed for the first time that it was encased in a metal gauntlet.

Jack glared at the soldier for a moment, a feeling of sick dread rising in him and weakening his legs as he realised how badly he was outclassed, but the contumaceous core of him refusing to back down. Instead of responding, Jack freed himself from the showdown by turning back to Dolce and running to her. She was fighting a ferocious and losing battle against the cord that bound her, tearing great tufts of her fur out by the roots. A part of his mind prickled to have the soldier at his back, but he forced himself not to turn around again. Dolce heaved violently back and forth, threatening injury to herself at every moment. Jack put his hands to her surging flesh, trying to calm her.

"Stupid animal. Nothing can break that cord," spat Soldier Erold, his voice a little closer than before.

Jack's fear for Dolce turned to white-hot rage. He grabbed the cord, intending to pull it apart with his bare bands as tears of impotence welled in his eyes.

Snap. The cord gave way so suddenly that the crack of it made his hands smart. Tufts of hair settled on Dolce's body where she had torn them loose during her struggles.

Soldier Erold screamed in pain and rage, and Jack spun around quickly to see what game the man was playing at now.

The soldier was clutching at his head in pain. Meanwhile, Dolce scrambled maladroitly against the cobblestones to gain her feet.  The soldier fixed a malevolent eye on Jack.

"What the fuck did you do?!" he roared, taking a lumbering step towards Jack.

Dolce got to him first. She was scratching and slipping over the cobblestones, but she still knocked the malkemist over when she bowled into him.

"Corpa!" yelled Soldier Korst loudly in warning, before continuing in a carrying tone devoid of concern or anxiety. "Killing a malkemist outside a duel means death."

Jack threw himself at Dolce just as she sank her teeth into the malkemist's side. The soldier tried to scream, but the effort came out more like a squeek. Jack hugged her tight as he felt her tense, ready to shake her mighty head.

"No!" Jack yelled. Then, "no, no, no," he crooned much more quietly. "No, no, no."

Dolce did not release her grip on the man, yet neither did she try to shake him to death.

"Let him go Corpa," called Soldier Raigne from afar, as though he expected Jack to have that kind of control.

Jack did not look up from Dolce. He petted her carefully, trying to avoid the patches of bare blood-prickled skin where she had torn her fur out.

"Shh," he soothed, over and over. He leaned tentatively away from her, watching for her reaction.

"Come, let's go," he urged softly, putting some distance between the two of them and hoping that she would understand. He got up and walked a few paces before repeating himself.

Somewhat more confident that she was no longer on the brink of violence, he walked several steps farther towards large building before turning back.

"Come."

He let out a sigh of relief when she finally released the soldier and trotted over to him.

Soldier Erold groaned and rolled over onto his stomach. Jack kept a tense eye on Soldier Raigne and Soldier Korst, wondering what they would do. He had no time to look away from them, but he could tell from the stillness at the corner of his eye that no one else was moving in the courtyard. All eyes were on Jack and Dolce, or Soldier Raigne.

"Devid. See to him," called out Soldier Raigne in a tone of slight disgust, indicating the downed malkemist. He turned on his heel without waiting for acknowledgement and headed again for the side entrance.

Jack rushed to pick up his saddlebags and followed, Dolce in tow.  He was quite sure that no one wanted Dolce inside the beautiful building, but both Soldier Korst and Soldier Raigne were a dozen paces ahead by the time he reached the large doorway. Neither forbade her from entering, so Jack made no effort to stop her either. Not that he would have willingly left her outside anyway.

The malkemists strode quickly ahead, and both corpas had to alternatively skip and walk just to keep up. Jack gauged the lengths of the corridors they walked, and the turns, on the odd chance that he might need to get out by himself.

Dolce's paws clacked loudly on the marble floors and the sound reverberated from the ceiling high above. If the soldiers had simply forgotten about Dolce, she now forced them to actively ignore her. Jack's own feet made more noise than he liked, thanks to his boots. He rolled the sole from the outside heel through to the outside front, and then laid the rest of the foot down carefully with each step, but he still unable to walk silently in them.

Soldier Raigne abruptly disappeared through a doorway, followed by Soldier Korst. Rows of benches lined the walls either side of the doorway, yet Demic did not stop or even pause at the threshold, so neither did Jack.

Inside, Soldier Korst was taking a seat in one of several armchairs resting against a wall, and Soldier Raigne had already passed through one of the three doors that led from the room. The whole room was filled with art, but Jack's eyes were drawn to the ceiling high above his head. Fantastic scenes covered the surface. He could make no sense of them, yet he gawked nonetheless. It was only when he lowered his gaze that he saw the many, many portraits that nestled among the carved and painted landscape that covered the walls. Stern-faced men and women stared down disapprovingly on Jack and Dolce.

Under those many eyes, Jack felt strangely bashful and timid about finding a seat for himself. The room was large enough that he could sit apart from either Soldier Korst or Demic, so he did.

Dolce did not flop to the floor when Jack stopped moving, as was her habit.  Instead, she remained standing, scanning the room and watching each doorway in turn.

Jack tried to calm himself down again to reassure her, but his own heart was still hammering from what had happened in the courtyard.

He felt a tickle on his cheek, like a cool bead of sweat, except that the weather was far too cold for sweat. He brushed the sensation away with his fingers and it felt slick rather than merely wet. His fingers were bloody when he pulled them away.  Soldier Erold had gotten him better than Jack had thought. He reached up gingerly to find the wound and was rewarded with a sharp sting right where he expected to find it. His hair was gummed up below the wound. The blood had dripped around his ear and down his neck to his shirt.

He sat with his hand in front of him for a moment, wondering how to clean it off. Usually, he would have just wiped it against his pants, but his new pants were far too nice for that. Dolce sniffed at him, then his hand, and then started licking the blood from his fingers. It tickled, but in a good way. She cleaned them up in short order.

Jack was considering letting her lick his neck clean when Soldier Raigne came out of the door on the left wall with an elderly malkemist. The older man looked down his nose disapprovingly at Dolce and then transferred the same gaze to Jack.

"Mind you don't bleed on my chair boy."

Jack nodded and the old man returned the way he had come without speaking to anyone else. Soldier Raigne gave a nod to Soldier Korst and left.

The three of them were now alone in the cool silence of the huge waiting room. Jack listened to the sound of Soldier Raigne's footsteps as they faded down the corridor they had all entered through.

The minutes ticked by. Literally. A large grandfather clock set the quiet, hushed tone of the room with its incessant tick, tock. Jack amused himself by blinking on every tick.

Neither Soldier Korst nor Demic seemed to find the wait unusual, so Jack resolved to handle it with just as much dignity. Demic had taken out a book to read, and Jack followed suit with his own poorly disguised copy of <i>The Ethics of Creating Simulcra</i>.

Occassionally, a voice or a scuff would be heard outside the room, but the relative silence was never long broken. Soldier Korst seemed to be sleeping.

Even Dolce relaxed enough to slump to the ground.

Jack was reading slowly. He was quite sure it was saying that simulcra were a threat to other living creatures. He read on to learn why.

A scuff sounded from the hallway and Jack expected it to fade like the others before it, but instead the scuff turned into several and drew closer. A sharp angry voice cracked down the corridor and then fell silent, the words indistinct.

Jack stared tensely at the door and Dolce sprung back to her feet.  Demic looked up curiously from his book, while Soldier Korst either slept or pretended to.

The scuffs grew louder and clearer until a malkemist burst into the room, his steps firm and purposeful and angry. Three boys trailed him in with far less certitude. Behind them all came a much larger boy with blonde hair and the beginnings of facial hair.

"Stand there. Don't move," ordered the newly-arrived malkemist in clipped tones. He waited for the quartet to arrange themselves to his satisfaction, eyebrow raised at the presence of Dolce. Once satisfied, he strode just as forcefully into the room to the right, opposite the door the elderly malkemist had gone into.

The three smaller boys were bloodied. Bloodied noses, bruised faces, one black eye, and ripped clothing. The larger boy's clothing was ripped, but the only blood on him seemed to be on his knuckles. He stared openly at Dolce.

The elderly malkemist re-emerged from his room, a look of mild surprise on his face.

"Well, this is a busy morning. What is all this about?"

The other malkemist came back out through the opposite door, catching the end of the question.

"I caught this lot scrapping in front of the auditorium. Idiots," he answered. "Recien isn't in?"

"She stepped out, but I'm sure she'll be back soon," the elderly malkemist answered with a distracted air as he considered the boys.  "In my day the nearest soldier would have beaten some sense into you all, and probably left you something to remember them by. We've grown too soft."

"Those were the good days," agreed the other malkemist while Soldier Korst pretended to sleep on. "Five against one, though apparently the big one started it."

"I did not!" spoke up the big boy truculently. His voice was strangely accented.

The malkemist took a quick step towards the boy with his hand raised, and the big boy returned to the wall with a wince.

"Practically no discipline," the malkemist continued in disgust.  "I'd rather have bitten off my own tongue than talk back to an Aware.

"What is a simulcra doing in here?"

"That's something we're still trying to work out," replied the elderly malkemist. "Where are the other two then?" he asked, changing the topic.

"One ran," he shook his head dolefully. "The other has a broken arm."

The elderly malkemist tut-tutted disapprovingly and returned to his room.

Once the older man was gone, the other malkemist gave the big boy a quick cuff to the head before he could duck.

"Stay. Don't move," he growled. He spared one more disapproving glance at Dolce before leaving the room for the corridor.

Moments later, the centre door opened and to Jack's mild surpires out stepped the elderly malkemist. He quickly linked the two rooms beyond in his head.

"Soldier Korst," called the elderly malkemist in an unnecessarily carrying voice. "The grandmaster will see you now."

Soldier Korst was immediately on his feet, feigned sleep abandoned.  Demic began tucking away his book, and Jack followed him. He was about to pick up his saddlebags when Soldier Korst stopped him.

"Leave them there."

At the door, Jack overheard the elderly malkemist ask Korst much more quietly, "Can the simulcra stay outside?"

"I don't know," shot back Soldier Korst as he walked through the doorway. "You'll have to ask it."

Dolce walked in behind Jack without being accosted.

Jack was not surprised to enter a room almost as large as the chamber he had just left. As Jack had come to expect of any room a malkemist spent any amount of time in, its walls were covered in bookshelves that were filled with books. The ceiling was as high as the room outside, and three glass windows stretched almost from the ground to the roof. Heavy maroon drapes flanked each.

A large brutish-looking malkemist, with a silver trimmed malkemist had at his elbow, sat at a massive desk. His bald head was down.  His neck and shoulders thick and muscular.

Demic stepped forward, bowed, and retreated to the back of the room. Jack stood frozen in surprise for a moment before rushing to imitate him awkwardly. He moved to join the other boy at the back of the room. The effort was somewhat hindered by Dolce, who seemed intent on protecting Jack from every angle, but only succeeded in blocking his way.

The grandmaster did not look up from the letter in his hands.

"Edgar, there's a dog in my chamber," said the grandmaster in a deep gravelly voice. He still had not looked up.

"Yes, sirness," replied Edgar, his voice perfectly neutral.

A short malkemist with blunt, flat features stood behind the grandmaster. He looked bored, and seemed not to be taking special interest in anything around him. Jack doubted it.

The grandmaster tossed the letter in his hand onto the desk and leaned back into his plush chair with a sigh, his eyes taking them all in. Soldier Korst had his hands clasped lightly behind his back in the most respectful pose Jack had ever seen him adopt. Demic had his head down, and Jack realized belatedly that his eyes should probably be down as well.

"You've bought us quite a mess soldier, an autodidact with his own simulcra that has already attacked an Aware, and who seems to be able to subvert the function of the villends he touches, or even dispel active villends. And a grand imaginer's son who thinks he's some kind of messiah. Is there anything else we ought to know that wasn't written in one of these three upsetting letters?"

"One more thing, grandmaster," said Soldier Korst.

The grandmaster's eyebrows rose. "There's more than this? This has shaken us as it is. These two are going to give us a massive headache before the day is through, we can tell." He looked at Soldier Korst expectantly for a few moments before realizing that the soldier had no intention of elaborately immediately.

"Right. Boron, can you escort Corpa Demic to his quarters. We're sure he's anxious for some of the comforts of home by now."

"Yes, grandmaster," acknowledged flat-face in a high-pitched voice that surprised Jack, and moved forward from behind the desk to see to it.

Demic bowed, and within moments Boron had led him from the room.

"Corpa Jack, you can wait outside while we decide where to put you," instructed the grandmaster.

"I'm to be Corpa Demic's manservant," Jack blurted.

The grandmaster seemed surprised that Jack had spoken, and Soldier Korst was shaking his head slightly, though Jack could not see the expression on his face.

"Yet another excellent reason why we should keep you apart. Thank you. Out you go." There was a definite edge to the grandmaster's expression of thanks.

Jack bowed and let himself out quickly. The heavy door closed with a hollow boom behind him as he stepped back into the waiting chamber. The boys watched him and Dolce as he resumed his seat opposite their standing vigil. The three smaller boys scowled openly, while the larger boy seemed only curious. Jack wondered if they were angry that he had a seat and they did not.

Suddenly, the big boy pushed himself from the wall and strode over.  As he approached, Dolce rounded on him and growled deep in her throat. He stopped, but did not back up. He just stood there for a moment, letting them come to an uneasy truce.

"She's beautiful. I've never seen such a large dog before," said the big boy in his strong accent. Jack could see that the other boy wanted to get closer to Dolce. He would have considered such a desire strange to the point of crazy even a few days ago, but his attitude towards dogs, or at least one dog, had changed drastically in that time.

Jack slipped from his chair to kneel beside Dolce, his head near her mighty jaw. He shushed her gently, not feeling the least prickle of apprehension. He could feel her after all. He knew what was driving her from moment to moment. Jack suddenly realized that he trusted her more than he had ever trusted another living being.  And her a dog. It set him still with wonderment for a moment before he shook it off.

Dolce had stopped growling. She watched the encroaching boy carefully, but the aggression was gone. Jack reached out his arm.

"Give me your hand," Jack urged.

The big boy did not hesitate. He gave his hand boldly. Jack did his best to cover the other boy's hand with his own, but his hand was much, much smaller. He stood and drew the boy's hand closer to Dolce. Making sure to avoid any of the patches of raw, bloody skin where the sticky malkemist trap had torn her fur out, he placed the boy's hand on her flank.

The big boy grinned. Jack thought foolishly, but he was obviously overjoyed. He stroked her gently.

"I would love to breed her with one of my dogs from home," the boy began.

"You cannot," said Jack, who had been reading up on the subject.  "She's a simulcra, she can't have pups."

The boy's hand stopped stroking suddenly. "A simulcra? But she looks so... normal. Well, besides being so damn big. I thought simulcra looked different."

Jack almost scoffed. He had been a corpa for all of a week and had seen at least four simulcra already.

"You've never seen a simulcra?" Jack asked. "What is she supposed to look like?"

"I don't know," he laughed a little nervously. "Horns, maybe."

Jack did not know if he was joking or not.

"Is this your first time at Pamsley?" asked the bigger boy.

"Yes."

"You're here to take the tests?"

"I think so. I don't know. What happened with them?" Jack asked to divert the conversation away from himself.

The boy looked over his shoulder and scowled. "Lower Pamsley is filled with this pus. They stick to their own libraries and families, and cause trouble for everyone else."

"I see," said Jack, though he did not.

Jack almost jumped when a woman in a black dress and a malkemist hat glided into the room. Her slippered feet gave no warning of her entrance, and her smooth, unlined face gave no hint to her disposition. Dolce dislodged the caress of the boy to point her nose and eyes at the intruder.

She stopped to look at Dolce, an eyebrow raised. "It's true then.  Someone was stupid enough to bring a simulcra into Pamsley. Was it you boy?" she asked, looking up slightly at the big boy.

"Not me Ma'am," he replied with his funny accent and a slight bob of his head.

She frowned at Jack for a moment, but did not ask the question again. The three boys across the way were shifting uncomfortably, though she had not yet looked at them. When she did, her face broke into an unpleasant smile.

"At least some of you have the sense to know who I am," she congratulated, taking in their lowered heads and general unease.  "You must be one of Spire's boys," she commented, cocking her head a little to catch the eye of the middle boy, the one with the quickly developing black eye. He nodded quickly.

"And these other two?" she asked, gesturing to either side of him.

"My cousins, Ma'am."

"Lovely, the whole family." She turned back towards the boy by Jack's side. "I've heard about you, I remember now," she said.  "You're a newling from up north. Fresh blood.

"You however," she addressed Jack. "I have to admit, I don't have the foggiest. Who's your father?" she demanded.

"I don't have the foggiest," Jack said, imitating her. "Ma'am. I'm a bastard."

"I see they raise them cheeky where you come from. I'll soon have that out of you. I've been disciplinary master here at Pamsley for forty years. I know a troublemaker when I see one.

"Everyone into my office!" she suddenly bawled, sweeping in through the doorway opposite." Then, from within she called out in warning.  "Leave the dog outside!"

Jack had been wondering if "everyone" meant him before she said that last thing. Now he wondered if it would be wise for him to tell her that he had had nothing to do with these brawlers.

The three boys by the office filed in first, then the larger boy.  Jack drew near the doorway and tried to convince Dolce to stay outside. As he expected, she ignored him.

"Please, just stay," Jack begged. She wagged her tail, but either did not, or would not understand him.

"Hurry up! I don't have all day!" Mistress Recien's voice rang out from her room with surprising force.

Jack slipped into the office and tried to close the door on Dolce, but she pushed past him with ease. His whole face heated when he turned to see the disciplinary master standing behind her desk, her whole body practically tapping out a tattoo of impatience. He shrugged his shoulders in impotence.

"That will be five strokes," she said with a vengeful lilt to her voice. She bit off each word.

Jack did not bother to protest. He went and stood beside the big boy. The only one he had spoken to.

She looked at Dolce briefly, but seemed to decide that it was not worth the effort of evicting her from the office.

"Who's going to go first? I've heard the story, but I'd like to hear your versions before I pronounced judgment." She looked expectantly at the trio.

"He started it, Mistress Recien," said the boy with the black eye.

"Did not!" growled the big boy.

"Everyone will get a chance to speak," warned the mistress in a tone that threatened dire consequences. "Go on," she invited.

"We were minding our own business, coming out of the auditorium when this newling bullock nearly..."

"Corpa," corrected Mistress Recien with a frown.

"Corpa Bullock here, nearly knocked us over. He refused to apologise, and then he punched me in the face."

"There were five of you?" she asked.

"Yes, Ma'am."

"Why would he attack the five of you?"

"I don't know," he replied defensively. "Ma'am."

"Anything else you'd like to add?"

The boy shook his head without looking up again.

"Varley. What do you have to say for yourself Corpa..." Mistress Recien paused for a moment. "What's your name?"

"Golien, Ma'am."

"Varlay. In your own words Corpa Golien, what happened?"

"I was waiting at the auditorium for my next class when these five stopped in front of me and started this. They weren't interested in anything I had to say, they just wanted a fight. So," his voice lilted upward. "I gave them what they wanted. Now they want to complain because it wasn't the fight they were expecting. Serves them right!"

Jack was not sure if it was Golien's accent, or just the way he told it, but he made the fight sound like it had been a lot of fun.

"One side says one thing and the other, another. It looks like I'll have to split the difference. Ten strokes each. Everyone against the wall to take them," Mistress Recien said with finality.

"No," protested Golien loudly.

"He broke Timoth's arm!" whined the boy with the black eye.

Jack hesitated, unsure if she meant to include him. The others made off until he stood alone with Golien. Brow clenched, the larger boy was refusing to budge.

Mistress Recien withdrew a long thin rod from her desk. She used it to gesture for both Jack and Golien to move to join the other boys by the wall. Jack, resigned, started moving, but Golien evidently could not lie down so easily.

"No! It's not fair! What did I do?! Should I let them beat me?!  Ridiculous!"

Jack reached out his hand and touched the other boy's shoulder, trying to calm him. <i>Really, ten strokes was nothing. Especially with that flimsy stick. Why make a fuss and risk worse? There was always worse to be found if you pushed for it</i>.

Golien slapped Jack's hand away violently, stinging him. Suddenly, Dolce was growling, her hackles raised. Mistress Recien scolded them, but Jack missed the words as he tried to calm Dolce.

Then, from the door, a voice called out, and it quieted the room like cold water douses a fire.

"Oh, dear! How did this happen?!" exclaimed the elderly Master Edgar in a kindly voice. "You shouldn't be in here," he said to Jack as he moved into the room.

Mistress Recien humoured him suspiciously as he came around the desk and then bent to whisper something in her ear. She did not seem pleased to hear whatever passed between them.

"It looks like I'll have to hold on to those strokes for you. For the time being anyway. You'll get them soon enough though," she promised.

Jack did not care one way or the other. If she was looking for any sign of relief on his face, she would be disappointed. He felt bad for Golien as Master Edgar led him from the room. The big boy was like Dolce he suddenly realized. Earnest, strong, but inflexible.  Both of them would hurt themselves without his help.

Master Edgar closed the door softly behind himself.

"That has to be some kind of record for coming to the attention of the mistress of discipline. You're been here all of half an hour!  Take a seat and try to stay out of trouble. I have someone coming to take you in hand. Don't do anything!"

Master Edgar disappeared into what Jack now assumed was his own office.

Just as he sat down he began to hear cries from Mistress Recien's office.

Eight cries. Some sobbing.

Six cries.

Nine cries. Whining.

Silence.

Jack gritted his teeth. She would not have gotten anything from him.

The three boys let themselves out first. They looked a little shaken, but still glared at Jack as they left. Golien came out last, looking angry. He nodded once and was gone.

Mistress Recien came to her door behind them, and watched Dolce and Jack through the narrowing gap as the door closed. The look on her face was unreadable.

Jack was alone for the first time in days. He was used to much more alone time. That thought made him think about how far he had come in the last few days. He was days and days of travel away from the only place that had ever been home, in a malkemist citadel where even the malkemists themselves were not particularly nice to one another.

He wondered how far he would get if he tried to sneak out now.

<i>Would the stablehands let him saddle Risle?</i> He doubted it.  Then he looked down at himself. At his fine clothes and black boots, and he reconsidered. <i>Maybe they would let me out.</i>

<i>Where would I go with a mule and a giant dog?</i> he wondered.  He could not go back to Corsisan. Master Nuth would find him just as quickly as the first time, even without Soldier Halme to help him.  Suddenly, he wished that Soldier Halme were here.  Mocking, sarcastic, Soldier Halme. He would know what was happening, and why. <i>But would he share that knowledge? No.  Probably not.</i> Jack threw out the idea of Soldier Halme coming to save him.

<i>Where's Demic?</i> He got the impression that he was still in the building for some reason. They had not sent him down to Lower Pamsley with the rest of the corpas. <i>Why? Was he that important?</i> He wished he could talk to Demic, but the grandmaster had seemed adamant about keeping them apart. <i> Why?</i> It did not make any sense to him.

Footfalls sounded from outside in the corridor. Not scuffs like before, these were careful, well-measured steps. This was someone who took pride in how they walked. Yet, they were not quiet steps either. A malkemist then, not someone accustomed to slinking around in silence.

Jack had constructed a picture of the man before he came into view, and was a little surprised when it was wrong. He had expected someone a little shorter, a little more rugged. This man was tall, but almost boyish. He had a sweet, young, and kindly face. Dolce turned on him, her ears pricked forward alertly.

When he saw Jack his eyes widened and he smiled.

"You must be the boy I've been asked to take charge of," he said with innocent pleasure, as though he had been waiting some time for such an opportunity. He ignored Dolce completely. "Give me one moment, I need a word with the secretary."

He gave Secretary Edgar's door a brief firm knock and waited, his face showing slight embarrassment, an awkwardness. A muffled call issued from within and he opened the door to disappear inside.

Jack sat and waited. He could not hear anything from the conversation happening on the other side of the door. They were almost certainly discussing him, and that made his skin itch.

<i>Had Soldier Korst left already, or was he still speaking with the grandmaster?</i> The grandmaster had not seemed like a man who sat around all day mincing words, but it was sometimes difficult to tell.

Just then Boron returned from sending Demic. He looked at Jack and Dolce, but he also looked everywhere else. If Jack were to infer his importance from how long the man's eyes had been on him, he would have to conclude that he was a shade less important than the plush armchair opposite.

Boron entered the grandmaster's office without knocking. Jack tried to get a look inside, but the door opened in the wrong direction and blocked his view.

The grandfather clock ticked on. Jack squirmed in his seat and kicked away idly. Dolce put a stop to that by laying her head in his lap, and Jack indulged her with a petting. Tick, tock.

Jack liked grandfather clocks. He had seen a surprising number, considering how rare they were. Tick, tock.

This one was getting on his nerves though. Tick, tock.

He found himself stroking Dolce's fur between the blood to the rhythm of tick, tock. He stopped.

Jack was reaching for his saddlebag to get his book just as the young malkemist emerged at last. Finally, no more tick, tock.

"Great! My name is Master Kandan," he greeted enthusiastically, as the office door closed behind him. "I take it that you're the remarkable Corpa Jack? Good, good. Well, let's go. I'll set you up in a room, we are going to explore your gifts together." He seemed very cheerful. "Come along. Do you need a hand with those?" He meant Jack's saddlebags. "No. Varlay."

Dolce seemed curious about the young man, but the youthful Master Kandan seemed not to notice her at all, though he managed to keep his distance from her all the same. He strode for the corridor without letting her near. Jack shouldered his saddlebags and followed behind with Dolce. The master turned right, opposite to the direction that Jack had entered the building. Jack was slightly disappointed, he would have liked to strengthen his memory of the way in and out, and perhaps have stayed closer to Risle and the stables as well.

Jack turned to the sound of footsteps behind him. A malkemist was striding down the corridor towards them.

"Kandan! Is that you?!" the man called out in surprise.

Master Kandan turned, his manner inquiring.

"It is you!" the newcomer exclaimed with pleasure. "Fancy us meeting here, so far from Dome!"

"Indeed! It's a small world," Master Kandan smiled. "What brings you this far east?"

"Master Tuvoil sent me," he answered with a disaffected air, then changed the topic. "I see you're still fascinated by those creatures," he lifted his nose and pointed it at Dolce. "I really thought you'd grow out of it, but I suppose that's why you're here.  These easterners are far less uptight about the whole affair.  Imagine a simulcra walking the halls at home! Chanice would have kittens!" he laughed.

Master Kandan smiled pleasantly. The stranger opened his mouth to say something more, but Master Kandan spoke first.

"You'll have to excuse me, I have some matters to settle with this situation," he gestured in good-natured apology to Jack and Dolce.

The other malkemist frowned in confusion, then nodded slowly.  "Varlay. Where can I find you after I finish with my duties?" He waved his hand in the vague direction of the offices Jack had just left.

"Don't worry, I'll find you," said Master Kandan with a cheerful wave. He turned on his heel and began leading the way down the corridor again.

The other man watched him go with a frown of puzzlement. Jack noted his expression, but had to turn and trot, his saddlebags flapping, to catch up with the energetically striding Master Kandan.

They took several turns in quick succession and then some carpeted stairs. Jack kept his head straight throughout and was confident that he could find his way back to the stables if he had to.

Another corner, a long stretch of white marble—overlaid with tapestried runners—and they arrived at a door. It was identical to the ones they had been passing in this hall, except for the personalized golden plaque that Jack half read, half intuited as "Master Kandan. Forbidden Arts Investigations."

"These are my modest rooms," he smiled with a hint of embarrassment as he fumbled with some strange-looking keys, before swinging the heavy wooden door inward. "I don't have an assistant, so you can use those quarters. Don't mind the clutter, most of it isn't breakable. I've only been here a couple of months, but my junk has already started seeping into your room. Shouldn't take too long to clear though. The steward would not be happy to see everything I've brought up here, but I don't let him or his minions in here. Do me a favour, in my absence, please! Do not let them in," he smiled widely as though it was a joke between them. "He's got narrow eyes.  Shifty eyes. I can't trust a man with shifty eyes, it's beyond me."

The smell of animals hit Jack immediately. The first room was sparsely furnished. The far, outside wall was dominated by a large fireplace, which was flanked by two of the long floor to ceiling glass windows. Standing bird cages dotted the room, though most of them stood by the windows. Jack recognized a raven and a hawk, but he did not have names for the rest. There was general squawking as the birds seemed to greet their master. He shushed them, and playfully petted and scolded the ones he could easily reach.

"I don't usually keep an animal as large as yours up here, but you are both such a special case that I am more than happy to bend my habits." He opened a door between two bookcases and led the way inside a room to the right. The smell of animals was much stronger in this room. The room within held mice and rats and even larger rodents. Mixed in with the smell of the animals was the much fresher and cleaner smell of grain and hay.

Master Kandan looked at Jack and the expression on his face. "Not this room!" he laughed, causing Jack to wipe the expression of appalled surprise from his face. "Yours is the next room over!  Thank the Great Imaginer I don't have to clean this room out!" He wiped his brow theatrically with a wide grin, and Jack felt himself respond with a wry smile of his own.

Master Kandan navigated to the door opposite and opened it.

"Here we go. Home, sweet, home."

Jack peeked inside. No animals, just bag upon jute bag of feed. It smelt kind of nice, though a little sweet on the nose. Besides the feed, there was a bed, a table, some chairs, a wardrobe, a desk, and a small bookcase. Although the bookcase was currently empty, Jack was more excited to see it than anything else in the room. Lots of light shone in through the ridiculously high window.

"That door there," the master pointed. "Leads back out to the corridor." Jack had figured that out already. "And there's a toilet and washroom at the end. You can use it to clean that blood up." He pointed at Jack's ear.

"You'll have to teach your dog to go outside by herself unless she knows how to use a toilet," he laughed again. "I have no idea how the psar soldiers stationed outside are going to take to that.  Anyway! Do settle yourself in. I've work to attend to, but I'll come grab you before sunset to take you down to the great hall to eat."

He strode out and was gone. But moments later he was back again.

"Oh, one more thing. Try not to wander around too much without me.  Master Edgar told me your simulcra did a number on Erold. He's not likely to forget that in a hurry. Not on your life. He won't kill you, he cannot. But what he can do would turn your hair white. You don't want him to get his hands on you this side of never. The healers here are good, real good. Perhaps the best anywhere. They can and will bring you back from the very brink of death. I've seen corpas punished with amputated limbs that were only reattached hours afterwards, and those guys were hacks. Imagine! That's not even the worst thing I can think of. Please, do me a favour, stay out of his way." He did not smile.

As though not being able to smile made him uncomfortable, he thumped the stone wall next to the door lightly with the meat of his palm, gave an awkward nod and left.

Jack dropped his saddlebags to the floor and listened as the master returned to the main room. It sounded like he was leaving, and Jack rushed to his own outside door to listen. A door opened onto the corridor and Jack stilled his breath to hear where he went. A jangle of keys broke out, and then Master Kandan was striding away down the corridor. Jack only heard a couple of steps before the man took to the floor runner where his footsteps were muffled.

Jack dropped to the ground. The gap under his door was too small to see under, so he pressed his ear to the gap and waited.

Nothing. He had gone the other way.

Jack got to his knees to think. Master Kandan seemed nice, and Jack wondered for a moment why he was on his knees on the floor tracking the man out of his own home. A home that he had just opened for Jack. He shrugged. It was always better to know than to not know.

Dolce sat on her haunches watching him intently with her large brown eyes. She, at least, did not seem to think Jack's behaviour was strange. Jack smiled at her as his mind wandered, eyes unfocused, to consider what had happened downstairs. He had made a staunch enemey in Soldier Erold and seemed to have lost a potential ally in Demic. His impression of Master Kandan was good, but who knew what it meant.

He suddenly refocused his eyes on Dolce, awash with guilt. <i>Why didn't I ask Master Kandan to heal her?</i> The man had tried to avoid her though. It was not obvious, but as Jack thought back on it, he realized that the man had always kept a healthy distance between himself and the dog. <i>Maybe he just doesn't like dogs,</i> thought Jack. Completely understandable.

<i>What am I going to do about Soldier Erold?</i> Jack wondered. He had learned that this building was not a place that soldiers were allowed to visit casually, which meant that he might be safe so long as he stayed within. Did the soldiers stay down at Lower Pamsley most of the time, or did they live up here as well? Some did it seemed, but was Soldier Erold one of them? Maybe Soldier Erold stayed down in Lower Pamsley, and Jack had nothing to worry about. Perhaps Master Kandan was just frightening him into staying within his room.

Jack shook his head. If that were the case, it was not going to work.

He went into the next room and closed the door behind himself. He did not want to let the stench into his room. The large window was open wide, but the smell was still very strong. Jack went to the window to look out. He was on the side of the building facing towards the road he had climbed to arrive here. The stables were on the other side of the building. Neat green lawns stretched between borders of trimmed hedges, and Jack presumed, steep drops to the valley floor far below. Paths of loose white stones led from feature to feature throughout the park and disappeared out of sight behind the building. A large variety of different trees and shrubs dotted the landscape, but never threatened to become too dense. A fountain sprayed water into the air in a steady stream not too far from where Jack looked down. He saw a strange, finely wrought building a few hundred yards away, but had no idea what it might be.

Jack left the window to move among the cages in the room. Some of the rats were quite big, almost as large as the rats that infested the sewers of Corsisan. Yet, unlike their cousins in the sewers, these rats pressed close to the bars of their cages rather than scuttling away fearfully. Jack wondered if they were dangerous a moment before he put the back of his hand to a cage. Little paws and snouts pressed against his skin inquisitively. They were certainly not scared of koyim.

He left them to go to the main room. He was much more interested in the birds, especially the large ones. He had already figured that the mice and rats must be their food, and he did not want to become too attached to them. He picked his way amoung the cages until he came to the largest raven he could see. He expected Dolce to follow him, the same way she followed him almost everywhere, but she had stopped at the first cage and was sniffing at the bird within, a small black and white thing. Jack did not know its name, but he remembered that the type would sometimes swoop and attack travellers on the road if they came too close to their nests.

The black and white bird was not disturbed by Dolce's attention in the least, which Jack thought a little strange. It showed almost as much interest in Dolce as Dolce was showing in it. Jack had assumed that Dolce might be wondering if the bird was good to eat, but now he realized he was wrong. Dolce was fascinated by the bird for some other reason.

The black raven in front of Jack squawked for his attention and he turned back to it. Its black-brown eyes were fixed upon him intently. Jack imagined that it was trying to pry open his mind with that piercing stare. It cocked its head to the side as though considering some information it had managed to pluck from his unguarded gaze. Jack smiled at his own foolishness and reached out towards the cage. The bird's beak struck the cage violently, and Jack blanched in sudden shock, pulling his fingers back sharply.  He had the sudden urge to slap the cage, but he restrained himself at the last moment. <i>It's just a bird</i>, he told himself.

The bird began to laugh. Jack did not recognize it as such at first, but with its head bobbing, the sound soon became unmistakable. It was laughing at him.

"Open!" the bird demanded. Jack stared at it in shock. He knew that birds did not talk. It had its head cocked to the side, one eye appraising him brazenly. "Open," it repeated, knocking its beak against the door of the cage.

Jack noticed that the door had a lock over the latch. He looked at another cage nearby and saw that it was not similarly secured.  Perhaps this bird was special.

Jack considered trying the lock. In his mind's eye he saw himself opening the simple tumbler. In his mind, the bird stepped forth magestically, like some imprisoned prince released from a dread tower. Then to Jack's horror, it moved from cage to cage releasing bird after bird. By the time Jack blinked himself clear of the vision, he was sick with the consequences of opening the cage.

'No," he said.

The raven rattled the bars of its cage with a swipe of its beak.

"Boy!" it complained, its tone heavy with familial disappointment.  Jack gaped to hear it, and suddenly the raven was laughing at him again. <i>This bird is crazy,</i> he concluded.

Jack disengaged himself from the bird's disconcerting gaze and picked his way clear of the crush of cages. It squawked behind him, but he ignored it. Dolce was still sniffing and inspecting the black and white bird.

He went to the front door and tried it. It was locked.

He considered investigating the many bookshelves that lined the walls, but the locked door had roused something in him. He needed to get out and explore the corridors and make sure he really did know where he was. A good test would be to return to the stables, but Master Kandan's warning had seated itself uncomfortably in his head. The last place he had seen Soldier Erold was next to the stables. He suspected that he might ran into Mistress Recien around any corner as well. He did not know why, but he had definitely gotten stuck in her caw. His blood cooled remembering the look she had given him as she had disappeared behind her door.

Jack returned with Dolce to his room and laid the contents of his saddlebags out on the bed. There was more stashed away than he had suspected from the two days he had been living out of them. His fancier clothing, that he had worn only once to dinner at Sparrow Library, was neatly folded at the bottom of one. He also discovered a oiled leather trenchcoat that he would never have found if it had actually rained. There was a comb for his hair and wooden toothpicks for cleaning his teeth. A few normal changes of clothing, a shoe buffing kit, and finally a small, corked bottle.

Jack unstoppered the bottle and gave it a sniff. He grinned. It was Minnie's special brew. He took a brash swig and came up coughing and spluttering, though still smiling through the tears.

He stoppered the bottle again and decided he would ration it for as long as he could.

He transferred some of his clothing to the wardrobe, but he was too impatient to be gone to finish the job. Instead, he decided to change into his fancier clothes, then promptly regretted the choice when he realized that he had to take off his boots to do it.

When it did come time to put them on again, he wondered if he could get away with walking around without them, but decided that he would look out of place. Especially if he was going to visit the stables. He spent the time to put them on.

He went to the door. It was locked too, but a set of the strange keys, similar to the set he had seen Master Kandan use, were hanging by the door. These keys were like four keys in one, arranged like a cross. Jack realized that there must be four separate lines of pins inside the lock and immediately wondered if he would be able to pick it. He had no time for such idle amusements though.

He slipped the key into the lock—the only way it would go—and turned the well-oiled tumbler. The heavy lock thudded open with a distinct thunk and he winced. He would definitely investigate the mechanism more closely later.

Old habits kicked in automatically, and he cracked the door just a fraction of an inch, eyeballing the gap.

Nothing down that way. Without moving the door open too far, he stuck his head out and peeked down the other stretch of hallway.

The coast was clear.

He ushered Dolce out and then locked the door behind himself, slipping the keys into a breast pocket.

The safest place to explore first was the one place he had been told he could go. He started down the hallway towards the bathroom, urging Dolce onto the runner so that her clawed paws would not kick up an ungodly clatter.

They arrived at a large metal shod and girded door at the end of the hallway. There was no lock or latch on the door, only a handle.  To his left was a spiral staircase leading downwards.

Jack pulled the door open carefully. The inside of the bathroom was a large space covered in polished stone. In the centre of the room was a shiny metal column, with many metal outcroppings that Jack did not understand. Three tall windows stood on the far wall and let light in, but the glass—a sight Jack was becoming used to—was cloudy and he could not see outside.

Dolce clacked her way across the room to a row of wooden benches, with small glass windows above them, and she sniffed at them curiously. Jack was reminded that she was still bloodied from her struggles with Soldier Erold and decided he should try to find Soldier Korst. Maybe he would would heal her, if that were possible. <i>Could a simulcra be healed? Could animals be healed the same way as humans?</i> he wondered.

If he found Soldier Korst, he would also have found Demic, and he could start getting his bearings in this place that much faster.  The thought of it cheered him up.

There was a line of doors on the other side of the room and Jack went and pushed one of them open tentatively. Inside was a room very similar to the toilet he had used at Sparrow Library. He checked the next door. It was the same. The next had a completely different type of toilet. It was more like a hole in the ground, although still a white shiny hole in the ground. Jack shook his head in puzzlement.

He turned around and froze when he saw unexpected movement opposite him. The wall was still. He moved his head slightly and froze again. Someone was there. Someone on the other side a window above the benches. He shifted slightly. So did the other person. The hair on the back of Jack's neck stood up on end. No human could mimic so well. A spirit? What evil spirits must the malkemists attract to themselves he wondered.

Jack moved his hand up to his face, and watched in mounting horror as his mocking counterpart on the other side of the window copied the motion perfectly, his face emotionless. Jack bared his teeth and snarled. His doppelganger bared his teeth too.

Suddenly, Jack noticed the blood on the stranger's neck, and his mind shifted. <i>That's me!</i> he blinked.

He moved closer to the mirror, his alarm decreasing with each step.  He studied one side of his face, and then the other, noting the blood matted hair and the bloody trail down his neck. He looked tough, and he liked that. This was not the first time he had seen himself, but it was definitely the clearest. His hair was short and black and his skin pale. Leaning close, he saw the color of his eyes were a light brown. His fancy white shirt had already been slightly marred by the blood on his neck, something he had not considered when he changed.

In front of him, below the mirror, was a small basin. But no water.  Jack looked around, convincing himself that there was no cistern in the room. <i>How am I supposed to wash myself without water?</i> he asked himself, brow furrowed in annoyance. There was a metal spout sticking out from the wall, and two metal knobs either side. It reminded Jack of the contraption over the trough at Master Rainier's homestead, but when Jack tried to push and pull at them, nothing changed. And certainly no water came out. He gave it up as a bad joke. The blood did not bother him.

"Come Dolce," he called as he returned to the hallway. He wanted to explore downstairs and find the quickest way back to the stables.  He knew that Soldier Erold might still be around, but he was willing to take the risk that he would not attack inside this building at least.

They went to the staircase, and Jack held Dolce by the scruff of the neck as he crept downward on the crimson carpet. He did not want her bounding ahead if they needed to beat a hasty retreat back upstairs. As soon as he thought of it, he regretted locking his door. If he was really running from something or someone, he would want to get back inside his room as quickly as possible and lock the door. He crept on, his hand in Dolce's fur a mite more tense.

The stairs seemed to go on a long way, but that was fairly natural given how high the ceilings in this building were. He was crouched almost double as he descended, trying to spy the lower floor before anyone down there could see him. He spotted the landing a moment before a lower floor door was given a muffled, bass thump and heavy boots thudded forth. Jack dropped down and hugged the balustrade, hoping that the person below would not look up.

He was in luck. It was Soldier Korst, and he was not looking anywhere except where he was going.

And he was going there in a hurry.

The man jogged past the stairs without looking up. He looked worried, almost as worried as when he had thought that Demic was going to die on him. Jack immediately gave up the idea of asking him to heal Dolce. He would have to ask Master Kandan when he saw him again.

Soldier Korst's footsteps were so thunderous on the bare corridor of the lower floor that Jack had no trouble knowing when the way was clear. He rushed down the last few steps, intending to get to the stable as quickly as possible. He passed a door identical to the bathroom door upstairs and rushed on. He was a dozen steps down the intersecting corridor, the one Soldier Korst had not taken, before he realized that Dolce was not following him. He turned back to see her sniffing at the bathroom door.

Jack rolled his eyes. <i>Not now, Dolce!</i> he complained to himself. <i>Why did she like bathrooms so much?</i>

"Psst!" he urged in a loud whisper.

To his horror, she ignored him and began scratching at the door.  Jack ran back to her, beside himself. He wanted to scold her, but had no intention of making that much noice. She turned her large brown eyes on him, her meaning clear. Open this one.

Jack looked down both corridors, to make sure no one was watching, and pulled the door open for her. She rushed in before Jack could look inside. Suddenly, it became very clear why she had been drawn in.

It was a bloodbath. This bathroom was identical to the one upstairs, but instead of clean, shining, polished stone, the floor and most of the toilet doors were spattered in blood. A malkemist lay facedown on the floor, red liquid pooling around him. He was missing a leg, which Jack soon found lying on the other side of the central metal column.

Jack quickly ducked inside and closed the door, his heart pounding.  Dolce was drawing close to the body, her paws padding through a wide spray of blood. Jack groaned as she disturbed the blood spatters with her gigantic paws, leaving a very clear trail through the macabre wreakage. A trail that led directly back to Jack.

Even if he ran, they would know that he had been here. There was no mistaking those paw prints or who they belonged to. How was he going to explain that he had nothing to do with this? He had almost gotten a caning for just talking to the wrong boy. He was under no illusions about how badly this could go for him.

Dolce sniffed at the body with her huge muzzle, expressing her curiosity. This was horrible. His mind began running through scenarios. He could run, but they would find him. He could wash her feet and then her footprints away. He looked around for a cistern, but as with the upstairs bathroom, soon saw that there was none.  That option was clearly out.

He might be able to use his stockings to wipe her paws clean, and then scrape the paw prints away. They would know that someone had been here, but not who.

Then his stomach sank. These were malkemists. They would be able to track whoever came into this room. They would find out he had been in this room anyway. He thought on that for a moment and then gritted his teeth. It was still worth a try.

He bent over to unfasten his boot laces just as the door behind him sprang open and paddled his butt soundly. He stumbled forward, his boots disturbing the ever expanding pool of blood. It was in that moment that he noticed that the blood was disappearing into a grate at the base of the metal column. He stared at it for a moment like it was the most interesting thing in the room, before lifting his eyes to the door.

Boron, his flat face impassive, stood in the doorway. His eyes moved from Jack, to Dolce, to the body, and then to the dismembered leg. If he was shocked or upset by anything he saw, it failed to reach his features. Dolce had turned as the door opened, her paw prints marring the otherwise pristine pattern of blood spatters further. When the passive and unreactive Boron simply stood at the door, she bent and gave the blood-speckled floor a wet lick.

Jack winced.

Boron reached into his robe and within moments another dog had materialized before them. Jack had never seen this part of the process and he gaped openly. One moment the air seemed to thicken and turn opaque, and the next it was filled with a fully formed dog. Dolce leaned forward towards the newcomer, her ears pricked forward. The smaller dog shook its head as though disorientated, but had the presence of mind to back away slightly from Dolce.

"Fetch the grandmaster," ordered Boron in his high pitched voice, and the new dog, much to Jack's surprise, rushed to obey without hesitation.

Jack frowned furiously at Dolce, but she turned her large, guileless eyes on him without the slightest expression of bashfulness or shame. He snorted.

***

Demic put his pen down carefully in the consonant groove in the desk. It was nice to have the finer things in life back at his fingertips. He did not complain on the road, but it had been slowly wearing him down. Sleeping on the ground, eating Korst's food, and washing himself from a bucket. Not to mention coming uncomfortably close to dying.

He had almost swooned with pleasure twenty minutes ago, when he had taken a shower for the first time in a week. Hot running water.  Finally.

He wiggled his toes in his moccasins and considered the half letter that he had written out. <i>Maybe Jack is right?</i> he pondered.  <i>Would Korst make a better servant than an example?</i> He was not sure. A part of him wanted to see Korst get what was coming to him, but another, cooler part, saw that Jack might have a point.  Having Korst as a servant instead of a goaler was a very interesting idea, but it was also fraught with complications that might spring back and bite him. He was not sure he wanted to take the risk.

The easy path would be to finish this letter to his father and send it off. It would have to go to New Tocam first, since none of the pidgeons here were from home, and the aviary master there would transfer it to a bird from Hunter's Vale.

<i>Simple, but was it the best thing to do?</i> he mused.

He was not sure if he trusted Jack. The other boy had a disconcertingly impassive face. Whatever was going on below the surface was well hidden. Demic had trouble trusting him because he knew nothing about what was going on inside him, and Demic prided himself on being able to read people. He thought of Jack as a kid, and he looked like a child, though he was only a year or two younger than Demic. He certainly did not think like a child though, which only disconcerted Demic more.

He thought like a soldier, Demic realized in a sudden surge of insight. Korst thought like that to a certain extent, he had to. A soldier who did not pay attention to the physical and political hazards of his surroundings could come to a sticky end. They endured endless bouts of challenges and duels, far more than a master generally had to face, and the duels were sometimes fatal.

Then it hit him. Korst strutted around and acted like nothing could come close to challenging him to forestall challenges. His arogance sent a message. Perhaps Jack had learned to do something similar by not responding emotionally to the dangers around himself. It was something for Demic to think on.

There was a knock on the door.

"Come in," called Demic after quickly overturning the sheet of paper in front of him and placing several clean sheets on top of it.

Korst sauntered casually into the room, and as usual, the display conspired to be insulting. As an Aware, he had no need to abase himself before anyone, even a grandmaster. Still, there were limits.

"How was your shower, corpa?" Korst asked in a baiting tone.

<i>Did he stress my title?</i> thought Demic, his eyebrows drawing down thunderously. <i>Has he lost his mind?!</i>

"My shower was fine, thank you!" Demic's expression of thankfulness sounded anything but. "Yours?" he asked sarcastically, noting that Korst, still in his travelling clothes, had clearly not showered.

"Good, good," said Korst, playing along. "Relaxing too! Ah! Except for the bloodied and dismembered body lying in the middle of the floor!"

"What?!" asked Demic, annoyed by the man's nonsense. "There was no body in there!"

"Are you calling me a liar corpa?" he asked mildly.

Demic gave the soldier a long quiet look.

"You're saying there's a dead person in the bathroom."

"That's generally what it means when someone uses the word body, corpa. If I meant anything else I would have said there's a man with his leg cut off in the bathroom, possibly rolling around in agony."

"Then?" asked Demic. What he meant was, <i>how is this my problem?</i>

"You didn't kill him?" Korst asked.

"No." He was puzzled that the soldier would even ask.

"You were the last person in there," Korst pressed.

"Obviously not!" replied Demic with some cheek.

Korst opened his mouth to say something more when a heavy knock reverberated from the front door.

"Expecting company?" Korst asked with a raised brow.

Demic shook his head, a feeling of unease bubbling up in his stomach.

Demic left his chair and went to his room door as Korst answered the knock.

"Soldier Korst, the grandmaster will need to see you," said a voice belonging to someone outside Demic's field of view, though he could see the flat face of the soldier who had been in the grandmaster's office.

"Me?" asked Korst with perfect surprise.

"Yes, you," came the flat reply.

"With your leave, young corpa?" requested Soldier Korst pleasantly, turning away from the door. He took the opportunity to send Demic a guarded look, his smile tight and angry.

Demic waved him off with a genuine and magnamious smile.

The door swung slowly closed behind Korst, but Demic rushed across the room to catch it before it latched, opening it enough to watch the soldiers retreat down the corridor. Curiousity burning, he poked his head out far enough to watch them disappear around the corner.

Demic followed them in his moccasins.

At the corner, he peered into the next corridor and spied the bathroom door at the far end between the backs of the retreating soldiers.  Another soldier arrived from the crossing corridor and opened the bathroom door to reveal the wide shoulders of the grandmaster within.

"Dang it!" Demic psuedo-cursed. Though he was hundreds of clicks from his father, he still could not bring himself to curse properly.

Korst had not been playing afterall. Now he would have to wait until Korst told him what had happened, which may never happen.

As the door swung closed, Demic looked beyond the grandmaster long enough to make out the unmistakable shape of Dolce. The person next to her could only be Jack.

<i>How did he get in there?</i> Demic goggled before his eyes narrowed in envy. The soldiers were closing in on the door and he racked his brain for a suitable excuse to get himself into the bathroom.

<i>Wait, I can use this</i>, he thought.

***

"Did you do this, corpa?" asked Boron, as the clack of his simulcra's paws faded down the corridor outside.

Jack shook his head emphatically.

Boron crouched down where he was to peer at the bloody stump of a leg that poked from the dead malkemist's robes. He looked from Dolce to the body and then from Jack to the body. His flat face showed concern or thought, but Jack could not decide which.

Jack expected him to stand once he was finished looking at the gaping wound that the malkemist on the floor had clearly died from, but instead he settled there unmoving in front of the door.

Jack kept his fingers twined in Dolce's fur, not trusting her to remain still after her recent behaviour, and urged her away from the pool of blood. Other than that, Jack did not know what to do.  He avoided looking at Boron directly and tried not to look at the body on the floor, or the bloody pool and spatters that surrounded it. That left surprisingly little of the room to look at. He found himself staring at the roof while he tried to stay calm, more for Dolce's sake than his own.

The grandmaster did not take long to arrive. Boron rose to his feet a moment before the grandmaster barrelled into the room with another malkemist on his heels. He promptly swore at what he saw.  Boron's dog returned to it's master and was quickly sucked out of existence.

"You know we don't like being summoned by a simulcra Boron. But shit! This is about the only time you'd get away with it," he groused.

"Arcta, go get Secretary Edgar for us please, and explain that we have a dead master in the lower-east bathroom," continued the grandmaster. Arcta quickly left without question.

"Boron, Fild is stationed on the north door, bring him in here too please."

Within moments Jack was alone with the grandmaster and a dead body.  The dead body being marginally better company.

Grandmaster Waisel's feet suddenly manifested the clear protective gel of the malkemists. Jack had not seen him take a vill from a hidden stash, or do anything at all in fact.

With his feet encased, the man began to slowly circle the room, ignoring Dolce and Jack completely. Where he stepped, the blood on the floor remained undisturbed. He muttered to himself as he viewed the body and blood spatters from different angles. He had walked the same circuit three times by the time Arcta returned.

"Master Edgar is on his way," reported Arcta. Jack spotted Soldier Korst coming down the corridor before the door closed again.

"Good." The grandmaster looked to Jack in annoyance. "Go sit down boy, you're annoying us."

Jack bowed quickly and did as he was told, dragging Dolce with him.

Moments later Soldier Korst boomed into the room with his usual lack of tact, followed by Boron and a malkemist that Jack presumed must be Fild. Soldier Korst gave the body a desultory look and then propped himself up against the wall with an air of intense boredom.

"I told you not to kill any malkemists, corpa. Now look what you've gone and done," Korst said to Jack.

Jack's mind screamed in denial. <i>Was you who came running out of this room! What are you trying to pull?!</i> He tried to open his mouth to defend himself, but the grandmaster beat him to it.

"The boy didn't kill this fella. For one, there's no axe," he observed with a wry twist of his lips. "There's no blood on him or the simulcra from this mess, and there would need to be unless his powers are far more advanced than we've been led to believe. That leg wasn't worried off by a pair of jaws either, that's a surgical cut. It's clean and neat. We'd say he's walked in on this and been left holding the bag. Wrong place, wrong time."

Soldier Korst shrugged as though the grandmaster's explanation might be true.

"Fild saw this one," Soldier Boron explained, indicating Soldier Korst, "moving quickly in the corridor, so we brought him in."

"You've never needed to fart in private?" asked Soldier Korst, his face showing no concern towards the implication of Soldier Borons words.

Arcta sniggered.

Soldier Boron continued. "No horseshit! We'll find out soon enough if you were in here or not."

Soldier Korst's thick lidded eyes made him look like he might fall asleep unless something much more exciting happened soon.

Jack had seen Soldier Korst cut through logs thicker than his head like they were warm butter, and that's exactly what the stump of leg on the corpse looked like to him. This had to be his handywork.

The door opened and to Jack's surprise, in came Demic. The boy took in the scene, eyes going wide, then, when he saw Jack, he exclaimed.

"Jack! What happened to you?!" He rushed across the room to put his hand on Jack's shoulder. Jack did not believe the act for a moment, and neither, from his still hooded eyes, did Soldier Korst.

After the brief theatrics, Demic bowed his head in the face of the assembled malkemists, as though only just then remembering himself.

"There are too many corpas in this room by a healthy margin," complained the grandmaster. He opened his mouth and looked like he was going to do something about it when the door opened again and Master Edgar propelled Soldier Erold into the room. Jack's creeping sense of unease ratcheted to a new level.

Soldier Erold's eyes did not take long to find Jack and the intensity in his gaze told Jack everything he needed to know about the soldier's current level of malevolence towards him. The narrow-faced man's attention darted between the dismembered body and Jack and Dolce as though he could not decide which was the most compelling.

"I found this pretty boy skulking around in places he ought not to be," explained Secretary Edgar. Upon hearing this, Soldier Erold drew himself up to his full height, which was a little under the average in the room, and did not look at Jack again.

"We live in interesting times," mourned Master Edgar. "Today has been entirely too busy."

"This should be simple enough to clear up," said the grandmaster in his deep, rough voice. "You have some skill at tracing, Edgar, let's get this done."

"Grandmaster, we have Kandan remember, send for him and this will be done with before the evening meal."

The grandmaster's eyebrows rose slowly and he gave a ponderous nod.  "Yes, yes, of course. Somebody go get Master Kandan, that's an excellent idea." The word's were barely out of his mouth before the diligent Soldier Fild had left the room.

"Ow, ouch, wait," the grandmaster said a trifle too late. "Kandan and this gentleman are from the same library. It's hardly civil to expect the man to investigate this. What if they were close?"

"I'm sure it will only serve to motivate him to find the killer that much faster, grandmaster," replied Master Edgar with his natural urbanity.

"Insensitive of us nonetheless," said the grandmaster in a tone that said that he had already forgiven himself.

"Should I send for Master Grimald and Mistress Tithia?" asked the secretary.

"No! Good, Great, Imaginer no! That's the last thing we need." The grandmaster flicked the space between his eyes several times with a thick middle finger.

"They won't be happy to hear about this from another council member," warned Master Edgar.

"We couldn't care less how happy either of them are," scowled the grandmaster.

"Very good, sirness." The secretary's voice was the soul of neutrality. He turned on Soldier Erold, his face hardening. "Do you have a good reason for loitering within the house, soldier?"

Soldier Erold's eyes flicked towards Jack almost imperceptibly. The two rosy spots on his cheeks grew darker, but he said nothing.

"Fine. If you don't have a suitable explanation, I will have to impute your motivations upon you. I do enjoy clean, simple stories though, which may not be in your best interests." He raised his chin in inquiry, but Soldier Erold held his silence.

"Very well. You just had your reputation destroyed by an eleven-year-old boy and his simulca. You're angry. You want vengence. You waited for him to leave the house, but in defiance of your expectations, he does not emerge. You ask yourself why he's so special, and it makes you all the more angry." Master Edgar paused briefly. "Stop me if my vill is empty. No?" He continued.

"Your anger overrides your," he eyeballed Soldier Erold, "very well-founded fear of entering the house without an invitation, and you slink in through the backdoor. Once inside, you feel exposed, but you hit upon the ingenious plan of laying in wait in the bathroom. The boy must go to the toilet eventually, and no one would know you were here."

"Brilliant, Edgar," joked the grandmaster. "We're convinced!  Execute him and we'll get on with our day."

"Woah! Wait! I didn't even come to this bathroom!" screeched Soldier Erold in obvious panic. "Sure, I wanted to teach the snot a lesson, but I had nothing to do with this." His hand flicked towards the stiffening body on the floor.

"You're saying that you didn't enter this bathroom and surprise Master Kessel?" asked the secretary incredulously in the face of Soldier Erold furious head shaking. "That he didn't challenge you, and you didn't attack him to protect yourself?"

"No! I didn't!" retorted Soldier Erold.

"Yes, well, I thought that was a bit of a reach myself," smiled Secretary Edgar.

The grandmaster laughed like stones clunking over each other in a small avalanche. The space near the door was cramped with two masters and four soldiers. Evidently feeling the pinch of the close quarters, the grandmaster slipped from the press of soldiers to circle around through the cleanest part of the floor and stand opposite the door. He stopped only a few paces from the severed leg.

The secretary, Boron, and Arcta remained close to Soldier Korst and still unsettled Soldier Erold. Secretary Edgar's body language was relaxed, but neither soldier had yet been cleared of suspicion.

"At any rate, we doubt you could have gotten the better of a master anyway. Though stranger things have happened," mused the grandmaster.

The door opened again and in came Master Kandan. Jack noticed that he was the only person to baulk at the blood haloed body on the floor. He stopped and stared at it for a few moments, and Secretary Edgar had to clear his throat to get his attention.

"Certainly, you've seen your share of corpses Master Kandan?" inquired the secretary.

"Of course, of course," his voice was a little shakey. "But I only just spoke to him."

"Me too," offered the grandmaster. The grandmaster had not battered a lid at the dead body or its wandering leg.

"You knew him then?" asked Secretary Edgar. "He's from Dome too."

"I knew him by sight, and he knew my name. I'd never spoken to him before today though. You'd like me to run a trace on the scene I presume."

"Yes, yes, please," encouraged Secretary Edgar.

Master Kandan waited expectantly.

The silence drew out. Master Kandan shifted from one foot to the other, and looked from the secretary to the grandmaster with almost painful awkwardness.

"Are you going to start?" asked the secretary, faintly annoyed.

"With you all in here?" Master Kandan sounded scandalized. "If you want any kind of accuracy, I'll need to do this with an empty room.  There may have been too much interference with everyone traipsing in and out of here as it is. But I'll do my best."

"Really?! Is that how its done in the western malclave? What a curious custom," challenged the secretary.

"It's not a custom," frowned Master Kandan. "It's what works best."

"Very well," the grandmaster grated briskly. "Everyone out!"

Jack was more than happy to leave and would have been the very first person through the door if almost every other person in the room were not in line first. What was worse was Demic's hand on his shoulder, as though he might be offering comfort of some sort. Jack felt the urge to brush him off, but he restrained himself. Once everyone was outside and the bathroom door closed, Demic drew Jack down the corridor away from the malkemists.

"What happened?" Demic whispered.

"I don't know. I just found the body there."

"That's it?"

"I saw Soldier Korst come out of the bathroom. He left in a hurry."

"So it was Korst!" Demic hissed quietly. He looked more pleased than upset. Like the pleasure you see on a man's face when he wins a game of chance.

"You think he killed the master?"

"Yes, probably." Demic twirled a lock of his dark auburn hair absently, unconcerned by the admission. "Though I can't imagine why he would. I don't think he knew the guy. He can rub people up the wrong way. Maybe it was as simple as that."

"Why are you here?" asked Jack before he realized how rude the question sounded. "I mean in the house. Shouldn't you go down to Pamsley with all the other corpas?"

"My father mainly. There is a relatively high attrition rate down in Pamsley." Demic saw the confusion on Jack's face and repeated himself in a whisper. "Sometimes corpas die down there or lose their nerve and run home. It doesn't happen all the time, but it isn't rare either. It's worse for kids who come from small families without a large number of relatives here. They don't have older cousins or brothers and sisters to protect them from the other families or libraries. I have family here already, but it's still not worth the risk for the grandmaster. He knows that if something happens to me it could spark off a nasty dispute between my father and Pamsley. He will keep me isolated up here to avoid a potential malkemist war."

"So you'll have some kind of test and then go home?" asked Jack.

"I wish it were that easy. No. I will have to pass the gatekeepers to show that I am a malkemist, but that only makes me a corpa really. After that I will be given guidance," he stressed the word "guidance" like it was a dirty word, "though really it's tuition.  The idea is that the skills of malkemy should come spontaneously to a malkemist, as natural as breathing. But no one thinks that's how it happens anymore. During that time I will choose my affinity and work towards passing the associated tests. The title of master, imaginer, or soldier depend on how well I test."

"What is an imaginer?" asked Jack hungrily.

"Very much like a master, the distinction is a philosophical one.  The art of malkemy depends on three distinct qualities that are woven together. The first is will, the second is imagination, and the third is knowledge. For instance, to make an acid, the malkemist must have the strength of will to create the space for it to be created. The malkemist's imagination is where the acid is formed, but it is only through his knowledge that the imagination can be exercised. These three work together to an end. There is another level, called the Kasic, where knowledge and imagination become less important, and are replaced by the Kasic. But I'm not sure that it isn't a myth. The Kasic is a record of all things that have existed and perhaps will exist. It's the reason why the theorists believe that making a simulcra of a dog is much easier than other animals.  Or why making a flying dragon seems to be impossible. The imprint of the form of the dog is stronger on the Kasic and that seeps through into our knowledge and imagination." Demic took a deep breath. "Imaginers believe that the imagination is the most important component of the trium, while masters believe that it is knowledge."

"Which do you believe?"

Demic looked embarrassed for a moment and his eyes shifted away from Jack's face. He bit his lip. "Neither," his whisper descended to almost inaudible. "It's silly, but I believe that the Kasic—imaginary or not—is the most important, and that the other two flow from that source. It's a childish belief, but that's what I believe. Though," he snorted, "if my father asks, I'm an imaginer."

Jack nodded slowly, trying to absorb as much of what he had heard as possible.

"Dolce came from Soldier Mond's imagination?" asked Jack.

"Yes, either that, or he plucked her absently from the Kasic. It's impossible to know. Maybe she existed, or a creature very much like her, in the distant past. It is forbidden to allow a simulcra to become truly alive. That means that a malkemist must always sustain the creature. It goes back to the basic tenets of malkemy, which trust me, you will hear too often to ever forget before you're done at Pamsley. It is the will that keeps Dolce alive. If you were to sever your will from her, you would no longer be sustaining her life and she would either die or cross over and become a separate living being."

Jack wanted to ask why that would be bad, but Demic had already avoided saying it.

The door at the end of the corridor opened and out wandered Master Kandan, a worried look on his face.

"Well, Master Kandan? Put us out of our misery, who was it?" requested Grandmaster Waisel.

"I don't know."

"What?!" The grandmaster did not sound pleased. "I was under the impression that this was your area of expertise."

"It is, but a very powerful and skilled malkemist has obscured the trace. I won't say it's impossible, but my first two attempts have turned up absolutely nothing. There seems to be some kind of interference that I cannot penetrate."

"Ridiculous! Who has ever heard of such a thing? Edgar, get in there and show this youngster how it's done!"

Jack could not see the expression on Secretary Edgar's face, but the man did not rush to usurp Master Kandan's role. He nodded to his fellow master before entering the room himself. Master Kandan did not seem concerned at all that Master Edgar might show him up, only a little careworn.

"Hold that door open Fild," the grandmaster requested of the closest soldier.

They all watched as Master Edgar prepared himself within. To Jack's eyes nothing happened, but when the secretary came back out, he was holding a small device in his hands. He looked up at Grandmaster Waisel and shook his head.

"I'm getting a null. I should be able to pick up everyone who was just in the room, but it's acting like nobody was ever in there.  As you know, that would only happen after many days have passed. I can't say if it's interference, but it's very strange."

"And who could do that?!" demanded the grandmaster angrily. He turned on Master Kandan.

"I don't know," replied Master Kandan uncertainly. "I only know that it's possible, not those who can do it."

"Oh well," he huffed. "I guess you'll have to do it the good ol' fashioned way. On your hands and knees." The grandmaster paused for a moment, gathering his thoughts.

"Should I throw these buggers in a dungeon until we have this cleared up?" he asked Secretary Edgar.

The secretary scratched at the grey stubble on his chin. "Yes, I think that might be a good idea. You can't keep this away from the council, and they will all want to know something has been done.  Effective or not."

"Wait a minute. I'm not sitting idly in a prison cell just so a pack of oldsters can feel a little more jolly," scolded Soldier Korst, his cheeks reddening with genuine anger.

"Shut up! You don't get a say," growled the grandmaster. He turned to Master Edgar again. "And the boy?"

Master Edgar pursed his lips. "Certainty is a wonderful thing when you think you have an ace up your sleave. But since we cannot tell exactly what happened in that room, we have to assume now that we don't know what he's capable of. It might be him who is baffling our villends."

The grandmaster sighed, "Varlay, him too then."

Jack goggled at how quickly the situation had gone sideways. He felt like crying out like Soldier Korst had already done, but he knew it would do no good.

"I can take the boy in hand, I don't think a cell is necessary," piped in Master Kandan.

"I recall that you were supposed to have him in hand as it was," challenged the grandmaster. "How is it that he ended up down here anyway?"

"I didn't tell him he couldn't wander. I will keep him near me from now on."

"Very well. Boron, Fild, Arcta! Please conduct Soldier Korst and Soldier Erold to their new accomodations in the basement, and see that a watch is set up down there. Thank you." He flicked his finger against his forehead with heavy thunks as though trying to kickstart his thinking processes. "Master Kandan, the preservation and investigation of the body is now your concern. Please update us with your findings as you make them. Thank you."

Before anyone had a chance to respond or act on anything he had said, the grandmaster was striding forcefully away down the corridor.

"Oh dear," said Master Kandan as he gazed at the grandmaster's retreating back. "I don't think I thought that through. This is a lot of work!"

"Do you need any assistance Master Kandan?" asked the secretary. "I can place some recently revealed malkemists at your service to move and dispose of the body and clean the bathroom."

"That would be handy, but I still have much to do in there before I can start disposing of anything. Could you have a few hands ready for me by tomorrow morning?"

"Yes, no issue. Good luck," the secretary responded, before heading in the same direction the grandmaster had left in.

Soldier Fild put his hand on Soldier Erold shoulder, directing him to move ahead, causing the resentful soldier to shake his shoulder violently.

Soldier Korst gave Demic an unreadable look as he followed Soldier Erold down the corridor, the both of them bound for the same place.  Though Soldier Korst was taking it far better than the sullen Soldier Erold.

Once they were both comfortably out of sight, Demic gave Jack a shrug of commiseration and also left. Jack was still confused.  He wanted to ask Demic questions, but nothing sprang specifically to mind before Demic was gone.

"Come corpa," called Master Kandan, sounding a little tired. "We need to secure this room, feed the animals, and then go have some dinner."

***

The dining hall was as large as the entire Sparrow Library. Rows of tables filled the room under chandeliers of shining metal and glass. When Jack arrived in the hall, trailing Master Kandan at a respectful distance, the evening meal was already well underway.

Unfortunately, Dolce was not following Jack at a respectful distance, and it seemed to amuse her to knock him off his gait at unexpected moments. She chose to crowd him just as the heads of forty-odd masters and mistresses swivelled to glare at his intrusion, and he stumbled like a toddler. The conversation in the room quieted considerably.

Kandan turned an uncertain face on Jack. "Oh, I didn't consider this," he muttered to himself. "Here, Jack. You stay over here with your dog." He indicated a table by the door. "I'll bring some food to you. The masters might not be terribly impressed to be dining with a simulcra. You might also be the first corpa in the history of Pamsley to eat in here."

Jack went and sat at the table he was offered. It was as far from the buffet table as he could possibly be and still be at a table.  The masters made no bones about sending him looks ranging from lightly veiled curiousity to open scorn. He felt like a mouse in the middle of a paved road with hungry birds perched all around. It was not a question of whether they would eat him up, but of which one would get the meal. Jack caught sight of the mistress of discipline, and he groaned low and soft in his chest. He was beginning to feel sick.

Jack ran his fingers self consciously through his hair, forgetting the gel that Master Kandan had used to style it. Feeling foolish, he wiped the residue on his pant leg. Master Kandan had healed his scalp wound and shown Jack how to use the faucets in the bathroom, to clean himself up. He had then given Jack the healing liquid to heal the many small wounds on Dolce's body. She still looked strange with large clumps of fur missing from all over her body, but at least Jack knew she was not in pain any more.

Mistress Recien did not glare. Instead, she watched, her face impassive. Of them all, her face most resembled a bird of prey. He felt dreadfully certain that if he broke for the door, she would swoop and pluck him up in a heartbeat. A man at her elbow leaned in to speak into her ear and she answered without taking her eyes off Jack. He noticed a man and a woman behind the mistress of discipline, at the table farthest from Jack, arguing in hushed, yet intense tones.

The only thing that made Jack feel slightly better, as the butterflies of anxiety beat sickeningly against his stomach, was that Dolce had put herself between him and them and was glaring back just as intently.

Master Kandan chuckled nervously as he returned with a tray of food. "My apologies, I didn't know what you liked, so I got you a little of everything. Enjoy!"

Master Kandan left to get his own food and Jack was glad of the opportunity to concentrate on his with his head down. There were several types of meat, and some roasted vegetables, all lathered with a generous helping of a brown sauce. The food worked to overcome his self-consciousness and he dug in. No amount of nerves could stop him eating. He took pride in that. He had always had a dog's belly as Mardy was fond of telling him.

He caught the occasional look from one the assembled malkemists whenever he cast a furtive glance in their direction, but he grew less and less concerned as he ate his fill. He felt like passing some of his meat to Dolce, but he did not know if it was good for her or not. He decided he would ask Master Kandan when he returned.  However, some time later, and long after Jack had eaten his food down to the shiny porcelain, he noticed that Master Kandan had seated himself at another table and was being peppered with questions by the surrounding men and women. He seemed to be answering them all in his easy going and affable way.

"Bastard!" cried a woman at a far table, jerking Jack's head up. It was the couple he had seen arguing quietly before. The woman's voice was rising, and the man opposite her, the target of her ire, was desperately trying to shush her. She rose to her feet, her hands scrunched up like claws before her as she loomed over the cringing man.

The man's face was reddening with mortification. He tried to say something softly to the woman, urging her to retake her seat, but Jack could not hear the words.

"I'll kill you!" she screeched, her body roiling turbulently before Jack's eyes, as the thick gel of the malkemists swiftly encased her body.

A collective gasp of dismay went up among the onlookers. "No!" cried the woman immediately to the woman's left, and she quickly threw a clasp around the angry woman's shoulders, pinning her arms to her sides. Other malkemists moved quickly to pull the man away amid wary looks at the struggling woman.

Within moments the angry woman gained apparent control of herself, and the danger seemed to lessen. She spoke with cold fury.

"I challenge. At dawn tommorrow. At the arena." She bit off each word like she was shoving a knife into the man's guts, and from the dread-filled look on his face, Jack supposed it might be something even worse.

The protective gel around her body disappeared as though it had never been. She dislodged the woman holding her with a disgruntled shrug and then strode from the room on loudly clacking heels.

The expression of dismay on the man's face had not changed. His legs shook violently as he moved to retake his seat.

"Such dramas are a game for the young," quavered a voice disconcertingly close to Jack's ear. Both Jack and Dolce swung around to stare at the old man who had snuck up on them. He was old in a way that was shockingly unfamiliar to Jack. His skin hung sallow and deeply lined from his face, and was covered with brown spots of different sizes that reminded Jack of insect blighted fruit.

Another malkemist hovered at his elbow as though expecting him to collapse at any moment, despite the old man's death grip on his sturdy walking cane.

"When you get to my age, every day is a hard won victory and the last thing you'll want is to tempt needless strife." He chuckled at Jack's wary face and nodded ponderously. "I'm preaching to the choir. When I was your age, I thought I'd be leading the revolution. But life taught me that I didn't have that kind of reckless courage. Then I imagined that I would help my revolution along when I reached the end of my years." He paused. "Yet here I am, grasping at every last day, my revolution forgotten." He shook his head, laughing at himself.

The old malkemist hobbled away. His attendant attempted to support his steps and got a disgruntled hiss for his trouble. He stopped on his cane at the end of the table and turned back, his forehead creased in a frown.

"You look very much like your father."

The words hit Jack like a bucket of cold water, and he watched in frozen shock as the pair ambled from the room. It was only when they had closed behind them that the questions he should have asked began to hit him hard and fast. He stood uncertainly, wondering if he should pursue the old man.

Yes. <i>Go! Move!</i> he urged himself, only to find his way solidly blocked by a black-robed figure.

"Good evening, Corpa Jack. I see you have managed to preserve your liberty against great odds," Mistress Recien greeted, an unmistakable edge in her voice, and her eyes narrowed in challenge.

"Yes, mistress."

"Do present yourself at my office in the morning. We have the small matter of your debt to attend to."

Jack knew exactly what she was talking about, despite her strange manner of speaking. He nodded once. His eyes caught and stayed on her lips. He did not look her in the eye, but neither could he look down at the floor.

"I'm afraid that will not be possible Mistress Recien," came the light voice of Master Kandan over Jack's shoulder. "He has quite a number of duties to attend to and has garnered no small amount of scientific interest in his abilities. I will let you know if that interest wanes, though. You can be sure." Jack heard in Master Kandan's voice an edge of his own.

"You don't have the authority to interfere with my duties, Master Kandan, be careful not to overstep yourself."

"You misunderstand me, my lady. It is not my interest that stays your hand. But if you find yourself set upon insistence, you need not ask my permission to approach the grandmaster himself."

A flicker of uncertainty broke Mistress Recien's gaze, though it quickly turned to suspicion.

"Good evening mistress. May you always know yourself," Master Kandan gave a barely perceptible nod to the mistress of discipline.  "Let's go Jack. We have work to do."

Jack moved quickly to follow Master Kandan from the room.

"Westerners," muttered Mistress Recien as Jack passed her.

In the corridor Jack swung his head around. There were a few malkemists, but none of them were the old man. He caught himself as he peered the length of the long, lantern lit corridor. Why did he care? He had never worried about having a father before.

He kept pace behind Master Kandan, deep in thought. With a few words the old man had awakened a desire in Jack that he had not even known was there himself. <i>Why shouldn't I know who my father is?</i> he wondered. <i>But is it even possible?</i> He knew the story of his birth from Stine. Mardy had not been happy when she found out that Jack knew, and Stine's scolding had left Jack cringing on his behalf. To be fair to Stine, he had probably not intended to tell Jack, it had kind of just slipped out in a comfortable and carefree moment.

Jack had figured that his father could be almost anyone, and while that was true, it was really no one. But if the old man knew what he was talking about, then he could know, and suddenly it became real. Jack had a father. The thought rolled back and forward inside him, as though it wanted to pitch out one ear, but could not quite get a good enough run at it.

Jack wondered idly who had set the lamps. There were thirty or forty in each corridor. He figured it must be an enormous job to light them all each evening. As he tried to focus on the bright flame shining from the within the glass exterior of one of the lamps, he noticed that despite its brightness, it was not flickering. He felt goosebumps roll over him. <i>Cayophant protect</i>, he thought superstitiously as he warded himself.

Using the familiar warding gesture reminded him of Stine again, it was something he would do. Not Jack. Jack crept around in the dead of night. He was not scared of the dark or anything that crawled around in it. He shook his head to clear the feeling of weirdness and promised himself that he would look at one of the lamps closer tomorrow when they were not on fire.

He would also find the old man.

***

Demic paced the length of his room one more time and threw himself into his desk chair. The morning was bright outside, but the sun was not shining directly through his window. He had barely slept last night. He had eaten the meal that was delivered to his room, done some reading, then gone to bed early.

That had probably been his mistake. He had not been particularly tired and he had lain among the covers fully awake. While sleep had eluded him, he had run the conversation he intended to have with Korst through his head fifty times, perhaps a hundred. Sometimes it went well, often it did not. He had lost count of the number of times he had tossed and turned to find rest.

He had slept, but it was the kind of sleep that left him wondering if he had actually slept or just closed his eyes overly long. The moment the window had brightened, he had jumped out of bed to dress and, ultimately, pace.

It was time to go out, but it had occurred to him last night that it might be difficult to get down to the cells to even talk to Korst. He could normally have relied on one of the soldiers from Hunters Vale stationed here at Pamsley to handle the details for him. Any one of them would have to do his bidding, his father's instructions to them were specific and not open to interpretation.  Unfortunately, he did not want to risk any word of what he wanted to say to Korst making its way back to his father.

If he went to the grandmaster and requested entry to the cells, he might be sent away without an audience, or dressed down for even asking.

In the end, he had decided it was best to bluff his way in instead.  March into the cells and expect to be obeyed. If that failed, he would try the grandmaster.

He threw on his heaviest coat. He hoped that the extra bulk would make him seem a little more intimidating. In the corridor he immediately had to bow his head to two passing masters. They moved purposefully and paid very little attention to Demic.

He began walking towards the stairway that descended to the cellars. At a corridor crossing, another three malkemists came bustling through, forcing him to stop and bow respectfully. It was starting to wear him out. As soon as he thought it, he wondered if it was normal. <i>What's going on?</i>

The entrance to the cellars was in the direction opposite to the general tide. He realized with a start that it was a tide, as malkemists were moving in groups or alone in the same direction.

Demic was torn. He should go directly to Korst now, especially if every malkemist in the building seemed to be leaving, but whatever was drawing the Awares out was pulling at his curiosity too. Hoping that it was not something stupid, he turned and followed a pair of malkemists who had just passed him. If they thought it was strange that he had just changed course to follow them, they did not take it up with him.

As he approached the outside door, the hallway became thick with Awares in their pointy black hats. Keeping his head down, Demic followed the two in front of him as though he had been instructed to do so.

Outside, the pair followed the paved way outwards from the building into the garden. He wondered if this were some strange exercise regime for the masters at Pamsley, and despite how appalled he would be if that were true, he had to suppress a snort of amusement.

The Pamsley gardens were widely renouned for being the most beautiful anywhere, but Demic found himself unimpressed despite the immaculately trimmed topiaries, groomed lawns, and carved stone monuments. The gardens at Hunter's Vale were just as beautiful, if much smaller. He saw some unusual fruit trees that made him wonder if someone had been playing fast and loose with the law of unforeseen consequences. He might check up on them later.

Ahead, the Awares were arriving at a large circular structure and Demic recognized it immediately. It was a duelling arena, and a famous one at that. This was old. Perhaps one of the oldest buildings in Pamsley. Demic had seen reproductions of it in his library at home. Malkemists as a group seemed unable to shake the barbarous practice of bare conflict. Even his father had been unable to ban duelling. The one time that he had tried, there had been a rash of murders that had quickly convinced him to reinstate it. Apparently Awares, for all their rhetoric of superiority, needed to duel as involuntarily as goats needed to rut.

Demic grew apprehensive. There was no rule that said that a corpa could not attend and watch a duel, but this was a space for Awares, and he was only tolerated at Upper Pamsley for very practical political reasons. It was not a good idea for him to flout his special treatment. Unfortunately, he could not simply turn around and go back the way he came, because he would be bowing and scraping all the way back to the council house.

He examined a crossing path and decided to escape into the gardens and wander a circuitous route back to the house. At the same time he caught sight of a short, smartly dressed figure entering the arena behind an Aware. Demic almost did not recognise him in those clothes. The boy turned to look at the solid stone wall of the arena as he entered, and he had the fleeting impression of a dispassionate, austere gaze. For a moment Demic had the strong sense that he had seen that profile before.

Something was wrong. Demic rushed forward, thinking to catch up with Jack, and then it hit him. <i>Where is Dolce?</i> he thought.  She was always at Jack's side.

Puzzling at what it could mean, he almost missed her sitting in the morning sun by the side of the Arena. Demic felt an irrational pulse of disbelief. It seemed that Jack had learned to exercise some control over his simulcra. He slowed as he approached the arena entrance, his brow creased. <i>What did that mean?</i>

Too soon the thick arena wall blocked the morning sun and he was searching the cascading rows for the flash of color that had been Jack's clothes. It turned out to be easy amid the unrelieved blackness of the Awares, and Jack was peering all around him as though he were an Aware himself. Keeping his own head down in a perpetual bow, Demic rushed to take the seat beside Jack.

"Good morning," he greeted.

"Morning," replied Jack in surprise. "I'm sorry. About what happened to Soldier Korst."

Demic waved the platitude off impatiently. "He'll be fine. He's a slippery fish. If he did it, he covered his tracks. If he didn't, he has nothing to worry about."

"Indeed," intoned the Aware next to Jack, and with a start Demic remembered it was Master Kandan, the Aware investigating the murder. "I'll keep that in mind."

Demic felt his face flush hotly, and Jack gave him a condescending eyeroll. Demic quickly changed the topic.

"What's happening?"

"Mistress Solene found out that her husband was having an affair with a," Jack paused before the last word. "Koyim."

"Not a Koyim corpa, she's of malkemist blood, but not Aware. We call them consanguine," supplied Master Kandan.

"She wanted to kill him there and then in the main hall last night, but she challenged him instead," Jack continued. "I hear it's an uneven contest, because she's a scout and he's a cropper."

"Yes," agreed Master Kandan in a concerned voice. "Edwin probably hasn't used an offensive vill, or even a defensive one, since he passed the second test."

Demic blew air out of his nose with a gentle snort. "It's going to be a slaughter then." He had questions for Jack, not least of which was how he knew so much about what was going on all of a sudden, but he did not want to ask them around Master Kandan.

Most of the council members he knew were already down in the front rows, and as he watched the grandmaster entered with his three closest bodyguards. An Aware among the council members, Demic was fairly certain it was Master Grimald, had the temerity to accost the grandmaster, but the grandmaster ignored him and stomped past.

Down in the pit, the doomed Master Edwin stood wringing his hands as though trying to disqualify himself by tearing them off. The thought made Demic feel slightly sick with empathy for the man.

A murmur swept through the crowd as Mistress Solene entered onto the quartz floored pit. Master Edwin rushed forward to speak to her, his quiet voice failing to carry into the stands. She listened quietly, her face an unemotional mask. The small signs of grief on her face made her appear less caring than she may have otherwise seemed. Suddenly, she shook her head violently, rejecting whatever her husband had been trying to say.

The general chatter in the stands had hushed while the exchange took place, but rose again when Mistress Solene turned her back on her husband to prepare for the duel.

"Quiet please," demanded an Aware from a pulpit that overlooked the pit. "Two combatants have come before us to resolve their differences through the test of the perfection of their submission to their true purpose. The form will be battle, chosen by the challenger. We, the adjudicators of this ritual will brook no interference, in whatever form that interference may take. Let us remind all here that the penalty for interference is severe."

Demic had heard this speech, or one very much like it, a few times before. Seeing the sea of faces peering down on the combatants, he kicked himself for not going directly to Korst's cell. Now would have been the perfect time to be talking to him.

The formalities concluded, the pair faced off, and the Aware at the pulpit counted down formally from five.

Master Edwin acted first and fastest. He covered himself with inert kinetic gel, obviously expecting a physical attack of some sort. It covered his entire body, leaving only a small opening for his face.  Mistress Solene did nothing to protect herself. She stood there as though she had all the time in the world, and perhaps she did. She cast out her hand and a glob of gel flew at Master Edwin. He ducked away from it with a terrified yelp and it struck his shoulder instead of his chest. He stumbled to his knees and looked surprised—a sentiment shared by many of the spectators—when it did not explode violently or begin eating at his gel suit.

Master Edwin cast his wife a look of relief and thankfulness. He looked to be thanking her for her mercy, yet the expression on Mistress Solene's face was anything but merciful. Demic shook his head slightly, pitying the man. He had not yet realized the purpose of the attack.

The man's expression disappeared behind the upshot of gel that covered the hastily fashioned opening over his face. The crowd sighed in disappointment.

Master Edwin thrashed back and forth in a panic, clawing at his face with fingers thick and dull with his own gel. He got to his feet, but it did not help him find a better purchase on the gel.  His wife stood motionless, her face cold. If Demic had come upon them suddenly, he might have been hard pressed to guess she was the attacker.

Demic could hear the man's screams through the gel, and it tickled an uncomfortable place in his memory. He glared down angrily, and began analysing the battle to dispel the feeling.

This attack was an old tactic, well studied by Demic. If the cropper had any control over his gel suit, he would be able to open channels for his breathing, no matter how she tried to block him.  The control of the gel when in contact with the skin was far better than at a distance. Unfortunately, he seemed to have no dynamic control at all, and Demic saw the inevitable coming long before the cropper did.

The cropper's screams faded as he ran out of air. He held out longer than Demic expected, but eventually he enervated his suit, and the villend returned to its vill. Once free, he yanked his wife's gel from his face with his unemcumbered hands, and sucked loud mouthfuls of air into his lungs.

She had walked closer while he struggled and now stood on two paces from him.

He stood before her, bare of protection.

An instant later, blue flame sprung from her hands. It shocked Demic, but he recognised the pale blue flame as most probably the combustion of dicyanoacetylene and ozone under pressure. It covered the short distance between them in the blink of an eye. The cropper cried out in surprise, not pain, though Demic knew that that flame was one of the hottest that could be produced. The Aware flinched away, his arms coming up before him.

The flame stopped almost as soon as it had begun, leaving a charred circle on the man's chest, and smoldering edges where the cloth of his robes had been burned away. Strangely, only the arms of his robe were on fire, but the Aware was beyond panic now, as he seemed to have fainted away. He fell to the ground bonelessly.

Three Awares strode quickly out onto the arena to revive him.

"Was that it?" Jack asked in a surprised tone.

"Yes, it's definitely over," replied Master Kandan, a touch morosely.

"But it hardly touched him?" argued Jack. "It didn't even burn him much."

"That wasn't a stove fire. That was something far, far hotter. It doesn't need to work long. She hit him right over the heart. It had plenty of time to denature the proteins of his heart. Easily enough to kill him."

Jack looked confused, so Demic jumped in to show that he knew what had just happened.

"She cooked his heart, Jack. She meant to kill him dead without the possibility of resusitation."

Jack looked appalled, which surprised Demic. The other boy was usually pragmatic to a fault.

Mistress Solene stumbled away from the working Awares and vomited on the glass floor. Once her stomach had emptied, she rushed from the arena.

One of the Awares in the pit looked up at the grandmaster and shook his head.

The Aware at the pulpit declared Mistress Solene the winner and began to close the proceedings.

"Heaven holds no rage, like love to hatred turned, nor hell a fury, like a woman scorned," muttered Master Kandan to himself. The female Aware on his right turned to him with a slightly forced smile, as though trying to distract herself from what had just happened.

"I didn't know you were a poet Kandan."

"No, no, I'm not," he protested with regret tinged humility. "A clever parrot at best, I'm afraid."

Demic realized with a start that he needed to get back. He did not pause to say goodbye to Jack as he hurriedly left. Once on the path back to the council building he began to run, and quickly remembered why he hated running. Before he had covered half the distance back his breathing became ragged and uneven, and he slowed to a brisk walk to recover. He did not want to arrive at Korst's cell looking harried.

He went to the entrance of the cellars and descended the stairs.  The room he found himself in was lit by the electric lamps that only the masters of Upper Pamsley seemed to have the hubris to use openly. His father had told him about these lights long before he came here for himself. It was one of the reasons his father quoted to assert that the masters were not fit to lead what remained of the Awares.

Demic followed the corridor in the only direction it led. Doors opened off on both sides of the way, but the labels clearly indicated storerooms and other rooms with similarly domestic purposes. At the very end of the corridor stood a door with a neatly etched label. Holding Cells.

Demic took a deep breath and then opened the door boldly as though he was walking into his own bedroom. The room beyond was long and large, the walls lined with other doors. A desk stood to one side of the door, ready to process visitors and residents alike. An insouciant soldier sat behind the desk, boots up, and his arms folded. Demic felt himself tense. He would have much preferred this soldier to be upstairs with everyone else while he tried his risky little stunt.

The soldier did not move as Demic marched up to his desk. Demic sketched out a subtle movement by way of polite greeting from corpa to an Aware. It was an old form, but he was not using it to be polite. He used it to let the soldier know that he was from an old, well-connected family. The wary look the soldier got in his eye was enough to assure Demic that he had taken the hint.

"I'm here to visit the soldier, Korst. Which is his cell, Sirness?" Demic conducted himself sternly, aiming for the strict impartiality that his father always presented.

"No one mentioned any visitors to me, corpa," replied the still casually reclining soldier, though his tone was carefully neutral.  "Not today."

"Not today?" asked Demic sharply, before he could stop himself.

The soldier shrugged. "Some soldiers have family."

<i>That must be Soldier Erold</i>, thought Demic. If he had family, they were probably pressuring the grandmaster for his release. If they released Erold, they would need to release Korst at the same time in the absence of evidence. Maybe.

"Which cell is Soldier Korst in?" demanded Demic, turning and taking a stride into the wider room.

The soldier seemed to weight the effort it would take to get up and kick Demic out, against the potential for trouble. After only a short deliberation, he waved absently at a group of three doors.  Demic did not feel like pushing his luck by asking him to clarify.

He walked up to the first door and reached for the handle.  Reasoning that if he had chosen wrong, it would be less embarrassing to walk on than to backtrack, be wrong a second time, and then change direction again.

"Next one, idiot."

Demic shrugged mentally and did just that. The soldier said nothing as he opened the next door and went inside. The electric lighting in the room was soft, but more than enough by which to see a bed, washbasin, and toilet on the other side of the bars that partitioned the entrance from the cell itself. Korst seemed to be sleeping, but Demic knew the man well enough to doubt it.

"The least you could have done is snag my vills before heading down here," jibed the soldier without moving.

"You think you could fight your way free from Pamsley? I'd like to see that. Unfortunately, I have grander plans for you." Demic had had no intention of revealing his hand so quickly, but it slipped out involuntarily. Korst did not latch onto the turn of phrase.

"Well, your father can hardly expect me to defend you from this cell, and I don't feel the least guilty about it, since you're the reason I'm in here."

"I didn't kill the Aware from Dome, how could I?"

"You'd be a match for an Aware. Especially if they didn't know what you could do."

"You're missing the point. I had no reason to kill him," Demic's voice broke and he blushed.

"Neither did I, yet that seems to have had little bearing on my circumstances."

"It doesn't matter does it. If you didn't do it, they can't prove that you did."

Korst snorted. "I don't think I was ever as green as you. A man can be found guilty of a crime for a whole host of reasons that have nothing to do with with guilt or innocence. The possibilities for mischief are dizzying."

"Master Kandan seems good at what he does, and quite nice," Demic protested.

"That one!" Korst swung his feet the bed and twisted into a sitting position. "Makes my skin crawl! There's no such thing as a nice Aware. I felt like punching him in the face from the moment I met him. He's got something wrong in the head."

"Jack trusts him."

"That's another one that's not playing with a full deck. Be careful around the gutter rat. The koyim complain about malkemists, but you need to be a special kind of callous to survive on the streets, and he looks like he was good at it." He shook his head. "You wouldn't understand."

Demic hated that phrase, but he ignored it took a deep breath. It was now or never.

"That's not a very thankful attitude, considering that he saved your life."

"What? He never saved my life," Korst voice was first incredulous, then cautious. Perhaps he had caught the expression on Demic's face.

"He did save your life. It was him who convinced me to spare you." As the words came out his mouth, Demic's stomach sank. There was no putting the cat back in the bag. If he had erred, now was the time he would find out.

Korst scoffed. "I think your father would have something to say if you tried to kill me, corpa," Korst said in a slow, condescending voice.

"He's the one who'd be seeing you dead," revealed Demic. "He doesn't take kindly to one of his soldiers trying to wipe his son's mind."

Soldier Korst's eyebrows rose quizzically, as though this were the first he were learning of it. For a terrible moment, Demic doubted himself. <i>Could Jack have written the letter?</i> No. That was impossible. Demic had seen Jack's hand for himself. He could barely form letters, let alone forge Demic's own handwriting. He would also have had to know some very specific things about malkemy to write it. It was impossible.

Korst was a very good actor.

Demic smiled. "Jack was the one to make me see that you are much more valuable as a willing ally than a corpse." This was true, though Demic had spent hours refining the details of the idea until he could not see it flying back in his face. The consequences for Korst if Demic's father found out were never going to be good, which made the blackmail effective, but at the same time Demic did not want to reveal to his father—now or ever—that he had used the rod of his father's influence to foster his own.

The silence extended between them, but Demic endured it like a test of pain. He felt strangely at peace with his choice now that there was no going back. He had done all the worrying about it he was going to do. His father would have said he had arrived at the illusion of an Archimedean point, and he was sticking to it—Archimedean points always being an illusion in his father's opinion.

"How did you avoid the villend?" asked Korst in a quiet voice.

"A stomach bag," Demic lied. He had no intention of letting Korst know that it had been Jack who had avoided the villend. His own curiosity ignited suddenly, and he wondered how Jack had done it.

"And what if we'd used an aerosol, or an ointment?"

"I guess you would have wiped my mind," challenged Demic.

Korst's lip curled as though he could imagine worse things, and then with mercurial swiftness, he laughed.

"My incarceration begins to seem very convenient for you now. I am stuck down here where you can tell me all this without worrying about me doing anything rash," he stopped suddenly, his face registering shock. "No."

"Yes," asserted Demic, happy that Korst's mind was following his own reasoning.

"I'll bring in the soldier outside before I let you do that to me," warned Korst. "No one puts a compulsion on me!" His voice was beginning to rise.

"That could get messy," allowed Demic in a calm voice.

"If an Aware finds a vill on you, it won't be a simple slap on the wrist," Korst threatened.

"You have no way of controlling that situation Soldier Korst."

"I could try."

"Only the weak-minded hit and hope," reminded Demic, quoting his father.

Korst looked like he was going to yell out despite everything, but in the end, he stood up and strode to the bars with swift steps.

"Get on with it."

"By my connection to my true self, it'll be a light touch," promised Demic, feeling a little self conscious using the adult words.

"It better be," threatened Korst.

Though Korst was captive, and relatively willing, Demic still used misdirection to spray the Hypnos villend in his face. It did not require inhalation, although that helped a lot. It was enough that the drug touched his skin.

Korst slammed his meaty palms against the solid bars of his cell, shaking them with a deep thrum, and scaring Demic a step backwards.

<i>Petty</i>, thought Demic. He could see the soldier fighting the effect of the drug, trying to focus while it went to work on his brain. His eyes alternatively focused and unfocused, and his forearms shook with strain. It was all unnecessary theatrics from Demic's point of view. His father had used this villend on Demic when he had shown him its uses. The process was painless.

Within twenty seconds, the strain and aggression drained from the soldier. The situation had just become dangerous for Demic and he felt time slipping past him at an alarming rate. If the soldier outside decided to stick his head into the cell now, he would not fail to see the vacant expression on Korst's face. This was not a Voltis villend, that caused a subject to appear merely vague. The result of this villend had hijacked the soldier's prefrontal lobe and made him compliant. The effects would not be transient either, any suggestions Demic planted now would hold.

Korst had not been bluffing. If were caught with his fingers in the cookie jar of an Aware's mind, even his father's influence would not be enough to save him. He cast a look at the door. There was no bolt on it to lock it from the inside. He felt exposed.

Nevertheless, he paused. He had promised Korst that he would use a light touch. That meant that he would not place any compulsions on him that directly opposed his instinct for survival. Demic would not have the power to trigger his suicide for instance. It also meant that he could not compel him to harm his standing among the Awares. Though this was what Demic struggled with now. <i>Could he skirt the fringe of that?</i>

No. He would use the standard loyalty form.

"Soldier Korst, you will henceforth give your loyalty, in deed and thought, to me, Corpa Demic, in any and every way that does not conflict directly with your survival, or standing among the Awares."

Demic could also affect Korst's memory of what had just happened, but that was risky. The soldier was likely to notice that he was under a compulsion at some point, if he did not know why he might assume that Demic had placed it without his consent. That would be awkward, and perhaps even fatal for Demic.

He repeated the loyalty form three times.

With every passing moment, Demic's tension increased. It was hard to imagine that the soldier outside had been content to leave him alone with Korst as long as he had. He pulled the contra-villend from his pocket with trembling fingers, and almost dropped it to the ground. The shock of that fumble, like ice water down his spine, made his heart flip flop and beat painfully against the ribs of his chest.

The image of Korst stuck in his current state until the drug naturally worse off was so appalling that he almost sobbed. He took a deep breath to calm himself and applied the antidote.

It worked slowly. Although it probably took exactly the same time as the original villend had taken to stupify the soldier, it was now a painful wait. Eventually, Korst started blinking and drew back from the bars.

"Did you do it?" asked Korst with narrowed eyes.

"It's done."

Korst laughed. "It looks like it took more out of you than me.  You're shaking like a leaf."

Demic blew out his cheeks and a puff of air. It really had put him through the wringer.

"Did you kill the Aware in the bathroom?" asked Demic in an annoyingly shakey voice. He cleared his throat roughly.

"No," drawled Korst smuggly. "Did you?"

"No. It can't have been Jack, Dolce would have made a much bigger mess."

"I guess it must have been the other soldier," finished an uninterested Korst, returning to his bed.

"Maybe."

"If you need to know, you can march over to his cell and pull the same shit on him," Korst mocked as he settled himself back into his bed.

Demic's gut twisted at the thought. This had already been far more risk than he ever wanted to take again. For an irrational moment, he blamed Jack. Demic would never have taken a risk like this on his own.

***

Awares jostled Jack as they left the pews of the arena. Master Kandan remained still, staring down at the dead Aware as though he had been a close friend, and for all Jack knew, perhaps he had been. He did not know so much about Master Kandan that he could tell. Without warning, the man's demeanour changed and he became brisk and impatient.

"Let's go Corpa Jack, we have work to do," urged Master Kandan, his hand pushing Jack along by the small of his back.  Jack said nothing, though he had been waiting for the master, not the other way around. The press of Awares descending from the stands slowed them to a crawl.

The grandmaster too was trying to leave, but his way had been blocked by a trio of Awares. This manoeuver was met by the three bodyguards that shadowed the grandmaster. They crowded in front of the bull-like man as though expecting an attack. Jack felt a sliver of fear.

"We'd like a word grandmaster," called out one of the three, a man with a grey flecked moustache.

The grandmaster looked like he was going to change directly for a moment and simply ignore the man, but he evidently thought better of it.

"Yes, Master Grimald. What can I help you with?" challenged Grandmaster Waisel. Despite the polite words, the menacing tone that accompanied them was as bare as an unsheathed blade.

Master Grimald looked a little unnerved, as though he had not expected an audience at all. He cleared his throat.

"We," he stopped to choose his words. "It has come to our attention that you have an Aware from Carnt Library in the holding cells." The master looked to his companions for support before going on.  "He must be released."

"Must?" the grandmaster queried. "Released?"

Jack admired Master Grimald's courage when he persisted.

"Yes." He took a great stuttering breath to gird himself. "If there is no evidence of crime, then you must release him."

The grandmaster scoffed. "There is plenty evidence of crime. That, we have in abundant supply..." Jack missed some of what he said amid the shuffles around him. "...see your soldier's head snipped off at the clavicles..."

Master Grimald glared at the grandmaster, but he had to peer over Soldier Fild's shoulder to do it, which lessened the man's menace somewhat. He was the shortest man in that company, and only barely as tall as the stern, grey-haired woman beside him.

The stern woman broke in with an imperious and high pitched voice that Jack had far less trouble hearing. "That will not do, grandmaster, and you know it. Unless you have compelling evidence that Soldier Erold was involved, you must return his liberty."

"I must do nothing!" retorted the grandmaster, slapping his own thigh. He gestured and the soldiers made room for him. In moments he was gone.

In his abscence, the mistress fell into a quiet huddle with the masters around her.

"Will they get him released," asked Jack, unable to keep a note of concern from his voice.

"Yes, soon enough. They're right afterall. He can't be held without material evidence. Which is what we are about today, or at least," he tipped his brow at Jack, "what I am about today. You, I will leave in the capable hands of Master Anatol, who has requested some time with you."

"Time for what?" asked Jack.

If Master Kandan was surprised that Jack was asking questions, he covered it seamlessly.

"He would like to test the anomalous skills that you have demostrated. Or as many as he is able." He seemed about to go on, but simply stopped instead as he shuffled along after the malkemist in front of him.

Jack felt a knot of anxiety building in the pit of his stomach. He did not like the idea of being tested. The pressing bodies of the malkemists around him lent to the impression of being trapped and for a moment he felt the urge to flee. Then he remembered Dolce waiting patiently outside, and he clamped down on the feeling. The last thing he wanted to do was to excite her.

Finally, they cleared the arena and Dolce was the second thing to hit him after the intense relief of the space opening up around him. She slobbered on his clothes, but he did not mind it at all.

"Come Jack!" called Master Kandan, as though it was Jack's fault he was not keeping up. "Hurry up."

The soldier stationed at the door did not look at Dolce when they entered the house. In fact, she did everything she could not to look at Dolce. The female soldier brought a question to Jack's mind.

"Can women be soldiers?" asked Jack as he rubbed the new blonde stubble that was already growing on Dolce's bare shoulder.

Master Kandan looked around vaguely, his mind apparently somewhere else. It seemed to take him some effort to drag himself back to focus on Jack and to recall the question.

"Yes. Yes, of course. A malkemist soldier doesn't require physical strength the same way the koyim do. Women can be just as powerful in malkemy as men. You just saw that in fact."

Jack nodded, but the master had already sunk back into his thoughts.

They climbed the stairs to the next floor and Master Kandan led the way to a beautifully gilded door. Jack had the terrible premonition that this was Mistress Recien's door. Master Kandan gave the door his habitual soft rap and Jack held his breath.

The door opened and a vaguely familiar face appeared in the doorway. He was dressed in malkemist robes, but he was bare headed.  Jack recognised him from the dining hall last night. He let his pent up breath out slowly.

"You're late," challenged the Aware. "I suppose you went and watched that sad spectacle down at the arena. A blind koyim could have predicted the outcome. There's no need to encourage them."

"And if I told you that Master Edwin won the match?" asked Master Kandan.

"I'd call you a liar. I watched Solene leave the arena from my window."

Master Kandan lifted his eyebrows and gave a small embarrassed smile before shrugging.

"Right you are. Anyway, here is Corpa Jack and his simulcra. The grandmaster has requested that he be fully supervised for the time being. I'll be back by lunchtime, but if you finish before then I should be in my rooms."

The other Aware merely shrugged.

"Jack, this is Master Anatol. He specialises in the causes of things and will be investigating your gifts. I leave you in his capable hands."

Master Anatol waved impatiently for Jack to enter his apartments as Master Kandan left. He pointed to a spot on in the middle of the floor and said one word.

"Stay."

Jack and Dolce stopped obediently.

The Aware disappeared into an adjoining room and returned pushing a platform on wheels. It was heavy and he struggled to push it in the direction he wanted. Jack stepped forward as though to help, but the bare-headed malkemist waved him off with fluttering hands.

On the platform sat a large block of dull grey metal. It looked ominous and creepy to Jack.

"Varley, boy! Let's see what you can do."

Master Anatol reached into his vest, pulled out a vill, and handed it to Jack. He did not wait for whatever it was he expected Jack to do. Instead, he went to a large and heavy desk and began to furiously pen notes into a ledger. The scratch of his pen was loud in the otherwise quiet room.

Jack looked at Dolce. Dolce looked at Jack. Master Anatol began to speak.

"It is impossible to change the function of a vill. A weak vill can sometimes be overwhelmed by a powerful malkemist with a plith crystal, but even then it is a struggle. But the idea that an unassisted Aware, let alone a corpa, can spontaneously change the function of a vill is ridiculous! I am shocked and appalled that my fellow Awares are lending any credence to these wild stories. A powerfully charged vill is immutable, this has been known since the dawn of malkemy. It is almost as fundamental as the laws of thermodynamics. So, here is what we are going to do today. I am going to give you vills. You are going to try to change them. Don't feel bad when you fail, it really is impossible. Somebody has obviously made an error and glossed over a perfectly reasonable explanation for whatever it is they think they saw. I am a rational man. I am a Scientist. We will get to the bottom of this fiasco together."

Master Anatol turned away from his desk to address Jack directly.

"Well? Have you finished?"

Jack gave a tiny negative shake of his head, feeling embarrassed.  The vill felt wrong in his hand, as though it were vibrating unpleasantly in his palm. The impression of wrongness crept up his forearm as a sensation of near pain. It was not pain, but like the precursor of pain that threatens before the real pain arrives.  Discomfort.

"Yes, I see. A waste of my time as I expected," groused the master.  "I should stop right here and be done with this mess, but that wouldn't be very methodical of me."

Jack winced slightly at the sensation creeping up his arm from the vill. He shook his hand slightly and banished the feeling with a mental flick. The change in the sensation was relief enough for him to expel a sigh.

"Well pass it back here, we haven't got all day. There are other tests I can give." He gestured impatiently for Jack to hand him the small vill, and held out his hand.

Jack dropped the vill into the man's short-fingered grasp and then jumped back in surprise when the master cried out loudly.

"What is this!?" Master Anatol half roared, half spluttered. The words faded from the air as Jack took a shocked step back against Dolce, and the master's face slowly transformed into a mask of horror. He opened his mouth to speak, but no words came out. He looked at the vill in his hand intently, but Jack could see that he was not focused on it at all.

"You cheated," the master muttered in a low, soft voice. Jack would not have heard the words except that he was watching and listening to the upset master very closely.

"You cheated," he said more loudly. "That's the only possibility.  Who gave you this vill? These are my vill capsules, but that's an easy enough thing to copy." His voice grew louder still. "Who gave you this vill!? You won't make a fool of me!"

The master cast his eye around his apartment furiously, before finally calming himself slightly. He looked Jack directly in the eye.

"Strip off your clothes!"

Jack hesitated. He did not feel like being naked here, not at this moment.

"Now!"

Jack reluctantly began to remove his vest. Not so long ago, only two pieces of clothing had separated him from the state the Cayophant clerics referred to as skyclad. Now he had quite a number of garments to remove, not the least of which were his boots and stockings. He was bare chested and attacking the laces of his boots when there came an unexpected knock on the door.

"Come in," called Master Anatol, composing himself somewhat after his earlier outburst.

Master Edgar poked his head around the opening door. He clucked with amusement when he saw Jack's progressing undress.

"Master Anatol, I had no idea," mocked Master Edgar wryly, his attention on the half naked Jack. He closed the door behind himself and lowered his brow towards Master Anatol in inquiry. "I came to see how your investigations are coming along."

"It hasn't begun as yet," replied Master Anatol, enunciating each word clearly and stiffly, a slight flush on his cheeks.

"Does he really need to be naked?" asked Master Edgar.

"I'm eliminating the possibility of chicanery."

Master Edgar pinched his thumb and middle finger together from the ends of his eyebrows to the bridge of his nose.

"Varley, that seems quite thorough to me," admitted Master Edgar with a twinkle in his eye. He cast Jack a conspiratorial wink as the other master busied himself with his instruments. "I take it you already have a positive sample of the boy's abilities?" 

"You could say that." Master Anatol did not seem ready to concede any such thing.

"May I?" requested Master Edgar, holding out his hand.

Master Anatol hesitated, but handed the vill over without any fuss.

"Octanitrocubane?" asked Master Edgar.

"Perhaps," conceded Master Anatol, before gesturing at the grey metal block. "I would need to test it's yield to be sure."

"Keep your underwear on corpa!" admonished Master Edgar with a laugh. "I'm sure there's very little chicanery concealed in your drawers."

Jack pulled up his pants and underwear together, then readjusted his thumbs to only pull down his pants. He dropped his pants into the small pile he had formed.

"I think he's ready," invited Master Edgar.

"I only have less powerfully charged villends now," complained Master Anatol. "This has disturbed my scientific protocol." He looked like he wanted to continue with the complaint, but Master Edgar broke in.

"I think you can try first. If he can convert a weaker villend without any external interference, I'm sure even you will accept that he did in fact convert the first. The only question of importance is whether he can or not."

Master Edgar seemed inclined to argue the point, but he kept it to a grumble or two under his breath as he handed Jack yet another vill. He returned to his ledger to write some more notes. Jack imagined that he wielded his pen with spiteful relish.

The busily writing master stopped and whirled around suddenly, as though a sudden thought had occurred to him, but all he did was watch Jack closely.

Jack felt ridiculous. Whatever was happening to the vills he touched, he had no idea how or why it was happening. He had not tried to do anything, had not made the slightest effort any of the times that they said he had changed their vills. The vill in his hand was causing a similar discomfort to the previous one. In irritation he shook his hand and pushed back mentally at the sensation, it felt like he was scolding a small child that had irritated him.

<i>That's what I do!<i> Jack almost yelled out loud. He felt a prickle of excitement sweep over his skin. The vill felt comfortable in his hand now, it felt right. But it felt right because it was familiar. He knew what it was.

He smiled slightly as he handed the vill back to Master Anatol, though it turned sour on his lips in the face of Master Anatol's obvious displeasure.

"Again?" asked Master Edgar, leaning forward eagerly.

"Again."

"That's wonderful," gushed Master Edgar.

Master Edgar looked scandalised, but he did not contradict the secretary with anything as firm as a retort.

"I'll let Master Kusof know that his services will be required afterall," continued Master Edgar. "He is very much looking forward to exploring the possibilities with this young corpa. It was his father who suggested that such a phonomena might be possible. To imagine he was laughed at and ridiculed when he suggested it."

The secretary was obviously enjoying rubbing vinegar into Master Anatol's open discomfort for reasons that Jack had no hope of guessing at. Meanwhile, Master Anatol grew more wan and sickly with each polite barb.

"Corpa Jack, I think you can dress yourself once more," suggested the secretary. "The house is chilly. Master Anatol, could you send this young corpa to my office once you are finished with him here.  Thank you."

Jack gave an inward sigh of relief. He did not want to be stuck with Master Anatol any longer than absolutely necessary. The secretary had just pulled him neatly from Master Anatol's authority.

Master Anatol's eyes tightened, but he gave a terse nod to the secretary as the older man ducked out of the apartment.

The master busied himself with his grey metal block. Jack noticed for the first time that it had a hole in the top. He then went to a tiny scale on his desk and released some of the villend out into a small container. To Jack's amazement, the scale reacted very strongly to the small amount of liquid poured. It seemed that he placed too much and carefully sopped some up with a piece of paper.  He then transferred the liquid straight into the hole in the block, chased it with a length of string, and finally filled the hole with fine sand. Once that was done, he took out another vill and covered the block in protective gel.

"Brace yourself," the master quipped carelessly. He followed the string behind his desk and picked up a small box the the string was attached to. He whirled a handle on the side and then gave Jack a pointed look when he noticed that he had not moved a muscle.

Jack quickly backed away from the metal block.

"Three, two, one. Fire in the hole!" called out the malkemist loudly. His voice was followed by a relatively quiet thud that left Jack wondering what the fuss had been all about.

The protective gel around the block pulsed upwards by a fraction of a moment then fell still.

"That was it?" Jack muttered quietly.

Not quietly enough that the master did not hear it though.

"If you're underwhelmed, try to remember it's your explosive, not mine," his voice was grouchy. "But this isn't pyrotechnics, its a test to determine the yield. If it matches a known yield I'll be fairly certain that it isn't a new kind of explosive. Which I don't expect at any rate."

Jack nodded sagely along with his ignorance.

***

Jack stood fidgeting before the secretary's door, his fingers stroking Dolce's fur. There had been musical notes floating from the office a few moments before, but they were gone now. The knuckles that had laid the three knocks that had summoned the now approaching footsteps were already disappearing down the corridor outside. The owner of those knuckles had little desire to meet the secretary again. Meanwhile, Jack had every reason to want the secretary to hurry up. Mistress Recien's office was directly opposite this one, and every moment the secretary delayed, was a moment closer to hatchet face opening her door and catching Jack there.

Jack had been with Master Anatol for a long while. He did not know exactly how long, but it was now already well past midday. The master no longer doubted that Jack could change the function of a charged villend, but the proof had not been sufficient to make him happy about it.

Jack rested his eyes, hoping that it would salve his growing headache. He squeezed them shut at the same instant the door opened. For a terrible moment, he thought the door behind him had opened and in defiance of his fatigue, his eyes popped hard open.  Master Edgar met his gawkish, surprised features with a frown of inquiry.

"Where is Master Anatol?" he demanded.

"He rushed off as soon as he knocked, sirness," spat out Jack as quickly as he could gather his wits back around himself.

Master Edgar's eyes narrowed, but he said nothing of it, merely gestured for the both of them to enter.

The inside of the secretary's office was a glorified library, just like any well trod malkemist space. Jack had begun to realise that books were a form of status for malkemists. The only malkemist of high status that had not seemed to follow this rule was Master Nuth, and that was perhaps because Jack had only seen his audience hall, not his private space.

Master Edgar did not disappoint. The walls of his office were thick with books. Yet beyond the books were little surprises that Jack would never have expected. Pencil and charcoal sketches layered the spaces between bookshelves. Pictures of faces, animals, and things.  Some of them were astoundingly detailed, and Jack had the strong desire to look at them more closely.

Jack spotted a strange looking desk in the corner. It did not look like it would be much use for penning a letter for the simple fact that there was not enough space to lay a sheet of paper on it. As he ran it around in his head, he decided instead that it must be a cabinet.

Master Edgar closed the door. It made a whooshing sound as the heavy door pounded snuggly into its deeply recessed frame. The sound spoke of finality. Jack rubbed his thumb over the first phalanx of his pointer finger to rid himself of his unease. Then, as though to tell him that he was not alone, Dolce's head rose up under his hand, reassuringly solid.

"You'll have to forgive Master Anatol his fervour, he's one of these Awares who thinks that Science was merely misused by the koyim Tenologists, not the cause of their downfall. It's not a view that would have been tolerated even thirty years ago, but no one ever won taking the long bet on things never changing." Master Edgar shook his head to himself and went to the strange cabinet that Jack had been wondering on. He pressed several small keys in sequence and the room filled with a brief refrain of music. He pulled a wooden cover down to cover the keys as the sound faded from the room.

Jack knew then that it must be a piano, though he had never seen one before, only heard stories about them. Jack's head was pounding now, but a question had been building inside him. Despite the annoyance, or perhaps because of it, he decided to ask.

"Excuse me, sirness. Why do you hate these tenologists? Was there a war?"

Master Edgar smiled at that.

"A war? No. There was no need. The tenologists destroyed themselves. As far as I know, Awares didn't even exist in the time of the tenologists. Our earliest accounts of Awares came at least a hundred years after the collapse of the tenologist civilisation."

The secretary went to the chair tucked in behind his desk and sat down.

"But I didn't bring you here to spin you historical tales. I have recently lost the services of a runner, and need to replace him.  That's where you come in. You will report to me tomorrow morning." He paused for a moment, then finished with, "That's all. I'll see you tomorrow."

Jack hesitated a moment, remembering that he was not supposed to be unsupervised. However, if the secretary did not care, then Jack cared less. He bowed and backed his way out toward the door. After a brief struggle with the heavy door, and opening it just wide enough for Dolce to slip out, he was free.

And yet, he was not. He could walk all the way to the stables, probably saddle Risle, but it was not the malkemists keeping him here. It was his curiosity that stopped him.

He did not even bother trying to shake the feeling that it was going to get him in trouble.

***



  


Cripple in Corsisan. Describe broken bones that have set without reattaching.

Foreshadow his curiosity and perhaps Marmy's dislike of his curiosity.

Kandan is the killer. We need a second catalyst. Another death. We also need a reason why revealing Kandan is not in Jack's best interest, but slowly becomes more and more in his interest.  Emotional instability. Anger on the part of Kandan.

We need stressors for Jack. What is the danger here? I've just locked up Erold! How is he going to get out? Can we hold him indefinitely? Do the two council members mentioned earlier have some connection to Erold and have him released.

Is Kandan going to try to teach Jack to do Malkemy? What do we learn about Jack's abilities. What cool stuff will Jack be able to do?

We discover that simulcra sometimes have bouts of dazes after the self-actuate. Kandan shows this behaviour. Also drop that simulcra are attracted to each other and recognize each other, at least when they are still dependent upon a malkemist or only recently self-actualized.

Halme arrives at end of sequence.

Political tension within Pamsley. Can we have it boil over into violence? A challenge on the grandmaster? Especially after Soldier Erold's incarceration. Can we get Korst out of jail?

Can we have Demic go to Korst while he is incarcerated and tell him that he knows that Korst tried to wipe his memory. This is a controlled environment where Demic can test Jack's plan without too much risk. He must have a good bluff in place though. After Erold has been released due to pressure. Erold requests to leave Pamsley and the secretary fast-tracks the submission. Erold is living in shame because of the incident with Jack. He tries once more to assault Jack, but it is thwarted by the Unbrothered.

Kandan tells Jack about the first Malkemist, about tenologists (us and them) and his son Pomede. The legend of how he sentenced his son to imprisonment for trying to preserve technology for the koyim. A famous conundrum similar to prometheus where Pomede is destroyed daily and then resurrected by spirits each night in punishment.

The larger conflict down in Lower Pamsley between families and libraries and the role of Dukard and the abuse that the smaller families endure. Corpa Golien pulls together a band of different smaller families to protect themselves. Jack actually finds himself surrounded by more help than he expects. Sparrow Library is relatively well presented in the school.

Jack enters the service of the secretary running messages and parcels around. Golien is sent to the mistress of discipline again and hears directly from Golien what has been happening down in Lower Pamsley. A small scale war between the corpas. Golien's Unbrothered are at the centre of it. He heard something like it from Demic. 

Jack's father is a very old malkemist. He waited for centuries to father a son. He gave a letter to an elderly malkemist in Upper Pamsley. The elderly gentlemen looks strangely at Jack the first time he meets him. He explains to Jack that a reclusive malkemist gave him a letter to pass to a boy that fit Jack's description, but did not give a time for when it would happen. He made this malkemist swear using an ancient formula that the old malkemist honoured. He was chosen because he was one of only a handful who still honour such things. He is very, very curious about the contents of the letter, but never opened it. He does not ask Jack directly, but he is dying, and Jack understands the old man's curiousity. He requests that Jack become his nursemaid. 

My Son,

If you are reading this, Master Albern has fulfilled his duty.  Albern, if you are reading this, shame on you.

I wish that I could have been with you through your journey thus far, but I was tired. I do not know how old I have grown, embarrassingly, I lost track. I am certainly more than seven centuries old, but closer precision is beyond me. However, by the time you read this, I will be dead several years.

I have been the last Malkemist for three hundred and twenty-seven years now. On your birth, I passed that mantle to you. Do not confuse yourself with the pretenders who call themselves malkemists in this day and age. They are theives and charlatans, none capable of joining with their higher self in proper submission to their true purpose.

I apologise for the lowly circumstances of your birth, it was one of only a few ways to keep you from the corrupting influence of the malclave while you were young. If it makes you feel any better, I consulted you before making the choice. Though I am sure you will not remember it. You will just have to take my word for it for the time being.

Trust yourself.

Sincerely,

Your Father,

Aldenen.




----------------------------------- 
---------Hic Sunt Dracones--------- 
----------------------------------

TODO: Jack's daydream of forming a small gang of his own (shading Jack's ambition and subsequent interest in doing this for Demic).  Do at Marten's Den, or around there.

****************************************************************** 
$realising $realised $recognised $leaped $flourish $towards $humour $demeanour $fibres $oesophagus $grey $immobilising $rigour $centre $outmanoeuvred $organise $vigourously $monologue $immobilising $Pyjamas $pyjamas $pyjama $mesmerising $advertised $neighbour $favourite $materialised $sympathise 
******************************************************************

River Paspe -- River running by the city of Corsisan.
Corsisan -- City Jack was born in.

Master Amoth
Master 
Grandmaster Waisel
Soldier Halme
Soldier Mond
Soldier Korst
Corpa Demic
Minnie
Emily
Albert
Mistress 
